Watch the President lay out his strategy to stop taxes from going up on 98% of Americans & reduce our nation's deficit:  
Some of our favorite photos from election night:  
"I’m committed to solving our fiscal challenges. But I refuse to accept any approach that isn’t balanced."  
"We must commit—this day and every day—to serving you as well as you've served us." —President Obama to veterans today:  
"What Bobby Kennedy called the ripples of hope that come out when you throw a stone in a lake—that's going to be you."  
The President made a surprise visit to campaign HQ yesterday to thank staff & volunteers. Here's what he said.  
The definition of hope is you still believe, even when it's hard.  
President Obama in his victory speech last night: "For the United States of America, the best is yet to come."  
Thank you.  
Four more years.  
We're all in this together. That's how we campaigned, and that's who we are. Thank you. -bo 
This happened because of you. Thank you. 
Nevada, pass it on: Polls close at 7pm PT. You can vote as long as you're in line before then. #StayInLine 
Last chance to help win this election: Pick up your phone and call voters in key states.  #StayInLine 
Iowa, spread the word: Your polls close at 9pm CT, and you can vote as long as you're in line by then. #StayInLine 
Reminder: If you're waiting to vote in Florida, #StayInLine! As long as you were in line when polls closed, you can still vote. 
Step 1: Pick up your phone. Step 2: Call voters in key states. Step 3: Help win this election.   
Wisconsin & Minnesota: Polls close at 8pm CT. Spread the word: You can vote as long as you're in line before then. #StayInLine 
New Mexico & Colorado, RT this: Polls close at 7pm MT, and you can vote as long as you're in line by then. #StayInLine 
Help get out the vote: Grab your phone and call voters right now.   
Let your friends know you had the President's back today:  
President Obama recorded an Election Day message for you:  #ElectionDay2012 
Pennsylvania: Polls close at 8pm ET, and you can vote as long as you're in line before then. Spread the word. 
Ohio and North Carolina: Polls close at 7:30pm ET, and you can vote as long as you're in line before then. Go vote now, and spread the word! 
If you’re in line when the polls close, stay in line to vote. It could help make the difference.  
Don't watch this video:   
Just a handful of votes could decide this election. Confirm your polling place and go vote now:  #ElectionDay2012 
This guy's counting on you:   
Already voted? Get on the phone and help turn out voters in key states where a few votes could make the difference:  
Will Ferrell will do anything to get you and your friends to vote right now:  #VoteObama 
Ohio: This election could come down to just a few votes, and yours could make the difference.   
Jay Z wants you in a voting state of mind today.   #VoteObama 
This election is close, and your vote could make the difference. Confirm where to cast your ballot now:  
Spread the word: You can still make the difference in this election. Help get out the vote now:   
If he can find the time to make calls today, so can you!   
Today, always be doing something:   
Just a few votes could make the difference in this election—grab a friend when you vote today.  
We're coming to the end of a long campaign—all that's left to do is get out the vote. Let's win this. -bo 
Share why you're voting for President Obama today with the hashtag #VoteObama. 
Carol from NH is voting for Obama-Biden because “My taxes have gone down, and my take-home pay has gone up.” #VoteObama 
“I trust President Obama. I do not trust Mitt Romney. And that's really all I need to know.”—Joe, a Purple Heart veteran from PA #VoteObama 
“It's been years since I've felt connected at any level to a president.”—Gabe, OH, who voted McCain in ’08 but is voting Obama-Biden in 2012 
“I am a military wife with 6 children, and the added Pell Grant benefit has afforded our family to allow me to go back to school.”—Amy, FL 
Amanda, AK: “I am supporting President Obama as both a college student and a veteran because he has never given up on fighting for us.” 
Check out a few voters’ reasons for supporting President Obama—then grab a friend and go #VoteObama:  
Time to vote! Grab a friend to join you and head over to your polling place:   
25 reasons that 25 people are voting for President Obama:  
At the final rally of his final campaign last night, President Obama told the story of "Fired up! Ready to go!"  
It’s Election Day! This is your last chance to help win this thing—RT this link so your friends know where to vote:  
Election Day is here! Confirm your polling place and bring a friend with you to vote.   
President Obama tells the story of "Fired up! Ready to go!" at the final rally of his final campaign.  #Forward 
Let's give this guy four more years.  
“Let’s go vote. Let’s keep moving forward.” —President Obama 
“Iowa, tomorrow let’s remind the world just why the United States of America is the greatest nation on Earth.” —President Obama 
Obama: “One voice can change a room. And if it can change a room, it can change a city. And if it can change a city, it can change a state.” 
Edith is in North Carolina this week, getting out the vote. “I’m still fired up but I’ve got work to do,” she said. 
"The woman, her name was Edith Childs, she became a celebrity. She was written up in the Wall Street Journal." 
“But after a few minutes, I’m feeling kind of fired up. I’m feeling kind of ready to go.” 
“So I turn and look behind me, and there’s this small woman, 60 years old. She’s famous for her chant. She does it wherever she goes.” 
“And when the voice says ‘Fired up!’ They all say ‘Ready to go!’" 
And as I make my way around the room, suddenly I hear this voice cry out behind me: “Fired up!” 
“We get to Greenwood, and we pull up to a small field house. I walk in and there are about 20 people there.” 
"I got a powerful reminder of this myself on our last campaign." 
"Don’t ever believe your vote doesn’t matter. Don’t ever let anyone tell you your voice can’t make a difference." —President Obama 
"It's out of my hands now. It's in yours. All of it depends on what you do when you step into that voting booth tomorrow." 
“Here in America, you can make it if you try. That’s what we’re fighting for.” —President Obama 
"Now is the time to keep pushing forward." —President Obama 
"We have come too far to turn back now. We have come too far to let our hearts grow faint." —President Obama 
“Iowa, I’m not ready to give up the fight. I’ve got a lot more fight left in me.” 
"If you want to break the gridlock in Congress, you’ll vote for leaders who feel the same way." 
"I will work with anybody, of any party, to move this country forward." —President Obama 
"I ran because your voices had been shut out of our democracy for way too long." —President Obama 
"We’re not going to turn Medicare into a voucher just to pay for another millionaire’s tax cut." —President Obama 
"Change is turning the page on a decade of war so we can do some nation-building here at home." —President Obama 
"Change comes when we live up to this country’s legacy of innovation, by investing in the next generation of technology and manufacturing." 
"Change is a country where every American has a shot at a good education." —President Obama 
“After all we’ve fought through together, we cannot give up on change now.” —President Obama 
"You know I tell the truth. You know that I’ll fight for you and your families every single day, as hard as I know how." —President Obama 
"You may not agree with every decision I’ve made—Michelle doesn’t. But you know what I believe." 
"The choice you make tomorrow is not just between two candidates or two parties. It’s a choice between two different visions of America." 
"We’ve made real progress these past four years. But Iowa, we’re here tonight because we’ve got more work to do." —President Obama 
"The war in Afghanistan is ending. Al Qaeda is on the run. And Osama bin Laden is dead." —President Obama 
"Today, our businesses have created nearly 5.5 million new jobs. The American auto industry is back. Home values are on the rise." 
"In 2008, we were in the middle of two wars and the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression." 
"When the cynics said we couldn't: You said 'Yes we can.' You said 'Yes we can,' and we did." —President Obama 
"To all of you who’ve lived and breathed the hard work of change: I want to thank you. You took this campaign and made it your own." 
"I've come back to Iowa one more time to ask for your vote. I came back to ask you to help us finish what we started." —President Obama 
Happening now: President Obama speaks at the final rally of his final campaign.  
"We cannot turn back now. We need to keep moving this country forward." —First Lady Michelle Obama 
"Tomorrow, we get the chance to finish what we started here in Iowa."— 
Watch live: President Obama's final campaign rally in Des Moines, Iowa.  
This all started around kitchen tables and at county fairs here in Iowa. We've come a long way, and it's always great to be back. -bo 
Under President Obama, we’ve added 5.4 million private-sector jobs over 32 straight months:   
The President is helping millions more students afford college:   
Presidents tried to reform our health care system for decades. This one got the job done:  
President Obama kept his promise to end the war in Iraq:  
Rainbow Ohio:  
Three guys hanging out backstage in Columbus:  
FACT: America’s dependence on foreign oil has reached a 20-year low, down 25% since President Obama took office. #Forward 
FACT: President Obama doubled funding for Pell Grants, increasing the number of recipients to nearly 10 million students. #Forward 
FACT: President Obama kept his promise to end the war in Iraq. Romney called the decision to bring our troops home “tragic.” 
FACT: Thanks to Obamacare, insurance companies won’t be able to charge women more than men for the same coverage. #Forward 
FACT: Thanks to the President’s health care law, 3.1 million more young Americans under age 26 have health coverage. #Forward 
FACT: The first bill President Obama signed into law was the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act, which helps women fight for equal pay. 
Under President Obama, we’ve accomplished a lot—and tomorrow's our chance to finish what we started:  
President Obama ordered the raid on Osama bin Laden’s compound, eliminating the man responsible for the 9/11 attacks:  
President Obama in Ohio: "Another $5 trillion tax cut favoring the wealthy—not change."  
President Obama: "Let's go vote. Let's go do this."  #Forward 
President Obama: "If you're willing to work with me again, we'll win Ohio. We'll finish what we started." #Forward 
Obama: "The auto worker who's back on the job building cars with pride and dignity—he needs a champion." #Forward 
President Obama: "I will work with anybody from any party to move this country forward." 
Obama: "We know what real change is. We know what the future requires. We also know it won't be easy." 
President Obama: "Change is turning the page on a decade of war so we can do some nation-building here at home." #Forward 
Obama: "Don't tell me that students who can't afford college should just borrow money from their parents." 
President Obama: "You know that I know what real change looks like because you've seen me fight for it." 
President Obama on Romney: "We know what change looks like, and what he's selling ain't it." 
President Obama: "Our economy is stronger when everybody can count on affordable health insurance." #Forward 
"We've made real progress, Ohio, but we've got more work to do. Our work is not yet done."—President Obama in Columbus 
President Obama: "We're all in this together. We rise or fall as one nation, as one people." 
President Obama on Jay Z and Bruce Springsteen: “Not only are they all on my iPod, but both of them tell an American story.” 
“Hello, Columbus! Hello, Ohio! Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?”—President Obama 
Happening now: President Obama speaks in Ohio about the choice in this election. RT so your friends can watch, too.  
Jay Z: "Ohio, could you make some noise for your President—Barack Obama!" #Forward 
Jay Z in Columbus: "Y'all ready for 4 more years?" #Forward 
"Are we ready to move forward, Ohio?" —Jay Z in Columbus 
Watch live: Jay-Z fires up the crowd before President Obama’s rally in Columbus, Ohio.  #Forward 
Make sure your friends show up to the polls tomorrow—pass on this link:  
"If you want to make your voice heard, you've got to show up." —President Obama:  
Help win tomorrow by calling voters in key states today:   
If you’re in Columbus, OH, come on down to Nationwide Arena now to see President Obama, Jay Z, & Bruce Springsteen this afternoon. #Forward 
Boss hug:  
President Obama speaking to a crowd of 18,000 in Madison: The middle class needs a champion in Washington.  
Forward, Wisconsin!  
Thanks to everyone who is knocking on doors and making calls—you inspire me every day. I won't let up if you won't. -bo 
Obama: “It is the dreams of our children that will be our saving grace. That is what will propel us forward.” 
President Obama: "The people who need a champion are the Americans whose letters I read late at night." 
President Obama: "I'm not going to turn Medicare into a voucher to pay for a millionaire's tax cut." 
Obama: “Change comes when we live up to this country’s legacy of innovation. I could not be prouder that I bet on American workers.” 
President Obama: "We're not just building cars again. We're building better cars." #Forward 
Obama: “I said we’d repeal ‘Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell,’ we ended it. I said we’d crack down on reckless practices on Wall Street, and we did.” 
President Obama: "I said that I'd end the war in Iraq, and I ended it. I said I'd pass health care reform, and I passed it." #Forward 
President Obama: "You know that I say what I mean and I mean what I say." #Forward 
Obama on Romney: "Changing the facts when they're inconvenient to your campaign—not change." 
President Obama: "Ruling out compromise by pledging to rubber-stamp the Tea Party's agenda in Congress—that's not change." 
Obama on Romney: "He’s tried as hard as he can to repackage the same old bad ideas and make them out to be new ideas.” 
President Obama on Gov. Romney: "We know what change looks like—and what he's selling ain't it." 
Obama: “We believe our country is better when people can count on Medicare and Social Security in their golden years.” #Forward 
President Obama: “As long as there’s a single American who wants a job but can’t find one, we’ve got more work to do.” #Forward 
“Today, our businesses have created nearly 5.5 million jobs. The American auto industry is back on top. Home values are on the rise.” 
Obama: "We rise and fall as one nation and one people." 
President Obama: "No matter how bad the storm is, we recover together. We're all in this together." #Forward 
President Obama in Wisconsin: “I cannot imagine not being fired up after listening to Bruce Springsteen.” 
Watch live: President Obama kicks off the last day of the campaign in Madison, Wisconsin.  
Thanks to President Obama, gay and lesbian servicemembers don't have to lie about who they are to serve their country:  
Share why you’ve got the President’s back in this election using the hashtag #Forward. 
Margaret, MD: “I am a female small business owner, and my business has grown tremendously since Obama took office.” 
“I know where he stands and I know he'll work to accomplish everything he started.”—George from Virginia on why he’s voting for Obama 
RaShar, MI: “I was born with sickle cell anemia. Obamacare helps people with pre-existing conditions (like me) get health care coverage.” 
Josh, a Navy vet in NC: “I’m voting for President Obama because the Post-9/11 G.I. Bill is enabling me to finish my bachelor’s degree.” 
People have a lot of reasons for voting Obama-Biden this year—stay tuned for a few. #Forward 
Help win this election by making sure your friends and family vote. RT this link so they know where to do it:  
It was up to you then, and it’s up to you now. Let’s do this:  
For this last day of the campaign, the President will travel to Wisconsin and Ohio before a final rally in Iowa:  
People started lining up before dawn for today's first rally in Madison, WI (we'll be tweeting from  
Tomorrow’s Election Day. Help determine where our country goes for the next 4 years—get out the vote now:  
Forward in Cincy:  
The choice on education:  
In Cincinnati, Ohio, President Obama lays out the stakes for the middle class in this election:  
Obama: “After all we've been through together, we can’t stop now. We've got to come together and bring more change to America.” #Forward2012 
President Obama: "You know where I stand, and you know what I believe. You know that I tell the truth." 
President Obama: "Gov. Romney's been having a tough time here in Ohio because everyone knows he was against saving the auto industry." 
“We believe in the strivers, the dreamers, the risk takers. We know they've always been the driving force behind our economic growth.” 
Obama: “This nation cannot succeed without a thriving middle class, and sturdy ladders for anyone hoping to get into the middle class.” 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio about the stark choice we face in this election.  
Four years ago today:  
Speaking in Florida, President Obama lays out the stakes in this election:  
President Obama refused to let the American auto industry die:  
“Our jobs don’t stop at getting out the truth. We need to get out the vote, too.” A final fact-check from  
This election could come down to just a handful of votes. Find out where to cast yours:   
President Obama: "No matter what happens, I’ll fight for you and your families every single day, as hard as I know how.” #Forward2012 
“You know I mean what I say and I say what I mean. I said I’d end the war in Iraq, and I did. I said I’d reform health care, and I did.” 
“Giving more power back to the biggest banks, that’s not change. Another $5 trillion in tax cuts for the wealthiest—that’s not change.” 
Obama on Romney: “In this campaign, he’s tried as hard as he can to repackage these old ideas that didn't work and offer them up as change.” 
Obama: "We don’t want politicians in Washington, most of whom are male, to make health care decisions that women can make for themselves." 
"Our economy grows best, the markets do best, when everybody has a chance to succeed. When everybody has a good education.”—President Obama 
President Obama: "You can join me in building a future that focuses on a strong and growing middle class." 
President Obama: "We think America’s stronger when everybody can count on affordable, quality health insurance." 
"Because of the sacrifice of our brave men and women in uniform, the war in Iraq is over. The war in Afghanistan is coming to a close." 
President Obama: "Today, our businesses have created nearly 5 and a half million jobs." #progress 
President Obama: "No matter how tough times are, we're all in this together. We rise and fall as one nation, as one people." 
"Hello, Florida! Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?"—President Obama 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s remarks on along for the latest. 
Happening now: President Obama speaks at a rally in Florida.  #Forward2012 
FACT: Romney has said it’s “fair” for him to pay a lower tax rate than a worker making $50,000, despite making nearly $14 million last year. 
FACT: Romney can't pay for his $5 trillion in tax cuts that favor the wealthy without raising middle-class taxes or exploding the deficit. 
FACT: President Obama’s plan extends tax cuts for 97% of America's small business owners. #progress 
FACT: President Obama has signed 18 tax cuts that are helping small businesses grow and create jobs. #progress 
FACT: Since taking office, President Obama has cut taxes for the typical American family by $3,600. #progress 
Before your friends vote, make sure they know the choice on taxes in this election:  
The crowd in Concord:  
"We know what change looks like. And what he's selling ain't it." —President Obama on Mitt Romney's failed policies:  
The President, speaking to a record crowd in New Hampshire this morning: We know that our ideas work and theirs don't.  
President Obama in Virginia last night: This election is "a choice between two very different visions for our future."  
If there's one thing we learned in 2008, it's that nothing is more powerful than millions of voices calling for change.  
Sunday, Monday, Election Day—that’s all the time we have left to win this thing. Sign up to help get out the vote now:  
President Obama in Virginia: “That's how democracy is supposed to be. It's up to you. You've got the power.” #Forward2012 
Watch live: President Clinton and President Obama in Bristow, Virginia.  
Here's what getting out the vote looks like (there's still time to get involved!):  
Your friends should see this before they vote:  
Haaretz: "Obama is good for Israel."  
"Change comes when we live up to this country’s legacy of innovation." —President Obama in Wisconsin  
Wisconsin for Obama:  
“I will do anything to get you to go out and vote on November 6th.” Will Ferrell’s not kidding:  
"I keep my word, and I want to keep fighting for you." —President Obama 
"You know where I stand. You know what I believe. You know that I mean what I say and I say what I mean." —President Obama 
"Changing the facts when they're inconvenient to your campaign—that's definitely not change." —President Obama 
"Ruling out compromise, pledging to rubber-stamp the Tea Party's agenda in Congress—that's not change." —President Obama 
"We know what change looks like. And what Governor Romney's offering ain't it." —President Obama in Wisconsin 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Wisconsin.  
President Obama in Mentor, Ohio today: "We rise or fall as one nation, as one people."  
The final push: It's on us.  
12 must-share facts about President Obama’s record:  
The President picked up the phone to thank a few of the volunteers who built this campaign:  
3 days left—no time to waste. Help get out the vote this weekend:  #Forward2012 
Goodbye, Rufus:  
You can help win this election right now. Pick up your phone and call voters in key states:  #Forward2012 
President Obama: “They’re betting on cynicism. Ohio, my bet is on you.”  #Forward2012 
This is the choice on choice:   
What’s your reason for voting Obama-Biden? Share your story:  #Forward2012 
Teresa from Virginia on why she’s voting for President Obama: “He has a real plan for rescuing the economy that passes the ‘math’ test.” 
Steven, FL: “I am voting for Barack Obama and Joe Biden because I can trust them to care for the middle class & restore the American dream.” 
Peter D. from California on why he's voting to re-elect the President: “Obama has been a man of his word.” 
“Obamacare opened the door to my career in healthcare IT training. He cares for the 100%.”—Shana, TX, on why she’s voting Obama-Biden 
"We are not finished yet. We've got more work to do." —President Obama in Ohio:  
How the Romney-Ryan campaign lost its own credibility in five easy steps:  
You need to see this video, and then your friends need to see this video:  
Colorado: Today's your last chance to vote early for President Obama. Get it done now:  
“The future will never have as many lobbyists as the status quo. But those children are our future, and that’s who we’re fighting for.” 
“The people who need a champion are the Americans whose letters I read every night. The men & women I meet on the campaign trail every day.” 
President Obama: “I’m a long ways away from giving up on this fight. I've got a lot of fight left in me." #Forward2012 
“As long as I’m President, we’re not going to turn Medicare into a voucher just to pay for another millionaire’s tax cut.” #Forward2012 
President Obama: “This is not a game. These are people’s jobs. These are people’s lives.” #MadeInAmerica 
Obama on Romney's misleading Jeep ads: “The car companies themselves have told Gov. Romney to knock it off.” 
Obama on the GOP: “They tried this ‘you’re on your own economics.' What did we get? Falling incomes, record deficits, & an economic crisis.” 
President Obama: “We believe in a democracy where everybody’s voice is heard, where you can’t just buy an election.” 
President Obama: "We're here because we understand this nation cannot succeed without a growing, thriving middle class." #Forward2012 
4 days left—watch President Obama outline his plan to strengthen the middle class live from Springfield, OH:  
Bill from Virginia shares how President Obama’s policies helped him start his small business:  #MadeInAmerica 
President Obama’s support for small businesses helped Steve’s wind manufacturing company hire more workers:  
FACT: Since January 2010, we’ve added 479,000 manufacturing jobs—the biggest gains in that sector since the mid-1990s. #MadeInAmerica 
FACT: Consumer confidence is at its highest level in 5 years, while foreclosures are at a 5-year low. #progress 
FACT: Under President Obama, our economy has added 5.4 million private-sector jobs over the last 32 months.  
President Obama's moving us forward, while Romney would take us back to the failed policies that crashed our economy:  
"We’ve made real progress, but we’re here today because we know we have more work to do.” —President Obama 
President Obama: "We've created 5.4 million new jobs." 
President Obama in Ohio: "This morning we learned companies hired more workers in October than any time in the last 8 months." #Forward2012 
4 days left to make sure President Obama gets 4 more years. Sign up to get out the vote this weekend:  #Forward2012 
Happening now: President Obama speaks in Colorado about what’s at stake in this election.  #Forward2012 
"We ought to keep on the track that we're on."—Colin Powell on why he's voting for President Obama:  #Forward2012 
The choice: A plan to grow the economy from the middle out—or a return to the failed policies that crashed it.  
President Obama: “The people who need a champion are the Americans whose letters I read late at night.”  
5 things you might not know about President Obama:  
If the President can make time to vote early, you should too. This is how it’s done:  
President Obama: "I’m not giving up on the fight, and I hope you’re not either. I still need you fired up." #WeDecide 
President Obama: “Their bet is on cynicism. But Nevada, my bet’s on you. My bet’s on the decency and good sense of the American people.” 
Obama: “Change comes when we live up to our legacy of innovation. I am proud that I bet on the American worker and American ingenuity.” 
President Obama: “I know what real change looks like because I fought for it." 
President Obama: “You know what I believe, you know where I stand. You know I’m willing to make tough decisions.” #WeDecide 
“We believe that quality health care and a dignified retirement aren't just achievable goals—they’re a measure of our values as a nation.” 
President Obama: “We can meet these challenges. This is America. We've got the world’s best workers and the best entrepreneurs.” #WeDecide 
Happening now: President Obama speaks in Nevada about the choice we face in this election.  #WeDecide 
"We've come too far to turn back now." —President Obama in Green Bay, Wisconsin:  
What’s your reason for voting Obama-Biden? Tweet your response, or tell your story here:  
“As a breast cancer survivor, I will never have to fear losing health care coverage.”—Lisa, NY 
Jordan, VA: “President Obama is on track to fix our education system and put the United States back on top ... where it should be.” 
“Living in Toledo, I know what would have happened if the President hadn't stepped in to save the auto industry. Thank you.”—Twila, OH 
Thomas, NY: “I'm voting for Barack Obama because I need to believe that I live in a country where compassion trumps self-interest.” 
People around the country are excited to vote for President Obama—here are just a few reasons why. 
"When I step into the voting booth, I think about the world I want to leave my 2 daughters." Bloomberg endorses Obama:  
GOP former Sec. of State & retired four-star general Colin Powell on why he supports President Obama in this election:  
This weekend is one of the last chances to get out the vote—pick up a shift for the President:  
"That's what change is." Watch President Obama lay out exactly what we're fighting for in this election:  #Forward2012 
“Together, we will renew those bonds and reaffirm that spirit that makes the United States of America the greatest nation on Earth.” 
Obama: “We have come too far to turn back now. We have come too far to let our hearts grow faint. Now is the time to keep pushing forward.” 
“The people who need a champion are the Americans whose letters I read late at night—the men and women I meet on the campaign trail.” 
President Obama: “The folks at the very top in this country don’t need another champion in Washington." 
President Obama: "The future will never have as many lobbyists as the past." #Forward2012 
“Despite all the resistance, despite all the setbacks, I've never lost sight of the vision we shared—that you would have a voice.” 
President Obama: “I ran because the voices of the American people—your voices—had been shut out of our democracy for far too long.” 
“We need a vision that says we don’t just look out for ourselves—we look out for one another other; we look out for future generations.” 
“We don’t need a partisan agenda—we need a common-sense agenda that says when we educate a poor child, we’ll all be better off.” 
“We don’t need a big government agenda or a small government agenda—we need a middle-class agenda that rewards hard work & responsibility.” 
President Obama: “I will never allow politicians in Washington to control health care choices that women should be making for themselves.” 
Obama: “As long as I’m President, I will never turn Medicare into a voucher just to pay for another millionaire’s tax cut.” 
“No one who fights for this country should have to fight for a job, or a roof over their head, or the care they need when they come home.” 
Obama: “It’s time to use the savings from ending the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan to start paying down our debt and rebuilding America.” 
President Obama: "Change is finally turning the page on a decade of war to do some nation-building here at home." 
“Don’t tell me that students who can’t afford college should just borrow money from their parents.” 
“Don’t tell me that hiring more teachers won’t help this economy grow, or help young people compete.” 
President Obama: “You know that I’ll fight for you and your families every single day, as hard as I know how.” 
President Obama: "I know what change looks like because I fought for it. You have too." 
President Obama: “Giving more power back to the biggest banks isn't change. Leaving millions without health insurance isn't change.” 
Obama: “Gov. Romney has been using all his talents as a salesman to dress up these very same policies that failed our country so badly.” 
Obama on Romney: "We know what change looks like, and what the Governor’s offering sure isn't it." 
“We believe that quality health care and a dignified retirement aren't just achievable goals—they’re a measure of our values as a nation.” 
President Obama: “We grow faster when our tax code rewards hard work and companies that create jobs here in America.” 
“We believe that if this country invests in the skills and ideas of its people, good jobs and businesses will follow.” 
“That’s why I’m running for a second term as President—because we have more work to do.”—President Obama 
"Our fight goes on because we know this nation cannot succeed without a growing, thriving middle class."—President Obama 
President Obama: “We’ve made real progress these past four years. But Wisconsin, we all know our work’s not yet done.” 
President Obama: "Today, our businesses have created over 5 million new jobs. The American auto industry is back on top." 
President Obama: "In 2008, we were in the middle of two wars and the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression." 
President Obama: “We’ve been inspired these past few days—because when disaster strikes, we see America at its best.” 
President Obama in Green Bay, WI: “I want to thank you for giving such a warm welcome to a Bears fan.” 
Happening now: President Obama speaks in Green Bay, Wisconsin.  
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Green Bay, Wisconsin.  
5 days until this election’s over. Help win this thing—get out the vote this weekend:  #Forward2012 
Make sure your friends and family know the choice on taxes in this election:   
"The President will win re-election if we do what we need to do."—@Messina2012 on the state of the race:  
Worth a RT: Obama is cutting our oil imports—Romney would make us more dependent on foreign oil.   
39 reasons to re-elect President Obama:  #Forward2012 
When you vote, "Please remember how quickly—but for the grace of God, luck, or genetics—this story could be yours."  
This election could come down to just a few thousand votes. Sign up today to help get out the vote:  #GOTV 
We’re less than a week away from Election Day. Vote early if you can—here’s a list of state-by-state deadlines:  
We’re less than a week away from Election Day. Vote early if you can—here’s a list of state-by-state deadlines:  
Thanks to Obamacare, insurance companies will no longer be able to charge women more than men for the same plan.  
Share why you’re voting for President Obama:  #Forward2012 
“I voted early for President Obama because I believe he will protect Social Security, Medicare, and Medicaid for the future.”—Peter A., CO 
“President Obama and the Democratic Party have an agenda that is progressive and pro-growth.”—Raymond, CT 
Shae, FL: “Why am I voting for President Obama? Simple. I believe in him, and that's coming from an ARMY VET!” 
Sam F., VA: “Because President Obama’s health care reform directly impacted my Type I diabetic brother's health.” 
We asked folks why they’re voting for President Obama—here are some of their responses. #Forward2012 
Make sure your friends know how Obamacare is making health insurance more affordable:   
Just 6 days left until Election Day. Help get out the vote in your community:  #Forward2012 
Election Day is just a week away. If you've already cast your ballot, let your friends know:   
“Every single day I set foot in the Oval Office, you know I’m thinking about you. I’m fighting for your families.”  
Help Michelle get out the vote for the President—make calls to voters in key states:   
Sign up now to help get out the vote before Election Day.   
Colorado: Voting by mail? Put a stamp on that ballot and send it in today:  
"I’ve raised my kids teaching them that it’s not enough to go vote on Election Day—you have to volunteer, too." —Loreen  
Our thoughts and prayers go out to everyone affected by the storm. Support Red Cross relief efforts here:  -bo 
Worth sharing with the women in your life:   
This election could come down to just a few thousand votes. Pick up a shift and head to a phone bank near you:  
Meet Walter: He’s 91, and he’s making calls for President Obama using the online call tool.  
Chrysler has announced third-quarter profits up 80% from the same period last year:  #MadeInAmerica 
8 states in 48 hours: An inside look at President Obama’s two-day tour around the country last week.  #AmericaForward 
Why are you voting for President Obama? Share your story:   
This election’s too important to sit out. Find out when you can vote in your state:   
President Obama: “For those of you who still need additional info about how to respond, you can go to  
President Obama on Hurricane Sandy: "The great thing about America is that during tough times like this, we pull together." 
Watch live: President Obama speaks about Hurricane Sandy.  
Support storm relief efforts where they're needed most by contributing to the American Red Cross:  
If you live in Hurricane Sandy's path, get the information you need on how to prepare here:  
Only 8 days until Election Day. Time to step up and call voters in key states:  
Saying hi in New Hampshire:  
Help President Obama win this in the final stretch: Make calls to voters in key states today.   
.@IAmRashidaJones and talk through how you can help this campaign win using the #Obama2012 app:  
Spike had reservations about Obamacare—until it helped her get health insurance when she needed it most:  #ACA 
If you're on the Eastern seaboard, please make sure to follow the instructions of your state and local officials today. Stay safe. -bo 
We've got to move forward, not back:  
States along the East Coast are preparing for Hurricane Sandy—support American Red Cross disaster relief efforts here:  
The Portsmouth Herald (NH): “We trust President Obama to fight for the middle class.”  
The Detroit Free Press highlights President Obama’s “stunning record of accomplishment” and endorses his re-election:  
Toledo Blade: "Ohioans will best serve their own interests, and those of the country, by re-electing President Obama."  
Think fast:  #Forward2012 
What we do in the next 9 days will shape the next 4 years and beyond. Leave it all out on the field—volunteer today:  
Grabbing a pint with the President:  
“We've come too far and sacrificed too much to go back to an era of top-down, on-your-own economics.”  #Forward2012 
Welcoming the President to New Hampshire:  
Can we list all the taxes and fees Gov. Romney raised on the Massachusetts middle class in 30 seconds?  
If this is what the President can do in 4 years, imagine what he can do in twice the time:  
The President is putting higher education within reach for millions more Americans by doubling funding for Pell Grants.  
Obama: “We imagine a better America, and then we work hard to make it happen. That’s who we are. That’s why I’m asking for your vote.” 
President Obama in NH: “It’s your choice. It’s up to the young people who are here to choose a future that’s worthy of all of your dreams.” 
“We don’t need a whole bunch of politicians in Washington, most of whom are male, making health care decisions for women.”—President Obama 
Obama in NH: “The country has come too far to turn back now. We’ve got to continue with the policies that are getting us out of this mess.” 
On Romney as governor of MA: “When he left office, there were only 3 states in the country that had created fewer jobs than Massachusetts.” 
President Obama: “We know that our country is stronger when we can count on affordable health insurance and Medicare and Social Security.” 
“10 days, New Hampshire. 10 days and you’ll be stepping into a voting booth and making a defining choice about the future of our country.” 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in New Hampshire about the choice in this election.  
When you cast your vote, remember: Romney would bring back the failed top-down policies that crashed our economy.  
Make sure your friends get the facts on how President Obama is fighting for women:   
10 days left to make sure we keep moving forward. Get out and volunteer this weekend:  
Pitch in $5 now and you’ll be automatically entered for the chance to join the President for Election Night in Chicago:  
Maya Angelou: “Every voice is equally powerful. Don't underestimate your vote. Voting is the great equalizer.”  
Eric has a story that you need to hear:  
President Obama’s second-term agenda will grow our economy from the middle out, not the top down:  #Forward2012 
FACT: The Washington Post fact-checker called Romney’s jobs claim a “bait-and-switch,” because the math “doesn’t add up.” 
FACT: Romney can't pay for his $5 trillion in tax cuts that favor the wealthy without raising middle-class taxes or exploding the deficit. 
Romney's promising “big change” today, but his plan would bring back the same failed policies that crashed our economy:  
If you've already voted (like President Obama did yesterday), let everyone know it:   
If you missed the President's check-ins from the road on the #AmericaForward tour, you can watch them all here:  
President Obama just spent 48 hours in 8 states sharing his plans to keep us moving forward. Help him spread the word:  
Another great night in O-H-I-O:  
The Road to November 6th—two weeks until Election Day edition:  
The secret's out: You can join the President in Chicago on Election Night (and have a front row ticket to history).  
11 days left to win this thing. Help get out the vote for President Obama this weekend:  #Forward2012 
Welcome home, Mr. President: Wheels down, White House.  
President Obama’s sign-off after 8 states in 48 hours: “Don’t quit. Let’s make sure we run through the tape.”  
I spy ... the President of the United States of America.  
President Obama in Cleveland: “We’ve come too far to turn back now.”  
President Obama: "I'm honored to be the first sitting president who has ever early voted."  
Thank you, OH, IL, VA, FL, CA, NV, CO, and IA. These last 48 hours have me feeling ready to go for the next 11 days. Are you with me? -bo 
If you missed Air Force One rolling up to President Obama's final tour stop in Cleveland, it was pretty epic:  
“If you give me your vote, I promise you will continue to have a president who hears your voices. A president who fights for your families.” 
President Obama: "Ohio, I believe in you, and I need you to keep believing in me." #AmericaForward 
"Our destiny is not written for us, it's written by us. And we can write that next chapter together." —President Obama 
"We don't look backwards, we look forward." —President Obama 
"You can make it here in America if you try. That's who we are. That's who we're fighting for." #AmericaForward 
"We all have a place in America if you're willing to work hard, if you're willing to stand up."—President Obama 
President Obama: "We can choose the policies that give us the prospect of broad-based prosperity." #AmericaForward 
President Obama: "It's up to the young people who are here to choose the future that you want." #AmericaForward 
President Obama: "It's now up to you to choose the path that we take." #AmericaForward 
Obama: “I wasn't going to let Detroit go bankrupt. Or Toledo go bankrupt. Or Lordstown go bankrupt. I bet on American workers.” 
“If Romney had been president when the American auto industry was on the verge of collapse, we might not have an American auto industry.” 
"Whatever the symptoms are, don't worry—Obamacare covers pre-existing conditions."—President Obama on Romnesia 
"In the closing moments of the election, Gov. Romney's hoping you too will come down with a severe case of Romnesia." —President Obama 
Obama on Romney: “He’s hoping that you come down with a case of what we call…” Crowd: “Romnesia!” 
President Obama: “I've come to Ohio today to ask you for your vote. I need your vote, and I need your help to move this country forward.” 
"Even though I've been going for 38 hours straight ... I've still got a spring in my step because our cause is right." #AmericaForward 
Obama: "We just made a quick stop in Chicago so I could vote." #GottaVote 
President Obama: "We've been from the east coast to the west coast, and now we're going back east again." #AmericaForward 
President Obama: “Hello, Ohio! Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?” #AmericaForward 
Watch President Obama speak live from Cleveland, the last stop on the #AmericaForward tour:  
Election-year flair on display in Cleveland:  
From President Obama, three things:  
Cleveland: Crowd, tarmac, setting sun.  
#AmericaForward high-five count: 3.  
Rosemary's fired up to see the President in Cleveland, OH:  
The crowd gathers at President Obama's next and final stop: Cleveland, Ohio.  
Smile if you've voted early. If you haven’t, find out when you can vote in your state:   
“Hey, this is Barack!” President Obama makes calls with volunteers in Chicago:  
Thank you for everything you're doing to make this campaign run. Let's keep going:  
Since the beginning of this campaign in April 2011, a total of 4,200,000 people have pitched in to own a piece of it. 
Every five bucks helped: More than 98% of contributions were $250 or less, with an average contribution of $46.92. 
Of the 1.2 million people who donated, 207,264 people hadn't supported this campaign before. 
In the first 17 days of October, 1,251,291 people came together to raise $90,500,000 for the campaign and combined committees. 
We're filing our last pre-election FEC report tomorrow, and here's a preview. 
President Obama just became the first sitting president to vote early:   
This afternoon, President Obama will become the first sitting president to vote early. Find out if you can join him:  
President Obama: “Rape is rape. It is a crime.”  
FACT: Romney would take away a woman’s right to choose and even said he’d be “delighted” to sign a bill banning all abortions. 
FACT: Rep. Steve King, who Romney called a “partner in Washington,” said he’s never heard of anyone getting pregnant from statutory rape. 
FACT: Romney’s running mate Paul Ryan referred to rape as a “method of conception” and co-sponsored a bill to redefine rape with Todd Akin. 
Romney’s endorsement of Mourdock is just the latest example of the severely conservative candidates he supports. 
Many GOP leaders are cutting ties with Richard Mourdock for his outrageous rape comments—but Romney still supports him:  
Watch President Obama fire up the crowd in Richmond, VA:  #AmericaForward 
Find out if you can vote early in your state:  
The President checks in from Richmond, on his way to Chicago to vote early:  
What a great view, Virginia! My voice might be getting hoarse, but the energy out here is going strong. -bo 
Forward, Virginia:  
How big was the crowd in Richmond? This big:  #AmericaForward 
“Our destiny is not written for us, it’s written by us. And we’re going to write the next chapter together.”  
Obama: “It’s up to the young people out there to decide what kind of future you want for yourselves.” #AmericaForward 
Obama: “I don’t think any male politician should be making health care decisions for women.” 
President Obama: “I believe women are capable and should make their own health care decisions for themselves.” 
President Obama: “Finally, I’ll use the savings from ending the wars in Afghanistan and Iraq to do some nation-building here at home.” 
President Obama: “Number 4: My plan will cut the deficit by $4 trillion in 10 years.” #AmericaForward 
President Obama: “Number 3: I want to make it a national mission to educate our young people, to train our workers.” 
Obama: “Number 2: I want to cut our oil imports in half by 2020 so we control more of our own energy.” 
President Obama: “The first thing in my plan: I want to end tax breaks for companies that ship jobs overseas.” 
“I've got a plan that will actually create jobs, not just talk about creating jobs. A plan that will actually create middle-class security.” 
President Obama: “Trust matters. You want to know that whoever’s in the Oval Office is going to fight for you.” 
President Obama: "I've come to ask for your help in keeping America moving forward." 
On voting early today: “I can’t tell you who I’m voting for because it’s a secret ballot. The good news is, Michelle said she voted for me.” 
President Obama in VA: “My voice sounds just a little hoarse. We are right in the middle of our 8-state, fly-around campaign extravaganza.” 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Virginia about the stark choice we face in this election.  #AmericaForward 
Crowds literally as far as the eye can see, waiting for President Obama in Richmond, VA:  
Four more for number 44:  
President Obama last night on Richard Mourdock: “I don’t know how these guys come up with these ideas. Rape is rape.”  
The President talks to about the debates, voting early, and his take on the GOP's policies for women:  
Five states down—now off to Virginia. Get the latest from the ground here:   
So long, Florida:  
President Obama explained his plans for a second term in Tampa this morning. Take a look:   
12 days left in the President’s final campaign. Make sure each one counts—get out and volunteer to help win this thing:  
Colin Powell endorsed President Obama this morning, citing his leadership on jobs, foreign policy, and health care:  
President Obama welcomes you to day two of his 8-state, 48-hour "campaign extravaganza":  
Babies for Obama:  
Obama: "Women should be making their own health care decisions. That’s why the health care law we passed put those choices in your hands." 
"I don’t think any politician in Washington, most of whom are male, should be making health care decisions for women."  
President Obama: “Trust matters, and Florida, you know me. You know I say what I mean, and I mean what I say.” #AmericaForward 
The sun's fully up as the President takes the stage in Tampa.  
A bit of morning shootaround at the firehouse before the day's first event in Tampa:  
"Thank you for everything you guys do."  
Palm trees, Tampa crowd await President Obama.  
After last night's Vegas event, the President took a minute to share his thoughts on day one of his 48-hour trip:  
Beat the sun to Tampa. Looking forward to day two of our marathon trip. -bo 
This morning: Tampa. President Obama just stopped by a local firehouse, and brought breakfast.  
Four states down, four states to go in the President's 48-hour #AmericaForward tour: today he hits FL, VA, IL, and OH.  
Leaving Las Vegas—on to Tampa (and day two of this 8-state trip).  
The President winds up sticking around, gives amazing speech about hard work. Casino staff start spontaneous chant of "four more years." 
Amazing/surreal moment in Vegas: POTUS stops to talk to casino workers. Means to just shake a few hands, but word gets out... 
Casino staffers in Las Vegas greeting the President:  
President Obama on pulling an all-nighter on this trip: If you're not going to sleep, "you might as well be in Vegas." #AmericaForward 
In Las Vegas, last stop of the day: vote early.   
Good night, L.A.  
President Obama with & co:  
Just two guys hanging out backstage:  
President Obama just finished taping an appearance on sure to tune in tonight! 
President Obama’s voting early tomorrow. Find out if you can, too:  #GottaVote 
A note from the President, 12 hours into the #AmericaForward tour:  
Chasing the sun to L.A.  
FACT: Romney is Richard Mourdock’s most prominent supporter, and the star of his latest campaign ad:  
Romney refuses to withdraw support for Richard Mourdock—who claims pregnancies from rape are "something God intended."  
Two states down; six to go. Next stop: L.A. to tape the Tonight Show with Jay Leno.  
Two states down; six to go. Next stop: L.A. to tape the Tonight Show with Jay Leno.  
Watch the speech that got Coloradans fired up for President Obama:  #AmericaForward 
"I voted early in person today because he's the President I want for four more years & for my daughter." —Fred in CO  
Tiffany from Colorado: “Everybody needs go out and vote for President Obama today.”  
Denver, that was really something—and your "four more years" chant was one of the best I've heard. -bo 
Grey skies but all smiles:  
#AmericaForward high-five count: two.  
An #AmericaForward tour update, straight from the source:  
16,000 strong in Denver:  
(Adorable) Coloradans for Obama:  
Good thing #Obamacare covers pre-existing conditions:  
“If you give me your vote, Colorado, you’ll have a President who hears your voice—who fights for your families.” #AmericaForward 
The turnout in Denver:  
"No matter who you are, no matter what you look like, no matter where you come from, here in America, you can make it if you try." 
Obama: “It’s up to the not-so-young people—including me—to choose what we leave behind for future generations.” #AmericaForward 
Obama: "I’ll never turn Medicare into a voucher. No American should spend their golden years at the mercy of insurance companies." 
President Obama: “My plan will actually cut the deficit, unlike Gov. Romney’s.” #AmericaForward 
“I want to reward small businesses and manufacturers that are creating jobs right here in the United States.” #AmericaForward 
President Obama: “Unlike Mitt Romney, I’m actually proud to talk about my plan. Because the numbers add up.” #AmericaForward 
Obama: “Trust matters. One thing I think you've seen over the past 4 years is that I mean what I say. I do what I say I’m going to do.” 
President Obama: “He’s hoping you won’t remember that he wants to give millionaires and billionaires a $250,000 tax cut." #Romnesia 
On Romney: "He's hoping you don't remember that his economic plan is more likely to create jobs in China than here in the United States." 
“I can’t tell you who I’m voting for—it’s a secret ballot. But Michelle said she voted for me.”—President Obama 
President Obama: "Hello Colorado! Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?" #AmericaForward 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Colorado at the second stop on his 48-hour tour.  #AmericaForward 
Wheels down Denver.  
Excellent signage spotted in Denver, CO:  
Denver, representing:  
Nick, age 9, saw the President the last time he was in Denver. He made this sign all by himself.  
Already lining up in the Mile-High City to see President Obama:  
Bye, Iowa. Next stop: Denver.  
"Love you guys!"  
Everybody say cheese:  
The folks I just met over pizza in Iowa are exactly why I love coming to this state. Thanks for always making me feel at home. -bo 
The President talks ground game with neighborhood team leaders in Davenport, Iowa:  
Walking out to greet the crowd in Iowa—from the President's point of view:  
America Forward tour high-five count: 1 (so far).  
Obama: "If you give me your vote … you will have a President who hears your voices, who fights for your families."  
Making friends in Iowa.  
A look back at the crowd in Davenport:  
The crowd in Davenport: Four more years.  #Forward2012 
President Obama: "My math actually adds up. Check it out at  
"I've got a plan that will actually create jobs, that will actually reduce the deficit, that will actually increase middle-class security." 
A word backstage from President Obama to kick off the America Forward tour:  
President Obama: "We've come too far to turn back now. We can’t afford to go back to the same policies that got us into this mess." 
President Obama: "The unemployment rate has fallen to its lowest level since I took office. Home values & home sales are rising." #progress 
"I bet on American workers and American ingenuity, and we saved a dying auto industry that's back on top of the world."—President Obama 
President Obama: "I promised to end taxpayer-funded Wall Street bailouts for good—and we did." #PromiseKept 
President Obama: "I promised to cut taxes for middle-class families and small businesses—and we have." #PromiseKept 
The crowd at the President's first stop in Davenport, Iowa:  
President Obama: "I told you we’d end the war in Iraq. We did. I said we’d end the war in Afghanistan. We are." #PromiseKept 
"I haven’t finished all the work we set out to do in 2008 just yet, but I have fought for you every single day that I've held this office." 
"This is where it all began 4 years ago. On your front porches, in your backyards: This is where the movement for change began." 
Homemade t-shirts and extra-big smiles for President Obama in Iowa:  
President Obama in Iowa: "It's good to be back. Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?" 
We'll be live-tweeting the President's remarks on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Iowa about what's at stake in this election.  
President Obama is setting off this morning on an 8-state, 48-hour trip. Follow along:   
13 days ‘til Election Day, but people in many states are already voting. Find out when voting starts in your state:  
Photo of the day:  
“I’m gonna need you fired up. I’m gonna need you ready to go.” The President, First Lady & VP on the road to Nov. 6th:  
Hello, Florida:  
“I bet on American workers. I bet on American manufacturing.” President Obama on the choice we face in this election:  
Make sure your friends see the President’s second-term plans to keep us moving forward:   
FACT: Obama would use half the savings from ending the war in Afghanistan to pay down the debt, and invest the rest in rebuilding America. 
FACT: Obama’s plan to reduce the deficit by more than $4 trillion asks the wealthy to pay a little more and cuts spending we don’t need. 
FACT: The President’s plan will help recruit 100,000 math and science teachers and train 2 million Americans at our community colleges. 
FACT: The President’s all-of-the-above energy strategy will help cut our oil imports in half & double the fuel efficiency of cars & trucks. 
FACT: President Obama’s plan will help create 1 million new manufacturing jobs and double our exports. #MadeInAmerica 
President Obama has a concrete second-term plan to create jobs and strengthen the middle class:  
President Obama: "I believe in you, and I need you to keep believing in me."  #GottaVote 
Obama on Romney's failure to mention veterans last night: "They deserve better from somebody who wants to be commander in chief." 
“We can’t go back to what got us into this mess. We need to move forward with what’s getting us out of this mess.”—President Obama 
President Obama: “The people of Ohio don’t forget. If Mitt Romney had been president … we might not have an American auto industry.” 
President Obama: “Last night, Gov. Romney looked you right in the eye and tried to pretend that he never said ‘let Detroit go bankrupt.’” 
President Obama: "Joe Biden is literally a man who is in love with a teacher." 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio about the stark choice we face in this election.  
Delray, Florida comes out to meet President Obama:  
Watch the President explain his detailed plan to move us forward: “And by the way, the math in my plan adds up.”  
"There's no quit in America." President Obama on his plans for a second term:  #Forward2012 
Obama: "I’m asking for your vote. I’m asking you to help me finish the job."  #GottaVote 
Obama: "You can declare you want America to remain a country where no matter who you are or what you look like, you can make it if you try." 
"You can choose the top-down policies that got us into this mess—or you can choose the policies that are getting us out of this mess." 
President Obama: "Finally, my plan will use the savings from ending the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan to put our people back to work." 
"Fourth, my plan will cut the deficit by $4 trillion over the next 10 years in a balanced way, by cutting spending that we don’t need." 
Obama: "Third, my plan will make it a national mission to educate our kids and train our workers better than anyone else in the world." 
President Obama: "Second, my plan will cut our oil imports in half by 2020, so that we control more of our own energy in America." 
Obama: "First, my plan builds on our manufacturing growth by ending the tax breaks for companies that ship jobs overseas." #MadeInAmerica 
President Obama: "My plan actually will move America forward. And by the way, the math in my plan adds up." 
Obama on Romney: "His foreign policy is from the 1980s, his social policy is from the 1950s, and his economic policies are from the 1920s." 
"He’s doing everything he can to hide his real positions and win this election by telling us everything he thinks is wrong with America." 
Obama: "We joke about #Romnesia. But this is about trust. And there’s no more serious issue in a presidential campaign than trust." 
"If you say you love Medicare, but your plan turns it into a voucher that ends the guaranteed benefit of Medicare—you've got #Romnesia." 
"If you say that you love American cars during a debate—but you wrote an article titled 'Let Detroit Go Bankrupt'—you might have #Romnesia." 
President Obama: "We had a severe outbreak last night—it was at least stage 3 #Romnesia." 
President Obama: "We've come up with a name for this condition. It’s called #Romnesia." 
“Last night, he said he always supported taking out bin Laden. But in ’08, he said it wasn’t worth ‘moving heaven & earth’ to catch 1 man.” 
President Obama: “Last night, he claimed to support my plan to end the war in Afghanistan. But he has opposed a timeline.” 
President Obama: “We’re ending the war in Afghanistan because after a decade of war, it’s time to do some nation-building here at home.” 
“The greatest responsibility I have as President is to keep the American people safe. That’s why I ended the war in Iraq.”—President Obama 
President Obama: “Go to  I need you to vote, because you’ve got a very big choice to make.” 
“Two weeks from today, Americans in all 50 states will step into a voting booth. But here in Florida, you get to start voting on Saturday.” 
President Obama: "I am fired up right now! It is good to be in Florida." 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Florida about his plans to keep us moving forward.  
A round-up of what people are saying about President Obama's clear win in last night's foreign policy debate:  
The New York Times on last night’s debate: Romney “had little coherent to say and often sounded completely lost.”  
CNN's John King: "There's no question" the President won the debate. "He's the commander in chief."  
14 days from now, this election will be over. Get out and volunteer to help make sure the President wins this thing:  
If you're #ProudOfObama tonight, help make sure this campaign has the resources it needs to win:  
If you’re #ProudOfObama and how he has fought for us over the past four years, stand with him for four more:  
Jim Messina: "Tonight America saw its commander in chief and someone who’s not ready to be commander in chief." #ProudOfObama 
To quote Bob Schieffer's mom: "Go vote." Commit to support President Obama here:  
President Obama: "I will work every single day to make sure that America continues to be the greatest nation on earth." 
Obama: "I want to make sure we've got the best education system in the world, and we’re retaining our workers for the jobs of tomorrow." 
"We've made real progress digging our way out of policies that gave us two wars & the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression." 
President Obama: "I’ve put forward a plan to make sure that we’re bringing manufacturing jobs back to our shores." 
"Governor, the people in Detroit don’t forget."—President Obama #StrongerWithObama 
Romney now: "I like American cars." Romney in 2008: "Let Detroit go bankrupt." 
The Romney-Ryan jobs plan could create 73,000 jobs—in China:  #RomneyWrong 
President Obama won tonight’s debate because his leadership has made us stronger, safer & more secure. #ProudOfObama  
President Obama: "My attitude coming into office was that we are going to insist that China plays by the same rules as everybody else." 
President Obama: "We've created partnerships throughout the region to deal with extremism—in Somalia, in Pakistan, in Yemen." 
President Obama: "After a decade of war, it’s time to do some nation building here at home." #StrongerWithObama 
On the Afghan transition: "There’s no reason why Americans should die when Afghans are perfectly capable of defending their own country." 
President Obama: "I look at what we need to get done to keep the American people safe and to move our interests forward." #StrongerWithObama 
Obama to Romney: "I said if I had bin Laden in our view, I would take a shot. You said we shouldn't move heaven and earth to get one man." 
Obama: "Governor, the problem is that on a whole range of issues, the Middle East, Afghanistan, Iraq... you've been all over the map." 
President Obama: "Iran is at its weakest point economically, strategically, militarily than in many years." #StrongerWithObama 
"When I came into office the world was divided. Iran was resurgent."—President Obama 
"The strength that we have shown in Iran is shown by the fact that we have been able to mobilize the world."—President Obama 
President Obama on Iran: "We have put in the toughest, most crippling sanctions ever." #StrongerWithObama 
"We’re not going to allow Iran to perpetually engage in negotiations that lead nowhere."—President Obama 
Video: Defense Minister Ehud Barak—Obama “strong supporter” of Israel:  #StrongerWithObama 
The clear choice on protecting Israel. #StrongerWithObama  
President Obama: "When I sent young men and women into harm’s way, I always understand that that is the last resort, not the first resort." 
"The disagreement I have with Gov. Romney is that... he has often talked as if we should take premature military action."—President Obama 
President Obama: "We cannot afford to have a nuclear arms race in the most volatile region of the world." #StrongerWithObama 
President Obama: "A nuclear Iran is a threat to our national security and it’s a threat to Israel’s national security." #StrongerWithObama 
"I will stand with Israel if they are attacked."—President Obama 
President Obama: "As long as I'm President of the United States, Iran will not get a nuclear weapon." #StrongerWithObama 
President Obama: "I think Governor Romney hasn't spent enough time looking at how our military works." #StrongerWithObama 
Obama: "Gov. Romney has called for $5 trillion of tax cuts that he says he's going to pay for by closing deductions. The math doesn’t work." 
POTUS: "Taking us back to the strategies that got us into this mess is not the way we are going to maintain leadership in the 21st century." 
FACT: By the time Gov. Romney left office, more businesses were going out of business in Massachusetts than being created. 
How small businesses fared in Massachusetts under Governor Romney:  #RomneyWrong 
President Obama to Romney: "When you were in Massachusetts, small business development ranked about 48th out of 50." 
President Obama: "We’ve got to make sure we reduce our deficit. Unfortunately Governor Romney’s plan doesn’t do it." #StrongerWithObama 
"What we also have been able to do is position ourselves so we can start rebuilding America, and that’s what my plan does."—President Obama 
POTUS: "Because we ended the war in Iraq, we were able to refocus our attention on... beginning a transition process in Afghanistan." 
"The world needs a strong America—and it is stronger now than when I came into office." #StrongerWithObama 
"These countries can’t develop if young women are not given the kind of education that they need."—President Obama 
Romney said bringing our troops home from Iraq was "tragic":  #RomneyWrong 
President Obama on Romney: "Just a few weeks ago, you said you think we should have more troops in Iraq right now." #RomneyWrong 
Obama: "One thing I’ve learned as commander in chief: You’ve got to be clear, both to our allies & our enemies, about where you stand." 
President Obama on Romney: "When it comes to our foreign policy, you seem to want to import the foreign policies of the 1980s." #RomneyWrong 
POTUS on Romney: "A few months ago, when you were asked what’s the biggest geopolitical threat facing America, you said Russia." 
President Obama on Romney: "Your strategy, previously, has been all over the map, and is not designed to keep Americans safe." 
"We are now able to transition out of Afghanistan in a responsible way, making sure that Afghans take responsible for their own security." 
President Obama: "We ended the war in Iraq, refocused ourselves on who actually attacked us on 9-11." #StrongerWithObama 
President Obama: "My first job as commander in chief is to keep the American people safe, and that's what we've done over the last 4 years." 
Watch live: In the final debate, President Obama lays out how he's making America stronger, safer & more secure.  
Follow tonight for live fact checks and analysis of the final presidential debate. 
#PromiseKept:  
Foreign policy heavyweights break down the stark contrast between the President & Gov. Romney on Iran:  #RomneyNotReady 
President Obama delivered on his promise to bring our troops home from Iraq—and fight for them when they come home:  
President Obama refocused our efforts on taking out al-Qaeda’s leadership, including Osama bin Laden:  
If you're on #TeamObama tonight, show it with just a couple clicks:  
Honoring our sacred trust:  
A look at how President Obama has honored our sacred trust with veterans:  
Out of many, we are one:  
President Obama ended the Iraq war. Romney would have left 30,000 troops there, and called bringing them home “tragic”:  
All bluster & no specific plans: Here are the foreign policy questions Romney needs to answer tonight.  #RomneyNotReady 
“He did what he said he was going to do.” Eli and Seth, twin brothers and veterans, on why they support the President:  
The choice for commander in chief: President Obama’s four years of strong leadership vs. Mitt Romney’s poor judgment.  
FACT: President Obama has made clear that he will not let Iran obtain a nuclear weapon, & imposed the toughest sanctions on Iran in history. 
FACT: President Obama has a plan to end the war in Afghanistan in 2014—Mitt Romney does not. 
FACT: President Obama refocused on the terrorists who attacked us—devastating al-Qaeda’s leadership and bringing Osama bin Laden to justice. 
FACT: President Obama kept his promise to end the war in Iraq. Romney called the decision to bring our troops home “tragic.” 
Mitt Romney is not ready to be commander in chief. Every time he’s had a chance to prove otherwise, he’s failed:  
President Obama’s leadership has made America stronger, safer, and more secure than we were four years ago:  
15 days to go in this election. RT if you’ll be cheering on the President in tonight’s final debate:  
Make an #Obama2012 purchase today and get it by Election Day. 30% off orders of $10 or more with the code LASTCALL:  
One conversation could make the difference in this election—make a few calls to voters today:   
Former Sec. of State Albright on Romney: “The last thing we need to do is to go around making belligerent statements.”  
“Having these tall, beautiful, strong-willed girls in my house never allows me to underestimate women.”  
Worth a RT: It’s time for Congress to join the President & help responsible homeowners refinance at low interest rates.  
“Without President Obama’s rescue of the auto industry, Ohio would have collapsed.”  #MadeInOhio 
A hero of war, George McGovern became a champion for peace. Michelle and I share our thoughts and prayers with his family. -bo 
Foreign policy leaders explain why President Obama is the only candidate qualified to lead America on the world stage:  
A few folks you might know on what the President’s support for the #LGBT community has meant to them:  
In 16 days, all the votes will be counted. Get out and volunteer to help win this thing in the final stretch:  
Cecile Richards on President Obama: "He has a strong record we can trust."  
Lilly Ledbetter knows that equal pay for equal work isn't just a women’s issue—it’s a family issue:  
In Fairfax, Virginia: A kid for Obama.  
Cecile Richards: "Mitt Romney would not only set us back four years—he'd set us back 40 years in America."  #Romnesia 
You've picked your candidate—now pick a state and color for your custom Obama tee. Use the code CUSTOM5 to get $5 off:  
"I stand by what I said, whatever it was."  #Romnesia 
See how Obamacare is making health care more affordable for millions of Americans:  #ACA 
.@GeorgeTakei, and more share why they support President Obama:  #LGBT 
Only 17 days left to get out the vote—which makes this the perfect weekend to volunteer:  
Virginian women for Obama:  
“I don’t know if he knows how many lives he’s changing by just saying that simple thing. He's saving lives.”  #LGBT 
Share this if you agree: We can’t afford a president with #Romnesia in the Oval Office.  
“Obama understands that the backbone of the American Dream is innovation and entrepreneurship.”  (via 
If you missed President Obama on the Daily Show yesterday, watch the interview and pass it on:   
In April, Romney’s campaign said “we’ll get back to you” on whether he supports an #EqualPay law. We're still waiting:  
FACT: Romney claims he wouldn’t take away a woman’s right to choose—but said he’d be “delighted” to sign a law banning abortion. #Romnesia 
FACT: Romney tried to hide his extreme stance on birth control, but he has supported laws that would let employers deny coverage. #Romnesia 
FACT: Romney claims he supports equal pay for equal work, but refuses to say whether he supports the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act. #Romnesia 
Forgetting what your own "severely conservative" positions are, and hoping voters will too: that's #Romnesia.  
Good news: Obamacare covers pre-existing conditions—like "#Romnesia."  
"You can let them turn back the clock 50 years for immigrants, and gays, and women–or you can stand up and say 'I want to move forward.'" 
“If you've come down with #Romnesia and can’t remember the promises you've made, don’t worry—Obamacare covers pre-existing conditions.” 
“If you say you’ll protect a woman’s right to choose but you say you’d be ‘delighted’ to sign a law outlawing it, you've got #Romnesia.” 
“If you say women should have access to contraceptive care but you support laws that would let employers deny it, you've got #Romnesia.” 
“If you say you’re for equal pay for equal work but you refuse to say whether you’d sign a bill that protects it, you might have #Romnesia.” 
President Obama: "He’s conveniently forgetting what his own positions are ... We need a name for this condition—let’s call it #Romnesia.” 
President Obama: Obamacare “has secured new access to preventive care like mammograms and cancer screenings with no co-pay, no deductible.” 
President Obama: “The only person who should make decisions about your health care is you.” 
“I don’t think your boss should decide what’s best for your health and safety. I don’t think your insurer should decide what care you get.” 
President Obama: “Gov. Romney says he’s going to get rid of funding for Planned Parenthood.” 
POTUS: “This isn’t just a women’s issue. No man should want his wife or his daughters paid less than a man for doing the same job.” 
President Obama: “In the 21st century, a woman deserves equal pay for doing equal work.” 
President Obama: “Even his own running mate said he’s 'kind of a throwback to the ‘50s'." 
President Obama on Romney’s stance on women: “Gov. Romney wants to take us back to policies more suited for the 1950s.” 
President Obama: “In 18 days, you’re going to step into a voting booth. And you’re going to have a very big choice to make.” 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Virginia about what’s at stake in this election.  
There's a lot at stake for women in this election. Cecile Richards lays out the choice we face:  #Women2012 
18 days to go, and it’s all hands on deck. Sign up to volunteer this weekend:  #Forward2012 
Fired up in Ohio:  
“I can’t in good conscience vote for Mitt Romney.” Margaret, a Republican, on why she’s voting for the President:  
Equal pay for equal work. A woman's right to make her own health decisions. This is what's at stake in this election:  
FACT: By repealing Obamacare, Romney would allow insurance companies to continue charging women more than men for the same coverage. 
FACT: Romney would defund Planned Parenthood, which millions of women rely on for health services like birth control and cancer screenings. 
FACT: Romney would appoint Supreme Court justices who would overturn Roe v. Wade. 
FACT: Mitt Romney said he’d “be delighted” to sign a bill outlawing abortion.  
A message from The Boss:  
“In 19 days, you can choose to turn back the clock 50 years for immigrants, gays, women—or you can stand up and say I want to move forward.” 
“In 19 days, you get to choose the top-down policies that got us into this mess—or the policies that are getting us out of this mess.” 
“Gov. Romney and his allies in Congress, they've banked on this idea that if you’re in America, you’re on your own. That’s not who we are.” 
President Obama: “I’m not going to cut things like education. I’m not going to cut research that helps our economy.” 
President Obama on women’s health: “The health care law that we passed put those choices in your hands, where they belong.” #ACA 
President Obama on Romney’s stance on contraception: “He supported legislation that would turn those decisions over to a woman’s employer.” 
President Obama: "Women should make their own health care decisions." 
“I don’t want my daughters, or your daughters, paid less than a man for doing the same job.”—President Obama 
President Obama: “I promised to cut taxes for small business owners—and we have, 18 times.” 
President Obama: "Today, America is less dependent on foreign oil than at any time in two decades." 
President Obama: “We've doubled the amount of renewable energy we generate from sources like wind and solar.” 
President Obama: “Unemployment has fallen from 10% to 7.8%. Home values are back on the rise. The stock market has nearly doubled.” 
“Just about everybody who’s looked at his tax plan says he can’t pay for it without blowing a hole in the deficit or raising taxes.” 
President Obama on Romney: "When folks started crunching the numbers, his jobs plan fell apart even faster than his tax plan." 
President Obama on Romney’s tax plan: “Instead of telling us how he’d pay for it, he said ‘I’ll let you know after the election.’” 
President Obama in New Hampshire: “We can’t grow this economy from the top down. This economy grows from the middle out." 
President Obama: "In 19 days, you're going to step into a voting booth, and you've got a big choice to make." 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in New Hampshire about what’s at stake in this election.  #Forward2012 
Forward, not back:   
Just 19 days left before Election Day. Volunteer this weekend to help win this thing:  #Forward2012 
Our new favorite t-shirt.  
President Obama is fighting to make sure that our daughters have the same opportunities as our sons:  
President Obama has a specific plan to create jobs and grow the economy. Mitt Romney doesn't:   
It’s Barack’s last FEC fundraising deadline before Election Day—pitch in $10 to help this campaign win:  
Do you have a favorite quote from this election? See if it made our top 47:  
Any donation, no matter how large or small, helps to bring this election home for President Obama:  
FACT: Romney didn't ask for resumes of qualified women to appoint in Massachusetts—a coalition of women’s groups gave them to him. 
FACT: Only 18 of the 65 judges Gov. Romney appointed in Massachusetts were women. #RomneysBinders 
FACT: The number of women serving in economic positions in Gov. Romney’s administration dropped from 46% to 31% during his term in office. 
FACT: Over his final two years as governor of Massachusetts, Romney only filled 25% of new appointments with women. #RomneysBinders 
FACT: Mitt Romney opposed the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act, which was the first bill President Obama signed into law.  
A look at why President Obama "scored a solid victory" last night:  #ObamaWinsDebate 
"We understand that America is not about what can be done for us. It’s about what can be done by us, together, as one nation & one people." 
"Gov. Romney said it’s fair that he pays a lower tax rate than a teacher who makes $50,000. He’s wrong."—President Obama 
On Romney's opposition to the Fair Pay Act: "Last night, his top adviser finally admitted, no, the Governor didn't support that bill." 
President Obama: "The Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act was the first bill I signed into law." #EqualPay 
President Obama: "Our businesses have now added more than 5 million new jobs over the past two and a half years." #progress 
President Obama: "When Gov. Romney said we should just let Detroit go bankrupt, we said thanks but no thanks." #MadeInAmerica 
"We repealed 'Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell,' so that no one is ever kicked out of the military because of who they are or who they love." 
POTUS: "We got back every dime used to rescue the banks, and we passed a law to end taxpayer-funded Wall Street bailouts for good." 
President Obama: "Four years ago, I told you we’d end the war in Iraq. We did." #PromiseKept 
President Obama on Mitt Romney: "His tax plan doesn’t add up. His jobs plan doesn’t create jobs." #SketchyDeal 
"You’ve heard of the New Deal. You’ve heard of the Fair Deal ... Mitt Romney’s trying to sell us the #SketchyDeal."—President Obama 
POTUS: "Last night, Gov. Romney took another stab at trying to sell us on his $5 trillion tax cut that favors the wealthy." #SketchyDeal 
President Obama on Romney's 1-point plan: "It’s the same philosophy that’s been squeezing middle-class families for more than a decade." 
President Obama: "We can’t grow this economy from the top down. We've got to grow this economy from the middle class out." 
President Obama: "Hello, Iowa! Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?" 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s remarks on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Iowa about the stark choice we face in this election.  #Forward2012 
Taegan Goddard: “He kept Romney on the defensive and came prepared … It was devastatingly effective.”  #ObamaWinsDebate 
Lois Romano: “The sense of the room is that Obama knocked it out of the park.”  #ObamaWinsDebate 
Mark Halperin: “I don’t think anyone can say Gov. Romney won this debate.”  #ObamaWinsDebate 
The reviews are in: President Obama won last night’s debate.  #ObamaWinsDebate 
"He was opposed to [the Lilly Ledbetter Act] at the time." —Romney campaign on their candidate's stance on equal pay.  
"I've got two daughters and I want to make sure that they have the same opportunities that anybody's sons have."  
President Obama knows that when women make less than men for the same work, it threatens the economic security of entire families. 
FACT: The first bill President Obama signed into law was the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act, which helps women fight for equal pay. 
Lilly Ledbetter: "Mitt Romney’s solution on leveling the playing field was to point out he once had a binder full of women applicants." 
Last night, the President talked about women as breadwinners. Romney talked about them as resumes in “binders.”  
Here's what people are saying about President Obama's debate win:  
Worth a watch and a RT: President Obama’s closing statement from last night’s debate.  
Mitt Romney still won’t say whether he’d stand up for equal pay, but he did tell us he has “binders full of women.”  
From Gov. Romney's #SketchyDeal to his one-point plan, see whether your favorite quotes made this election's top 47:  
If you're fired up, commit to vote for President Obama right now:  #TeamBarack 
OFA Campaign Manager Jim Messina on why "clearly won tonight's debate":  
If you're on #TeamBarack, pitch in $10 now to help win this thing:   
President Obama: "We are on pace to double our exports. That's creating tens of thousands of jobs all across the country." #TeamBarack 
#RomneyExposed RT That exchange on Libya was Romney's Gerald Ford moment. He was lost and not presidential at all. 
POTUS: "Romney was asked whether hiring more teachers was important to growing our economy. Gov. Romney said that doesn't grow our economy." 
President Obama: "We have made sure that millions of young people are able to get an education when they weren't able to before." 
"Gov Romney said he wasn’t referring to as Arizona a model for the nation. His top advisor's the one who designed the whole Arizona program" 
President Obama on Romney: "He called the Arizona law a model for the nation." #SketchyDeal 
POTUS on Romney: "His main strategy during the Republican primary was to say we’re going to encourage self-deportation." #SketchyDeal 
President Obama: "We need to fix a broken immigration system." 
President Obama: "I said I would end the war in Iraq, and I did." #PromiseKept 
President Obama: "Four years ago, I told the American people I would cut taxes for middle-class people, and I did." 
Mitt Romney: Believe in China.  #SketchyDeal 
FACT: Romney invested in a Chinese firm after learning it would “not be subject to taxes in the United States.”  
On Romney: "He suggested that employers should be able to make the decision as to whether or not a woman gets contraception coverage." 
Romney backs the Rubio-Blunt bill giving employers “moral” right to deny birth control coverage to women.  #SketchyDeal 
"Gov. Romney feels comfortable having politicians in Washington decide the health care choices that women are making."—President Obama 
See how Mitt Romney and his allies would roll back women's rights in your state:  #SketchyDeal 
Mitt Romney refuses whether to say if he’d support the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act:  #SketchyDeal 
President Obama: "When Gov. Romney’s campaign was asked about the Lilly Ledbetter bill, they said they would get back to us." #SketchyDeal 
President Obama on equal pay: "This is not just a women's issue, this is a family issue—this is a middle-class issue." 
"When he’s asked how are you going to do it—which deductions, which loopholes are you going to close? [Romney] can’t tell you." #SketchyDeal 
On Romney's deficit plan: "We haven’t heard from the governor any specifics beyond Big Bird & eliminating funding for Planned Parenthood." 
“I said I would cut taxes for small businesses, who are the drivers and engines of growth, and we’ve cut them 18 times.”—President Obama 
Romney’s tax plan would either raise middle-class taxes or explode the deficit—it’s one or the other:  #RealRomney 
President Obama: "I want to give middle-class families and folks who are striving to get into the middle class some relief." 
"Oil production is up, natural gas production is up, and most importantly, we’re also starting to build cars that are more efficient." 
New York Times’ Robert Semple: The U.S can’t just “drill its way to energy independence.”  #RealRomney 
Romney’s energy plan would do nothing for energy independence, and risks destroying thousands of jobs:  
"Gov. Romney doesn't have a 5-point plan. He has a 1-point plan... to make sure that folks at the top play by a different set of rules." 
President Obama: “What I want to do is build on the 5 million jobs that we've created over the last 30 months in the private sector alone.” 
President Obama: “The most important thing we can do is make sure that we’re creating jobs in this country. Not just jobs—good paying jobs.” 
The #RealRomney education plan? Shop around:  
Watch live: President Obama lays out his specific plan to keep growing the economy in tonight’s presidential debate.  
Follow tonight for live fact-checks and analysis of tonight's debate. #TeamObama2012 
“Don’t be fooled”: Americans on the street react to #RealRomney:  
#RealRomney: Remember what he’s said before.  
Will Romney finally tell us how he’ll pay for his $5 trillion tax cut tonight?  #RealRomney 
Make sure your friends know: Romney supports overturning Roe v. Wade, which would take away a woman’s right to choose.  
The math behind Romney's tax plan is just a click away:  #MittMath 
Mitt Romney's idea of bipartisan leadership: Ignore, insult, and oppose.  #RealRomney 
FACT: Romney wants to take away a woman’s right to choose, but he told a newspaper last week that it’s not on his agenda. #TheRealRomney 
FACT: Romney insulted 47% of Americans at a private fundraiser—claiming they were “dependent” on government & consider themselves “victims.” 
FACT: Romney claims he’d cover people with pre-existing conditions after repealing Obamacare, but even his own campaign said he wouldn't. 
FACT: After months of campaigning on his $5 trillion tax cut skewed to the wealthy, Romney is pretending it doesn’t exist. #TheRealRomney 
Will #TheRealRomney show up at tonight’s debate—or will it be the say-anything deal closer?  
President Clinton on Romney’s tax plan: “It hasn't worked before, and it won’t work this time.”  #MittMath 
Jay-Z wants you in a voting state of mind this fall:  #Forward2012 
Why Romney’s tax plan just doesn't add up:  #MittMath 
New York Times: Romney "would move to take away a fundamental right that American women have had for nearly 40 years.”  
The Washington Post’s verdict on Romney's "new math" on jobs: four Pinocchios.  #MittMath 
President Clinton explains Romney’s false claims on taxes from the first debate vs. #TheRealRomney’s tax plan.  
Just 21 days until Election Day. RT if you’re ready to cheer on President Obama in tonight’s debate. #TeamObamaBiden 
You look familiar:  
President Obama’s counting on you to vote:  #RegToVote 
Jay-Z has the President's back in this election. RT this video if you do, too:  
If you've got the time, we've got the mission—travel to a battleground state to help finish this fight:  #Forward2012 
President Obama has a specific plan to create more jobs and restore economic security for the middle class:  
FACT: The unemployment rate is at its lowest level since January 2009, and consumer confidence is at a five-year high. 
FACT: Businesses have added 5.2 million new private-sector jobs over the past 31 straight months. #progress 
FACT: When President Obama took office, we were losing 800,000 jobs a month, but his policies have helped get the economy growing again. 
Americans around the country are sticking with President Obama because he’s moving our economy forward:  
"Don't be fooled." People on the street compare Romney's recent claims to #TheRealRomney's positions:  
Nonpartisan report: Seniors would pay more under Romney’s plan to turn Medicare into a voucher system.  
I'm following example and voting early, on October 25. If your state has early voting, join me:  -bo 
Today's one of your last chances to get an Obama car magnet before Election Day. Pitch in $10 now for yours:  
"Stick with this guy—he will move us forward." Americans on why they're with President Obama:  
From beekeepers in Oregon to air traffic controllers in Montana, a snapshot of this campaign's 4,000,000 donors:  
4,000,000 people have donated to this campaign: that means about 1 in 75 Americans own a piece of it. (Thank you!)  
Only 22 days to go. Sign up to volunteer for the President over the final stretch of this campaign:  #Forward2012 
Keep this campaign strong through the finish line—give $10 to Obama for America by texting GIVE to 62262.  6 msgs/mth. 
We knew this was coming:  
It’s sweatshirt weather—this one goes well with a canvassing clipboard:  
You never know who might show up at your local phone bank.   
Arlen Specter changed lives through years of service in the Senate with toughness, resolve, and fierce independence. He will be missed. -bo 
President Obama stands up for middle-class families. Stand up for him by getting involved at your local field office:  
FACT: Paul Ryan supported a plan to privatize Social Security—which would have put retirees' benefits at risk.  
Morgan Freeman: “Four years later, our enemies have been brought to justice. Our heroes are coming home."  #Forward2012 
23 days left. Make 5 calls for President Obama today—your conversations could make a difference:  
Mitt Romney paid a lower tax rate last year than many middle-class Americans—and he says that’s “fair”:  
Take a look behind the scenes on the campaign trail on the road to Election Day:  #Forward2012 
A powerful action takes a simple click—commit to vote:  
President Obama: “We refused to throw in the towel and do nothing. We refused to let Detroit go bankrupt.”  
“The last thing we should do is turn back now.” A piece of advice from a familiar voice:  #Forward2012 
Vince Carter, Alonzo Mourning, and other hoops stars share why they’re on #TeamObama—and why your vote is so important:  
Only 24 days ‘til Election Day. Help win this thing by volunteering in your community this weekend:  
Table for four: Kimberly, Mario, and Joe at #DinnerWithBarack in D.C. tonight.  
A photo that makes us smile:  
If you’re on #TeamObamaBiden, now’s the time to show it. Pitch in $10 to help win this election:   
Last night, Paul Ryan hid the truth about how the Romney-Ryan budget would hurt the middle class. Get the facts:  
FACT: Romney and Ryan don't have a plan for our troops in Afghanistan. The President has a clear plan to end the war in 2014. #DetailsMatter 
FACT: Romney and Ryan support overturning Roe v. Wade, which would take away a woman’s right to make her own health decisions. 
FACT: Romney-Ryan would pay for their $5 trillion tax cut favoring the wealthy by raising middle-class taxes or by exploding the deficit. 
FACT: Ryan couldn’t explain how Romney’s plan to double down on trickle-down would create jobs, because it wouldn’t. #DetailsMatter 
Paul Ryan spent last night’s debate making empty promises and repeating widely debunked attacks:  
In these last 25 days, it's good to know we've got each other's backs. What do you say?   
FACT: #TeamObamaBiden kept their promise to end the Iraq war. Romney & Ryan would have left troops there indefinitely:  
Wolf Blitzer: “Congressman Ryan’s low point happened near the end of the debate … when he was asked about abortion.”  
Mark Shields: “He really kind of hung Ryan out to dry on the no details of the tax plan. ... That really was exposed.”  
Chuck Todd: “If you were scoring as a debate coach, you’d say, ‘Boy, the guy who controlled that debate was Joe Biden.”  
Paul Ryan's playbook last night: Double-down on falsehoods, hide the details, stay silent on women's rights.  
The reviews of the #VPDebate are in—here's what people across the political spectrum are saying about Biden's win:  
If you're proud of Vice President Biden for winning last night's debate, let him know:  #TeamObamaBiden 
Just 25 days until Election Day. Get out there and volunteer this weekend:  
President Obama watching tonight's vice presidential debate:  
What they're saying about the vice presidential debate:  #TeamJoe 
If you’re on #TeamJoe, now’s the time to show it. Pitch in $5 or more to help win this election:  
Tonight proved once again that you won't find a better and more tireless advocate for the middle class than -bo #TeamJoe 
Political Wire: "Biden was more prepared, more experienced and the clear winner":  #TeamJoe 
VP Biden: “The two budgets the congressman introduced have eviscerated all that the middle class cares about.” #DetailsMatter 
VP Biden: "My whole life has been dedicated to leveling the playing field for working-class people." 
The ten things you should know about the Romney-Ryan view of women’s health and women’s rights:  #DetailsMatter 
Paul Ryan called for overturning Roe v. Wade. #DetailsMatter 
Rep. Ryan has cast 60 anti-choice votes during his time in Congress.  #DetailsMatter 
"We only have one truly sacred obligation as a government, & that’s to equip those we send into harm’s way & care for those who come home." 
VP Biden: “I do not believe that we have a right to tell other people, women, that they can’t control their bodies.” 
Joe Biden: "If you notice, he never answers the question." #DetailsMatter 
VP Biden on Afghanistan: "We are leaving in 2014. Period." 
Why Romney and Ryan's tax plan does not pass the arithmetic test:  #FactsMatter 
FACT: President Obama proposed extending middle class tax cuts for 98% of families. 
Obamacare increases Medicare’s solvency 8 years longer than without health care reform. #FactsMatter 
FACT: President Obama is committed to protecting and strengthening Social Security and opposes any attempts to privatize it. 
VP Biden: "We will be no part of a voucher program or the privatization of Social Security." 
Ryan voted for the policies that crashed the economy. #FactsMatter 
VP Biden on Paul Ryan: “He sent me 2 letters saying, ‘By the way, can you send me some stimulus money for companies here in WI?’” 
.@JoeBiden: "The people I grew up with and my neighbors—they pay more effective tax than Gov. Romney pays on his federal income tax." 
VP Biden: "War should always be the absolute last resort." 
"Facts matter." —Joe Biden #WrongAgainRyan 
VP Biden on Iran: "These are the most crippling sanctions in the history of sanctions. Period." 
Watch live: lays out the Obama-Biden plan to keep us moving forward.  #ReadyForJoe 
Be sure to follow during tonight’s VP debate for live fact-checks and analysis. #RyansChoice 
Will Paul Ryan explain the math behind his plan to cut taxes for the wealthy, or deny the plan exists? #RyansChoice 
Will stand by Romney and Ryan's extreme anti-choice agenda, or pretend it doesn't exist? #RyansChoice 
Casual fibs, flat-out falsehoods: What other misleading gambits will Paul Ryan pull out at tonight’s debate?  
Only one candidate in this race is standing up for women's health, and that's President Obama:   
Forward, Florida:  
Mitt Romney isn't telling voters the truth about his plans for this country:   
Paul Ryan stars in “The 7 Habits of Highly Misleading People.”  
If you're on #TeamObamaBiden, RT so your friends know the best place to watch tonight’s debate:   
POTUS: “You can agree to turn back the clock 50 years for women, immigrants, gays, and lesbians—or you can decide to keep moving forward.” 
POTUS: “You are the reason that Florida seniors are saving an average of $600 a year on prescription drugs, because we passed Obamacare.” 
“We understand that America’s not about what can be done for us. It’s about what can be done by us, as one nation, one people.” 
“I think bringing our troops home to their families was the right thing to do.”—President Obama 
President Obama on Romney: “He said it was ‘tragic’ to end the war in Iraq. He said we should have left troops on the ground in Iraq.” 
President Obama on Romney: “His plan will not create jobs. It will not help the middle class. It will not speed up the recovery.” 
President Obama on Mitt Romney: “When he’s asked about the cost of his new tax plan, he just pretends it doesn't exist.” 
"After more than a year in which he said he was 'severely conservative,' Romney’s trying to convince you that he was severely kidding.” 
President Obama: “We reinvented a dying auto industry that’s come roaring back to the top of the world.” #MadeInAmerica 
President Obama: “We repealed ‘Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell,’ so no one’s ever kicked out of the military because of who they love.” 
President Obama: “I promised to cut taxes for small business owners and we have, 18 times.” 
"We passed health care reform—aka Obamacare—so insurance companies can't jerk you around anymore."—President Obama 
President Obama: "Four years ago, I told you I'd end the war in Iraq, and we did." 
POTUS: “Everything we fought for in 2008 is on the line in 2012. I’m going to need you fired up. I’m going to need you ready to go.” 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Florida about what’s at stake in this election.  
Romney claims “people don’t die” because they lack health insurance. Watch Ryan’s story to see why that’s not true:  
President Obama’s plan would give tax breaks to companies who invest in America, not ones that ship jobs overseas:  
“Love you back.”  
Only 26 days until Election Day. Tune in here tonight at 9pm ET to cheer on in the vice presidential debate:  
Give me four for four more years:  
Spread the word: President Obama is strengthening Medicaid, while Mitt Romney’s budget would cut it by one-third.  
Join and for an inside look at the campaign's ground game. Starting now:  #DashboardLive 
Mitt Romney will say anything to win this election:  #TheRealRomney 
Spencer, a supporter in Michigan: "We need him to take us forward ... but we've got to help him get there."  
FACT: #TheRealRomney’s plan would deny health care coverage to millions of Americans with pre-existing conditions. 
FACT: #TheRealRomney’s plan would turn Medicare into a voucher system, increasing out-of-pocket costs for retirees by $6,000 a year. 
FACT: #TheRealRomney has been promising a $5 trillion tax cut that would mean raising taxes on the middle class. 
FACT: #TheRealRomney has said he wants to see Roe v. Wade overturned, denying women the right to choose. 
Mitt Romney isn't being honest with the American people about his extreme positions:  
Be a part of tonight’s #DashboardLive messaging strategy session. It starts at 8:30pm ET, and you can RSVP here:  
We’re facing tough choices on what the final push of this grassroots organization will look like. Pitch in $10 to help:  
President Clinton: The real Mitt Romney will say anything to win.  #TheRealRomney 
“You’re no victim. You earned your benefits. Don’t let Mitt Romney take them away.”  
Stand with the only candidate in this election who’s fighting to make college more affordable:   
Just 27 days left in this campaign. Pitch in $5 or more now to help win this thing in the final stretch:  #Forward2012 
GM just announced it's adding 2,000 jobs, many to staff a new IT innovation center in Warren, Michigan:  #MadeInAmerica 
Election Day is just 4 weeks away. Pitch in $20—that’s only $5 each week—to help win this election:  
Romney sees millions of Americans with Medicare as “victims.” His plan would turn Medicare into a voucher system:  
Download, print, put it in the mail: Your three easy steps to register to vote today.  #RegToVote 
President Obama: "Let's go vote. Let's go win this election."  
"I’m not fighting to create Democratic jobs or Republican jobs. I’m fighting to create American jobs."—President Obama 
President Obama: "We understand that America's not what can be done for us, it's about what can be done by us—as one nation, as one people." 
"Gov. Romney said it was 'tragic' to end the war in Iraq. I disagree. I think it was the right thing to do."—President Obama 
POTUS: "We can gut education to pay for Gov. Romney’s tax cuts, or we can do what I propose—recruit 100,000 math and science teachers." 
"Climate change is not a hoax. More droughts and wildfires are not a joke. They're a threat to your future."—President Obama 
President Obama: "Today, the United States is less dependent on foreign oil than at any time in the last two decades." 
President Obama: "I believe we can create more jobs by controlling more of our own energy." 
President Obama: "A strong economy doesn’t trickle down from the top—it comes from a thriving middle class." 
President Obama: "The last thing we can afford to do now is to go back to the same policies that got us into this mess in the first place." 
"Manufacturing is coming back to America. Home values are back on the rise. We have come too far to turn back now."—President Obama 
President Obama: "We repealed 'Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell,' as I promised we would." 
"We passed health care reform, also known as Obamacare, because I do care. I don’t want insurance companies jerking you around anymore." 
President Obama: "I promised to end the war in Iraq, and we did." 
President Obama: "I need you fired up, I need you ready to go vote. Because we've got some work to do. We've got an election to win." 
"I've got a question for you, Buckeyes. Are you registered to vote? Because if you're not, today is the last day you can get registered." 
President Obama: "Hello, Buckeyes! O-H..." Audience: "I-O!" 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio about the stark choice we face in this election.  
You can register to vote in less than 5 minutes. Get it done right here before it’s too late --->  #RegToVote 
Worth a RT: Today’s the last day to register to vote in several states. Fill out your form here—then mail it in.  
For many families, Medicaid is the only way to afford care for the elderly—but Romney’s budget would cut it by a third:  
Today’s the deadline to register to vote in several states. Take a minute to fill out your form—then mail it in today:  
28 days 'til Election Day, but today's the voter registration deadline in many states. Fill out your form & mail it in:  
Worth a RT: Obama's national security record - ending the Iraq war, decimating al Qaeda, restoring our standing abroad.  
FACT: In 2008, Barack Obama said he would end the war in Iraq, and he kept his promise.  
FACT: Unlike President Obama, Romney has no plan to end the war in Afghanistan and bring our troops home. 
FACT: Romney said it was “tragic” to bring troops home from Iraq. 
Mitt Romney failed in his audition on the world stage:  
Tomorrow is the voter registration deadline in many states around the country. Register here in less than 5 minutes:  
A former Republican senator and Vietnam veteran endorses President Obama for a second term as commander-in-chief:  
“Reckless.” “Amateurish.” Just some of the reviews of Mitt Romney’s debut on the world stage:  
"I knew, right then and there, that we were all in this together. I knew that I needed to help out with this campaign."  
If you agree we’re all in this together, share the President’s plan to keep us moving forward:   
See how President Obama's policies are helping your community:   
Just 29 days left to win this thing. Take less than 5 minutes to register to vote—then share this link:  
Eight years after the Obamas paid off their own student loans, they’re working to make education more affordable:  
Photo of the day:  
President Obama: "Governor Romney was fact-checked by his own campaign. That's rough."  
Mitt Romney has been keeping the fact-checkers busy since last week's debate:  
“We’ve made too much progress to return to the policies that got us into this mess in the first place.”  
Join & on #TeamObama and make sure you're registered and ready to vote:  
Just 30 days left in this campaign. If you're on #TeamObama, sign up to help win this thing:  
Add your name if you agree with the President that our economy grows best from the middle out, not the top down:  
If you've moved recently, remember to register to vote at your current address. It takes less than 5 minutes:  
Volunteers across the country are making a difference at phone banks right now. Find one near you:  
Pitch in $5 to support the only candidate in this race who has a plan to keep us moving forward, not back:  
A few Women for Obama in Fairfax, VA.  
There’s exactly one month until all of the votes are counted. What you do in the next 31 days makes a difference:  
A new tool you’ll want to share with family and friends:  
Election Day is one month away, but voter registration deadlines in most states are this week. Register now:  #RegToVote 
More on what it means that 1,825,813 people raised $181 million for the campaign and combined committees in September:  
Let's keep it going. Be the 4 millionth person to own a piece of this campaign:  
Since this campaign launched in April 2011, a total of 3,922,420 people have pitched in to make it what it is. 
If you gave $5, it helped. 98% of September's contributions were $250 or less, with an average contribution of $53. 
Of the 1,825,813 people who donated in September, 567,000 were new to this organization—not having given before in 2008 or 2012. 
Some amazing news this morning: 1,825,813 people came together to raise $181 million for this campaign in September.  
Educators for Obama out in full force.  
“Today, I believe that as a nation, we are moving forward again.”  
Mitt Romney isn't telling the truth:  
Voter registration deadlines are coming up fast. Make sure your friends don’t sit out this election:  
Mitt Romney owes Americans the truth. It’s that simple.  
Backstage with the President in Fairfax, Virginia.  
Read & share President Obama's long-term economic plan to grow the economy and create jobs:  
The unemployment rate is below 8% for the first time since January 2009. 
Good news today: The economy has added 5.2 million private sector jobs over 31 straight months.  
President Obama: “If we rally around a new economic patriotism together—if we reclaim our values—we will rebuild this economy.” 
President Obama: “For all you moms and kids out there, don’t worry—someone is finally getting tough on Big Bird. Elmo, too.” 
POTUS: “Gov. Romney plans to let Wall Street run wild again, but he’s bringing the hammer down on Sesame Street.” 
President Obama on Romney: “The bottom line is, his underlying philosophy is the top-down economics that we've seen before.” 
“It’s a reminder that this country has come too far to turn back now.”—President Obama on today’s positive jobs numbers 
“Today’s news is not an excuse to talk down the economy to score a few political points.”—President Obama in Virginia 
President Obama: “More Americans entered the workforce, more Americans are getting jobs.” 
President Obama: “This morning, we found out that the unemployment rate has fallen to its lowest level since I took office.” 
“After losing about 800,000 jobs a month when I took office, our businesses have now added 5.2 million new jobs over the past 2.5 years.” 
“Today, I believe that as a nation, we are moving forward again.”—President Obama in Fairfax, VA 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Fairfax, Virginia.  
32 days left in this campaign, and some states are already voting. Register to vote now—then pass this link on:  
30,000 supporters turned out to see President Obama in Madison today.  #Forward2012 
Take a few minutes and make sure you’re registered to vote—then RT this link so your friends can, too:  #RegToVote 
The President's plan would keep us moving forward. Romney would return to the failed policies that crashed the economy:  
FACT: Romney claims we need “great teachers,” but his budget plan could lead to teacher layoffs:  
FACT: Last night, Romney confirmed that he opposes asking the very wealthy for a single dollar in new revenue to reduce the deficit. 
FACT: Romney's plan repeals Obamacare, won't protect families from insurance company abuses, and leaves 50 million more Americans uninsured. 
FACT: Romney would raise taxes on middle-class families or explode the deficit to pay for his $5 trillion tax cut skewed to the wealthy. 
President Obama on Romney’s false debate claims: “If you want to be President, you owe the American people the truth.”  
Missing from Mitt Romney’s debate performance last night: Facts.  
Bundled-up Coloradans for Obama:  
Important: If you’re not registered to vote at your current address, take care of it now:  #RegToVote 
President Obama: "I still believe in you, and I’m asking you to keep believing in me. I’m asking for your vote." #ForwardNotBack 
President Obama: "We understand that America is not about what can be done for us. It’s about what can be done by us, together." 
President Obama: "I’ll use the money we’re no longer spending on war to pay down our debt and put more people back to work." 
“Four years ago, I promised to end the war in Iraq. We did. I said we’d wind down the war in Afghanistan in a responsible way. We are.” 
President Obama: “I will never turn Medicare into a voucher. Governor Romney doubled down on this proposal last night, and he’s wrong.” 
President Obama: “We cannot afford to double down on the same top-down economic policies that got us into this mess." #ForwardNotBack 
President Obama: "Thank goodness somebody is finally getting tough on Big Bird." 
On Romney: “When he was asked what he’d do to cut the deficit & reduce spending, he said he’d eliminate funding for public television.” 
“Here’s the truth: Gov. Romney cannot pay for his $5 trillion tax plan without blowing up the deficit or sticking it to the middle class.” 
President Obama: “Gov. Romney may dance around his positions, but if you want to be President, you owe the American people the truth.” 
On Romney: “The man onstage last night—he does not want to be held accountable for what the real Romney’s been saying for the last year.” 
President Obama’s on Romney’s false claims about his tax plan: “The fellow on stage last night said he didn't know anything about that.” 
POTUS: “The real Romney has been running around the country for the last year promising $5 trillion in tax cuts that favor the wealthy.” 
President Obama: “When I got on stage, I met this very spirited fellow who claimed to be Mitt Romney. It couldn't have been Mitt Romney.” 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Colorado about the choice we face in this election.  
33 days left in this campaign, but voter registration deadlines are right around the corner. Register here now:  
What Romney failed to deliver on last night: the facts.  
Fact check: Romney's tax claims challenged by nonpartisan report.  
The choice in this election couldn't be clearer. Pitch in $5 to help make sure President Obama keeps us moving forward:  
"Mitt Romney spent the night on the defensive, doubled down on the same bad ideas that crashed the economy." -@Messina2012 
Jim Messina: "The President spoke directly to voters tonight about his vision for an economy that grows from the middle out." 
If you’re feeling fired up, RT this link to make sure your friends and family are registered to vote:  #TeamObama 
Make sure your friends know: President Obama's the choice to move us forward, not back.   
Tonight, President Obama laid out his specific plan to keep us moving forward, not back:  #TeamObama 
President Obama: "I promised I’d fight every single day on behalf of the American people. I've kept that promise." 
"Part of being principled and part of being a leader is being able to describe exactly what it is you intend to do."—President Obama 
President Obama: "Let’s hire another 100,000 math and science teachers to make sure we maintain a technological lead." #Debate2012 
POTUS: "The genius of America is the free enterprise system and freedom, and the fact that people can go out there and start a business." 
President Obama: "I believe the federal government has the capacity to help open up opportunity and create ladders of opportunity." 
See how Obamacare benefits you:  #Debate2012 
President Obama on one of the driving forces behind Obamacare: "It was families who were worried about going bankrupt if they got sick." 
President Obama: "When you move to a voucher system, you are putting seniors at the mercy of insurance companies." #Debate2012 
POTUS on his grandmother: "She could be independent because of Social Security & Medicare. She had worked all her life, put in this money." 
President Obama on deficit reduction: "If we’re serious, we’ve got to take a balanced, responsible approach." 
President Obama on Romney's tax plan: "I think math, common sense, and our history shows us that’s not a recipe for job growth." 
"The auto industry has come roaring back, and housing has begun to rise."—President Obama 
President Obama: "Over the last 30 months, we’ve seen 5 million jobs in the private sector created." 
Watch live: President Obama discusses his specific plans to keep us moving forward in the first presidential debate.  
It’s go time. RT if you’ve got the President’s back in tonight’s debate:  
President Obama’s plan to keep moving America forward:   
Tune in here at 9pm ET to watch President Obama in tonight’s debate, and get the facts you need to get his back:  
Let your friends know: Registering to vote takes less than 5 minutes, and you can get it done right here.  #RegToVote 
Mitt Romney hasn't put forth any specific ideas for how to create jobs or strengthen the middle class:  
Tonight, the President will discuss his specific plans to create 1 million manufacturing jobs, double exports, & cut oil imports in half. 
Debate prep: Make sure your friends know President Obama’s plan to keep us moving forward.   
Happy anniversary to the Obamas—sign their card:   
A lot of amazing women are standing with the President—including a few familiar faces:  
Cheer on President Obama in good company tonight. Find a debate watch party near you:  #Forward2012 
Twenty years together:   
Only 34 days until Election Day. RT if you’re excited to cheer on President Obama in tonight’s debate. 
Twenty years ago today, I married the love of my life and my best friend. Happy anniversary, Michelle. -bo 
Voter registration deadlines are coming up fast. RT this link to make sure your friends are registered & ready to vote:  
Watch tomorrow night’s first presidential debate with Obama supporters in your community:  #Forward2012 
Special pizza delivery in Nevada:  
FACT: Nonpartisan tax experts say Romney’s plan would force middle-class families with kids to pay $2,000 more a year in taxes. 
FACT: Romney & Ryan have refused to provide specifics about how they’ll pay for their $5 trillion tax cut that’s skewed toward the wealthy. 
FACT: President Obama’s plan includes creating 1 million new manufacturing jobs, doubling U.S. exports, and cutting our oil imports in half. 
In tomorrow night’s debate, President Obama will continue to lay out his specific plans to move us forward:  
Five minutes that could make a big difference in November: Get registered to vote today.  
Elections do have consequences. For Ian, it was getting his dad back.  
Tomorrow night’s debate is a huge moment in this campaign. Cheer on the President with supporters in your community:  
Just 35 days left in this campaign, and some states are already voting. Make sure you’re registered and ready to vote:  
You may need a tissue after watching this video:  
For millions of women and their families, this is what change looks like:  
The easiest, most important thing you could do today: Register to vote, in less than five minutes.  
This is what registering voters sounds like:  #RegToVote 
State by state, city by city: See how President Obama’s policies are helping people in your area with this cool map.  
FACT: Gov. Romney left Massachusetts a billion-dollar deficit and the highest debt per person of any state in the country. 
FACT: Romney created or raised more than 1,000 taxes and fees in Massachusetts, despite promising that he wouldn’t raise taxes. 
FACT: Under Gov. Romney, Massachusetts fell to 47th out of 50 states in job creation, even as the national economy was growing. 
A story told in three photos:  
Your vote is your voice—it's time to speak up:  #RegToVote 
“We have come so far. We have seen so much. But there’s so much more to do.”  #Forward2012 
The coolest thing about a record 10,000,000 donations in 2012: every donation you make now sets a new one. Keep going:  
Thank you for all you've done for this campaign, and all you'll do in the next 36 days to win this.  
Last night, this campaign reached 10,000,000 donations in 2012—a huge milestone and a historic record for grassroots politics. 
Make the 10 millionth donation of 2012—only 1,416 left to go:  
Thanks to you, we’re just 18,000 grassroots donations away from 10 million. Pitch in $5 or more to help make it happen:  
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Nevada about the choice we face in this election.  
 RT Holy Moly!!! 
Time to step up for the 4th quarter of this campaign. Pitch in $5 now to help win this thing:   
Sign up for Quick Donate to show your support for President Obama at the touch of a button:  
A quick lesson in Quick Donate, from and  
Less than 100,000 grassroots donations to go by midnight. Let's hit that goal:   
“I give because I’m thinking about my grandchildren and my great-grandchildren.”—Sarah, NC:  
Deadline deal: Pitch in $10 or more now to help re-elect the President and get your Obama 2012 car magnet.  
We’re just 212,451 grassroots donations away from 10 million for the year. Pitch in $5?   
Vote to protect your friends’ right to get married and serve their country no matter who they love:  
We're facing a big FEC fundraising deadline tonight—and your donation will go further now than it will next week:  
Meet Margaret: She just turned 106, she first voted in 1928, and she can’t wait to vote for President Obama this fall.  
Your $10 donation means more now than ever. Help re-elect the President (and get a car magnet!) today:  
Supporters around the country were fired up to register voters yesterday. Check out some of the photos:  #RegToVote 
Election Day is 37 days away. Pitch in $5 or more before tonight's critical fundraising deadline:  
Pitch in to re-elect the President—donate $10 to Obama for America by texting GIVE to 62262. 6 msgs/mth  
If you help hire another organizer now, they'll have more time to do their job and reach more voters. Pitch in:  
Mitt Romney’s corporate experience wasn't about creating jobs. It was about profit, even at the expense of workers:  
Your donation will go further now than it will next week. Pitch in $5 now:  
“We’re doing better with his plan than we were before.” Constance shares why she’s investing in the next four years:  
Check out how President Obama is fighting to make college more affordable—then pass this on:  
Only 38 days left in this campaign. Pitch in $5 or more now, when it matters most, to help this campaign win:  
Grab a friend today and get in on one of the biggest voter registration pushes of this campaign:  
Last call: Meet President Obama and President Clinton on the campaign trail next week, airfare included.  
Only 6 Saturdays left before Election Day. Bring a friend to a weekend of action event near you:  
You won't get another chance like this: Enter before midnight to meet President Obama and President Clinton.  
A high school teacher making $54,000 who's got three kids and is her household's primary source of income. #WrittenOffByRomney 
The average firefighter making $45,000 a year with a stay-at-home spouse and two kids. #WrittenOffByRomney 
U.S. soldiers in combat zones whose pay isn’t subject to federal income tax. #WrittenOffByRomney 
The vast majority of Americans Romney insulted pay federal payroll taxes, property taxes, sales taxes, and state taxes. 
A look at the 47% of Americans who Mitt Romney wrote off for not taking “personal responsibility for their lives.”  
Mitt Romney’s crocodile tears aren't likely to fool anyone heading into next week’s debate:  
Too young to vote, old enough to volunteer.   
We're facing a big FEC fundraising deadline—after this, there's only one more before Election Day. Pitch in $5 now:  
Iowa saw huge turnout over yesterday's first day of early voting—let's keep it going:  
Take it from The choice in this election is too important not to vote.  
This is important: Help this campaign grow and get entered to meet Presidents Obama and Clinton on the trail.  
Just 39 days till Election Day. Pitch in $5 or more now to help win this thing in the final stretch:  
Go behind the scenes on the campaign trail on the road to Election Day:  
Don't wait to make your campaign donation—your contribution makes the biggest difference right now:  
Do you live near a battleground state? This weekend’s the perfect time for a road trip:  
If you pitch in by midnight tomorrow, your donation could help get you introduced to two American presidents:  
People in some states are already voting—so this election has begun. Make sure you’re ready:   
An easy way to donate $10 to this campaign: Text GIVE to 62262. 6 msgs/mth.  
President Obama: “If I could sit down with you in your living room or around your kitchen table, here’s what I’d say.”  
“If we rally around a new kind of economic patriotism, we will rebuild this economy together. We will rebuild the middle class together.” 
“We believe America only works when we accept certain responsibilities for ourselves, and also for others.”—President Obama 
President Obama on the Romney-Ryan mindset: “If you can’t afford to go to college, borrow money from your parents.” 
President Obama on the GOP: “Their theory is if you can’t afford health insurance, hope you don’t get sick.” 
“We’ve got a new tower across the New York skyline, al Qaeda is on the path to defeat, and bin Laden is dead.”—President Obama 
“My opponent thinks it’s fair that someone who makes $20 million a year like him pays a lower rate than a cop or a teacher who makes $50K.” 
President Obama: “The typical family has seen their tax burden go down about $3,600 on the federal level because of our policies.” 
“Help us keep tuition costs down for young people all across this country. They deserve opportunity just like I had opportunity.” 
POTUS: “We can decide that in the United States of America, no child should have her dream deferred because of an overcrowded classroom.” 
POTUS: “I wasn’t born into wealth or privilege, but I got a great education because I was born here in the United States of America.” 
President Obama: “When my opponent said we should let Detroit go bankrupt—no, don’t boo. Vote!”  
POTUS: “It’s time for a new economic patriotism, rooted in the belief that growing our economy begins with a strong & growing middle class.” 
“We believe in something called opportunity. We believe in a country where hard work pays off & responsibility is rewarded.”—President Obama 
President Obama: “I don’t think we can get very far with leaders who write off half the nation as a bunch of victims.” 
“We succeed when the middle class gets bigger, when there are ladders of opportunity for those striving to get into the middle class.” 
President Obama in Virginia: “Today I believe that as a nation, we’re moving forward again.” 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Virginia about the choice we face in this election.  
Organizers on the ground are counting on you to ramp up their work in battleground states. Pitch in $5 or more today:  
40 days until Election Day. RT this if you’re registered and ready to vote for President Obama!  
The election is over in 41 days, and we all have a stake in the outcome. Step up this weekend:  
Reading this on your phone? Pitch in $10 to Obama for America right now by texting GIVE to 62262. 6 msgs/mth.  
Reading this on your phone? Pitch in $10 to Obama for America right now by texting GIVE to 62262. 6 msgs/mth.  
FACT: Romney would have to raise taxes on middle-class families with kids by $2,000 to pay for $250,000 tax cuts for multimillionaires. 
FACT: Romney’s plan to give millionaires a massive tax cut would either raise taxes for the middle class or explode the deficit. 
FACT: Romney has said it’s “fair” for him to pay a lower tax rate than a worker making $50,000, despite making nearly $14 million last year. 
Mitt Romney thinks it’s “fair” that multimillionaires like himself pay a lower tax rate than middle-class families:  
President Obama: "I still believe in one nation and one people. I still believe in you. And if you still believe in me, I need your vote." 
President Obama: "I’m not fighting to create Democratic jobs or Republican jobs. I’m fighting to create American jobs." 
"On election night [in 2008], I said to all of those Americans who didn’t vote for me—I may not have won your vote, but I hear your voices." 
"What kind of inside job is [Romney] talking about? Is he talking about the inside job to rubber-stamp the agenda of this GOP Congress?" 
POTUS: "My opponent doesn’t understand this concept about how change happens. He said, ‘I’m going to get the job done from the inside.’" 
POTUS: "You’re the reason why thousands of families have finally been able to welcome home our loved ones who served us so bravely." 
President Obama: "You’re the reason an outstanding soldier won’t be kicked out of our military because of who they are and who they love." 
POTUS: "I have faith in you. Four years ago, I told you this wasn’t about me. It was about you, the American people. You are the change.” 
POTUS: "We understand that America’s not about what can be done for us. It’s about what can be done by us—as one nation, as one people." 
"They can’t say how they’d pay for $5 trillion in tax cuts without raising taxes on the middle class."—President Obama on Romney's plan 
President Obama on Romney's deficit-reduction plan: "My opponent has a plan too. The problem is, it’s missing arithmetic." 
President Obama: "I want to reduce the deficit without sticking it to the middle class. I want to simplify the tax code so it’s fair." 
POTUS: "No family should have to set aside an acceptance letter to a college like Bowling Green because they don’t have the money." 
"Education was my gateway to opportunity. That's why I'm standing here today."—President Obama 
President Obama on his plan to strengthen education: "I want to give more Americans the chance to get the skills they need to compete." 
"Today, America is less dependent on foreign oil than at any time in nearly 20 years."—President Obama 
President Obama: "We’ve doubled the amount of renewable, clean energy we generate from sources like wind and solar." 
President Obama: "We’ve brought more trade cases against China in one term than the previous administration did in two." 
President Obama on Romney's claim he'll be tough on China: "It feels like a fox saying we need more secure chicken coops." 
President Obama: "I want to export more products and outsource fewer jobs." 
"I’m putting forward a practical, 5-point plan to create jobs and rebuild the middle class."—President Obama:  
"We do believe in an America where no matter what you look like, or who you love, or what your last name is, you can make it if you try." 
"Don't boo—vote."—President Obama:  
POTUS on the GOP: “They think if we spend another $5 trillion on tax cuts that favor the wealthiest, the deficit will magically go away.” 
“Starting on October 2nd, which is 6 days from now, you get to start voting.” —President Obama in Ohio 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio about what’s at stake this fall.  
If you think your $15 isn't enough to make a difference in this campaign, take a minute to read this letter:  
Meet the woman who first got Barack Obama fired up and ready to go:  
Just 41 days to go and it’s all hands on deck. Pitch in by volunteering this weekend:  
President Obama is asking you to join him for dinner one last time. Enter before midnight:  
Rather than stand up for Americans who work for a living, Mitt Romney dismissed them:  
Just a few hours left: Pitch in $5 and get a shot at two seats at the last Dinner with Barack before Election Day.  
Multimillionaires like Mitt Romney shouldn’t pay a lower tax rate than middle-class families:  
“Any governor knows emergency room care is the stupidest possible way to provide care to people.”  
We’ll cover your airfare and hotel for the last #DinnerWithBarack of this campaign—enter before the midnight deadline:  
Last call! Don’t miss your last chance to have dinner with the President before Election Day—airfare & hotel are on us:  
Register to vote now—it takes less than 5 minutes:  #925NVRD 
President Obama last week: "Is it just me or do we have to get our regular refs back?"  
NFL fans on both sides of the aisle hope the refs' lockout is settled soon. -bo 
Watch live: President Obama speaks at the Clinton Global Initiative's annual meeting.  
This election is too important to sit out. Take a couple minutes and register to vote:  #RegToVote 
Mitt Romney’s solution to helping uninsured Americans afford health care: Go to the emergency room.  
42 days out from the election, it's National Voter Registration Day. Register in less than 5 minutes, right now:  
Rather than offer a plan to cut health care costs, Romney thinks uninsured Americans should just go to the ER:  
Register to vote in less than 5 minutes:   
President Obama on the choice we face this fall: “I think you grow an economy from the middle out, not the top down.”  
Starting tonight at 8:30 pm ET: Hear from campaign leadership on how you can help re-elect the President.  
Sign up for Dashboard to get connected to other #Obama2012 supporters in your neighborhood:  
Show your support for the President everywhere you go with an Obama-Biden car magnet:  
Instead of insulting 47% of Americans on taxes, Romney should come clean on his own:  
Welcome to Dashboard:  
FACT: Romney’s plan to give tax breaks to millionaires and raise taxes on the middle class would lead to endless deficits, not job creation. 
Romney thinks it’s “fair” for multimillionaires like himself to pay a lower tax rate than many middle-class families:  
If you’re thinking about how you can help get out the vote, add this to tonight's calendar:   
This election could come down to just a few thousand votes, and yours could make all the difference:  #RegToVote 
See what it’s like to have #DinnerWithBarack—then enter to win two seats at the last one of this campaign:  
Are you among the half of the country Mitt Romney has disdainfully written off? Share your story:  
43 days until the election. Pitch in $5 now to help put another organizer on the ground:  
Free car magnet!  
The perfect t-shirt for 44 days out from the election, and the 43 days to follow:   
Tomorrow night is the first-ever Dashboard Open House—get everything you need to organize for the President online:  
Welcome to Dashboard:  
A powerful action takes a simple click—commit to vote:  
Easy: Connect with this campaign on Facebook, get a free car magnet.   
Just 44 days left to re-elect our 44th President. Pitch in $5 now, when it matters most, to help put him over the top:  
A packed house for President Obama in Milwaukee tonight:  
 RT POTUS: "Don't boo—" Entire crowd: "VOTE!" 
Volunteers across the country are making a difference at phone banks right now. Find one near you:  
Romney finally released a 2nd full year of tax returns, revealing millions invested overseas. What else is he hiding?  
Two seats at the last #DinnerWithBarack of this campaign could be yours, but only if you enter:   
“Such a tiny donation has resulted in such a huge prize.” #DinnerWithBarack winners on getting to meet the President:  
We will decide this election. Pitch in $5 or more now, when it matters the most:   
Meanwhile, on Mars:  
The election is in 45 days. Commit to vote:  
The next 46 days will decide this election. Pitch in $5 to help make sure we come out on top:   
Worth a RT: President Obama’s plan to keep us moving forward.   
Romney's 2011 tax returns confirm what we already knew: Romney pays a lower tax rate than the middle class.  
Support the campaign right on your front lawn with an Obama-Biden yard sign:  
Make sure your friends know: The choice between President Obama and Mitt Romney on Medicare couldn’t be any clearer.  
President Obama to Mitt Romney: "We don’t want an inside job in Washington. We want change in Washington."  
"I’m looking forward to a Nationals-White Sox World Series."  
“The values we believe in don’t just belong to workers or businesses; the rich or the poor; the 1% or the 99%. They belong to all of us." 
President Obama: “I’m not fighting to improve red state schools or blue state schools—I’m fighting to improve schools in the United States.” 
President Obama: “I’m not fighting to create Democratic jobs or Republican jobs—I’m fighting to create American jobs.” 
“In ’08, 47% of the country didn’t vote for me—but I said to all those Americans, ‘I may not have won your vote, but I hear your voices.’” 
President Obama: “Change can’t happen if you write off half the nation before you even take office.” 
“We don’t want an inside job in Washington. We want change in Washington.”—President Obama 
“What kind of inside job is he talking about? If it’s rubber-stamping the top-down agenda of this GOP Congress, we don’t want it.” 
POTUS: “My opponent got really excited. He stood up at a rally & proudly declared, ‘I’ll get the job done from the inside.’” 
“You change [D.C.] from the outside. You change it with the help of ordinary Americans who are willing to make their voices heard.” 
President Obama: “The election four years ago was never about me. It was about you. You were the change.” 
POTUS: “I refuse to turn Medicare into a voucher. Americans shouldn’t have to spend their golden years at the mercy of insurance companies.” 
POTUS: “We can decide that in America, no child should have her dreams deferred because of an overcrowded classroom.” 
POTUS: “I am asking you to help me recruit 100,000 math and science teachers in the next 10 years, and improve early childhood education.” 
“We can help big factories & small businesses double their exports. We can create a million new manufacturing jobs in the next 4 years.” 
POTUS: “We can reward companies that open new plants and train new workers and create new jobs right here in America.” 
President Obama: “I want to export more products and outsource fewer jobs.” 
President Obama: “I'm offering a practical, 5-point plan to create jobs and build the middle class." 
POTUS: “We believe in something called opportunity. We believe in a country where hard work pays off; where responsibility is rewarded.” 
POTUS in VA: “I don’t believe we can get very far with leaders who write off half the nation as victims who will never take responsibility.” 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s remarks on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Virginia about the choice we face this fall—forward or back.  
Mitt Romney thinks more than half of America’s seniors don’t “care for their lives.” Americans react:  
Just 46 days left to win this thing. Volunteer in your community this weekend:  #Forward2012 
All Americans can now serve their country without hiding who they are:  
“Out of many, we are one.”  
“The election four years ago wasn’t about me. It was about you. My fellow citizens—you were the change.” —President Obama, 9/6/12 
"The change we need doesn't come from Washington. Change comes to Washington. Change happens because the people demand it." —Obama, 8/28/08 
"This campaign can't only be about me. It must be about us—it must be about what we can do together." —Barack Obama, 1/10/07 
Mitt Romney continues to take the President’s words out of context, so we returned the favor:  
Watch live: President Obama takes part in a live town hall on Univision’s “Meet The Candidate.”  #Latinos2012 
President Obama on the end of #DADT: “No longer will tens of thousands of Americans in uniform be asked to live a lie.”  
“This is done.” —President Obama a year ago today on ending “Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell”:  
47 days left to re-elect a President who won't write off 47% of the country:  
A poster to say there are no red states or blue states, only the United States:  
Senate Republicans have blocked a bill that would have helped up to 20,000 veterans find jobs in their communities:  
FACT: Romney promised to veto the bipartisan DREAM Act, and supports “self-deportation.” 
FACT: Romney would repeal Obamacare, meaning 913,000 young Hispanics now on their parents’ plans could lose health coverage. 
FACT: Romney would raise taxes on Latino middle-class families with kids by $2,000 to give a $250,000 tax cut to multimillionaires. 
Mitt Romney will try an “extreme makeover” to get his policies to appeal to Latino voters. Here’s why it won’t work:  
“We support you because you believe in the very essence of the dream we are living.”  #Latinos2012 
Arrr you in?   
Being President of the United States of America means you're President for everybody.  
PHOTO: A couple supporters in a New York state of mind last night.  
“If you want to be President, you’ve got to work for everybody, not just for some.” —President Obama on the  
Fly for free to the last Dinner with Barack:  
48 days until the election. Ask a friend to register to vote:  
Being President of the United States of America means you're President for everybody.  
A sneak preview of the President’s visit to the airing tonight at 11:35pm ET:  
49 days left to win this thing: Pitch in $5 now to help re-elect a President who’s fighting for all Americans.  
Why President Obama is fighting to give everyone a shot at the American Dream:  
Stand with the candidate who is fighting for all Americans:   
FACT: In 2011, the 47% of Americans who Romney insulted included nearly 20 million seniors. 
FACT: 61% of the Americans who Romney claimed don’t take “personal responsibility and care for their lives” pay federal payroll taxes. 
FACT: A vast majority of the 47% of Americans who Romney insulted pay a large percentage of their income in taxes. 
Romney told a group of wealthy donors that 47% of Americans see themselves as “victims” who are entitled to handouts:  
"Wow": Americans react to Mitt Romney's comments about 47% of the country.  
We can’t afford a President who says “my job is not to worry about” 47% of the American people:  
Get dinner with the President—airfare's on us:  
49 days until Election Day—if you’re not registered yet, start here:  
The choice:   
Pitch in $5 if you support the candidate in this race who's fighting for all Americans—President Obama:  
You won't believe this:  
Romney on 47% of Americans: "I'll never convince them they should take personal responsibility & care for their lives."  
Messina on Romney: "It’s hard to serve as president... when you’ve disdainfully written off half the nation.”  
POTUS: "Go to GottaVote․com. Vote early. If you vote early, then you can spend the rest of the time getting other folks to vote.” 
"I've got a lot of fight in me right now. I'm fired up, and I'm ready to go. But I need you. Only you can keep this country moving forward." 
“If you give up on the idea that your voice can make a difference, then other voices will fill the void: lobbyists and special interests.” 
“I am not going to ask middle-class families to pay over $2,000 more so that millionaires & billionaires can pay less.”—President Obama 
POTUS: “I am asking you to help me recruit 100,000 math and science teachers in the next 10 years, and improve early childhood education.” 
President Obama: “No family should have to set aside a college acceptance letter because they don’t have the money.” 
“We’ve brought more trade cases against China in one term than the previous administration did in two—and we’ve won.”—President Obama 
President Obama: “I wake up every single day doing everything I can to give American workers a fair shot in the global economy.” 
“You can’t stand up to China when all you’ve done is send them our jobs.”—President Obama on Mitt Romney 
POTUS on Romney: “His experience has been owning companies that were called ‘pioneers’ in outsourcing jobs to countries like China.” 
“We can start rewarding companies that open new plants, and train new workers, and create new jobs right here in America.”—President Obama 
POTUS: “I bet on American workers—and 3 years later, the American auto industry has come roaring back with nearly 250,000 new jobs.” 
“We are going to export more products and we are going to outsource fewer jobs.”—President Obama 
“We believe we’re all in this together. We don’t believe this economy grows from the top down; we think it grows from the middle out.” 
“I don’t believe that firing teachers or kicking students off financial aid will grow the economy or help us compete.”—President Obama 
“I don’t believe another round of tax cuts for millionaires will bring good jobs back to Ohio, or pay down our deficit.”—President Obama 
POTUS: “Ours is a fight for the basic bargain that built the largest middle class and the strongest economy the world has ever known.” 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s remarks on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio about how he’s fighting for American workers.  
The clear choice we face in this election when it comes to protecting American workers:  
FACT: The Obama administration has brought trade cases against China at twice the rate of the Bush administration.  
FACT: Romney would eliminate U.S. taxes on companies’ foreign profits, which could create 800,000 jobs in other countries including China. 
The Boston Globe on Romney’s investments in Chinese companies that use unfair trade practices he claims to oppose:  
Today, the Obama administration filed a case with the WTO challenging China’s illegal export subsidies of auto parts:  
Only 50 days to make sure we keep moving forward:  
Last chance to share a meal with the President before the election—you can even bring a guest:  
50 days until Election Day. If you've been waiting to get involved, now's the time to step up:  
L'shana tova to everyone celebrating tonight. -bo 
Don’t let that great phone voice get rusty. Use it to make calls for the President at a phone bank near you:  
Last call to get your favorite Obama bumper sticker for free—choose yours right now:  
If you agree that higher education is an economic necessity—not a luxury—add your name:   
One way to support the President while you’re on the road—get your free bumper sticker:  
Focused:  
President Obama: “You can choose which path we take. I’m counting on you.”  #Forward2012 
Call me maybe? Find out how to use your gift of gab to support this campaign:   
The question is: Whose plan is better for you?  #Forward2012 
"It was so wonderful to be in the same place as all those people making change in my community and across the country."  
Something you can do today: Make 10 calls.  
Women for Obama:  
Make sure your friends know President Obama’s plan to create one million new manufacturing jobs by 2016:  
See what it’s like to work for the President, through the eyes of a volunteer:  #Forward2012 
President Obama knows that the economy grows best from the middle class out and from the bottom up:  
Take a look behind the scenes at #DNC2012:  
Winter is coming, but these sweatshirts are perfect for fall:  
This:  
Share the President's plan to build on 30 months of private-sector job growth:   
The election is in 53 days—pitch in $10 now:  
Beyoncé and Jay-Z are hosting the President in New York—your chance for two spots on the guest list ends at midnight:  
High five:  
"Let's face it, a mixed kid from Hawaii born to a single mom is not likely to become President of the United States."  
Only a few hours left: Enter by midnight to join the President in New York for an evening with Beyoncé and Jay-Z.  
Use this tax calculator to find out how your vote this fall will impact your family’s tax bill:  
"We believe the economy grows from the middle class out, from the bottom up." —President Obama in Colorado today:  
Mitt Romney asked Paul Ryan for 10 years of tax returns, but he’s only released one full year of his own:  
Today only: Pitch in $5 and be automatically entered to meet up with the President, Beyoncé, and Jay-Z sometime soon.  
"We’ve got more doors of opportunity to open for everyone who’s willing to work hard and walk through them."—President Obama 
POTUS: "We have come too far to turn back now. We’ve got more good jobs to create. We’ve got more homegrown energy to generate." 
"We will reform and strengthen Medicare, but we’ll do it by reducing the cost of health care—not by asking seniors to pay thousands more." 
“I’m asking you to help me recruit 100,000 math and science teachers, and improve early childhood education.”—President Obama 
President Obama: "In the U.S., no child should have a dream deferred because of a crumbling classroom." 
POTUS: “Today, the United States of America is less dependent on foreign oil than at any time in nearly two decades.” 
“We can help big factories & small businesses double their exports. We can create a million new manufacturing jobs in the next 4 years.” 
“I don’t believe that firing teachers or kicking students off financial aid will grow the economy.”—President Obama 
“Small businesses—we’ve cut their taxes 18 times.”—President Obama 
POTUS: "The typical family has seen their income tax burden go down about $3,600 since I came into office." 
President Obama: "We saved an American automobile industry that was on the verge of going under. Manufacturing is coming back." 
POTUS: “Our fight is to restore the basic bargain that built the largest middle class and the strongest economy the world has ever known.” 
“We believe in a set of principles—all men & women are created equal; we’re all endowed by our Creator with certain unalienable rights.” 
President Obama: “Our world is filled with serious challenges. But we can and will meet those challenges if we stay true to who we are.” 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s remarks on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Colorado about what’s at stake in this election.  
In Nevada yesterday, President Obama spoke about the “faith that we have in this nation.”  
Jay-Z and Beyoncé will be meeting up with the President for an evening in NYC sometime soon—and you could join them:  
54 days till Election Day. Sign up for Dashboard today and make a difference in your neighborhood:  
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Nevada about the choice we face this fall.  #Forward2012 
“We don’t turn back. We leave no one behind. We pull each other up.” A look back at highlights from #DNC2012:  
Your voice can make a difference:  
If you support the President and care about clean energy, clean air, and clean water—here’s a page you’ll want to like:  
President Obama is fighting to double U.S. exports:  
Use your smartphone to help your friends and family get registered to vote:  
Why Cordero will be out registering voters this fall:  
As painful as this day is and always will be, it leaves us with the lesson that no act of terrorism can ever change what we stand for. -bo 
The election is in 8 weeks. Sign up to volunteer:  
GIF of the day:  
Make sure this campaign keeps growing by getting your friends involved—start a grassroots fundraising page today:  
“We just proved we can go head to head with Romney and the Republicans and win. That can't stop now.”  
In Melbourne, Florida yesterday: Four more years.  
No matter how small, Sheilah knows how important her donation is to the campaign:  #Forward2012 
Three great bumper sticker choices, all free. Pick out the one you want:  
A future president in the crowd in West Palm Beach yesterday.  
We've proven that we can match the Romney campaign's big contributions & secret bundlers. Make sure we can do it again:  
We closed the fundraising gap with Mitt Romney's campaign for the first time since April. That's huge—thank you.  
Fort Pierce, Florida: becoming famous for good hugs.  
FACT: Thanks to health care reform, the number of uninsured young adults fell by one-sixth in 2011.  #progress 
New album: Thousands of volunteers stepped up over the weekend, and the pictures will make you smile.  #Forward2012 
#Arithmetic:  
If you want your voice heard in this election, you gotta vote:  
Here's what you can do to close the gap for another month: RT this link, right now.  
No celebrating, because they're going to have an even bigger September. But now we know we can match them, doing this our way. 
317,954 people who gave to the campaign in August were supporting the Obama organization for the very first time. 
If you pitched in $5 or $10, it helped. 97.77% of donations in August were $250 or less, for an average of $58.31. 
Adding in the folks who gave in August, a total of 3,142,457 people have donated to this campaign since April 2011. 
1,170,000 people stepped up to own a piece of this campaign last month. That's amazing. 
The campaign and combined committees raised over $114 million in August to the Romney campaign's $111 million. 
Huge news: our grassroots campaign outraised the Romney campaign in August—the first time we've done so since April. 
Supporters organized 7,967 grassroots events this weekend. If you were out knocking on doors and registering voters, thank you. #Forward2012 
President Obama got a lift in Ft. Pierce, Florida today:  
Heartland for Obama:  h/t 
Your daily action: Pitch in $5 now.  
Easy: Pick out your favorite bumper sticker and we’ll get it in the mail.  
Touchdown POTUS vs. pick-six Mitt. The choice is yours:  
Touchdown POTUS:  
An Iowa med student had a front row spot for the President’s speech yesterday—and then this happened:  
Young Floridians for Obama:  
"The only thing the President likes more than a bus tour is a hug."—@jrpsaki:  
President Obama in St. Petersburg, Florida today: "Only you have the power to move us forward."  
Confirm you’re registered to vote and commit to cast your ballot in one fell swoop.  
Your Saturday arithmetic lesson from the “Secretary of Explaining Stuff”:  
Scenes from the Democratic National Convention:  #DNC2012 
Meet some new people, knock on some doors, and get out the vote! There are weekend of action events happening near you:  
We did it! Over 700,000 grassroots donations this week—thank you!  #Forward2012 
Thanks to you, we're just 33,000 grassroots donations away from 700,000 for the week. Pitch in $5 before midnight:  
The fab four:  
We set a goal of 600,000 grassroots donations for convention week—we only need 10,000 more by midnight. Pitch in $5?  
Tomorrow marks the start of a huge weekend of action. Be a part of re-electing President Obama—volunteer:  #Forward2012 
If you’re standing with the President, we’ve got a free sticker for you:  #Forward2012 
The next 60 days are going to fly by. Get your ducks in a row now: Commit to vote.  
Did #DNC2012 get you fired up? Put that energy into action—make plans to volunteer this weekend:  
Sneaking up on Dad:  
If you missed it last night, or want to watch it again, here’s President Obama’s #DNC2012 acceptance speech:  
Obama: “America’s not just about what can be done for us—it’s about what can be done by us, together, as one nation and one people.” 
“Here in America, no family should set aside that college acceptance letter because they figure they can’t afford it.”—President Obama 
“We can help big factories and small businesses double their exports. We can create a million new manufacturing jobs in the next 4 years.” 
“I’ve cut taxes for people who need it—middle-class families, small business owners.”—President Obama 
POTUS on the GOP’s plan: “Tax cuts when times are good, tax cuts when times are bad. Tax cuts to cure your love life.” 
POTUS: “That’s why I am running for a 2nd term as President—to finish the job, to keep moving forward, to build on the progress we’ve made.” 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in New Hampshire with VP and Dr. Jill Biden.  
Donate $10 or more --> get your favorite car magnet:  #Obama2012 
It all comes down to this: Committing to vote. Do it now:  
If you're fired up, if you've got Barack Obama's back, then own a piece of this campaign. Pitch in now:  
“We don’t turn back. We leave no one behind. We pull each other up.”  
We need to move forward, not back. Pitch in $5 or more now to support President Obama:  
President Obama: “We don’t turn back. We leave no one behind. We pull each other up.” 
POTUS: “If you reject the notion that our government is forever beholden to the highest bidder, you need to stand up in this election.” 
“Ours is a future filled with hope. If you share that hope with me, I ask you tonight for your vote.”—President Obama 
President Obama: "As I stand here tonight, I have never been more hopeful about America." 
“The election four years ago wasn’t about me. It was about you. My fellow citizens—you were the change.”—President Obama 
POTUS: “As citizens, we understand that America is not about what can be done for us. It’s about what can be done by us, together.” 
POTUS: “I refuse to ask students to pay more for college; or kick children out of Head Start programs so those with the most can pay less.” 
“I’ll use the money we’re no longer spending on war to pay down our debt and put more people back to work.”—President Obama 
“No family should have to set aside a college acceptance letter because they don’t have the money.”—President Obama 
POTUS: “Education was the gateway to opportunity for me and for Michelle. And now more than ever, it is the gateway to a middle-class life.” 
President Obama: “My plan will continue to reduce the carbon pollution that is heating our planet—because climate change is not a hoax.” 
President Obama: “Today, the United States of America is less dependent on foreign oil than at any time in the last two decades.” 
“I don’t believe that firing teachers or kicking students off financial aid will grow the economy.”—President Obama 
“I’ve cut taxes for those who need it: middle-class families, small businesses.”—President Obama 
President Obama: “Madam Chairwoman, delegates, I accept your nomination for President of the United States.” 
Watch live: President Obama accepts the #DNC2012 presidential nomination:  
How President Obama is moving us forward:  
If you're on Team Obama-Biden, pitch in $5 now:  #Forward2012 
VP: “We have no intention of downsizing the American Dream. We’re going to hear from a man whose whole life is a testament to that dream.” 
VP Biden: “President Obama knows that making sure our daughters get the same pay as our sons must be every father’s bottom line.” 
Vice President “Osama bin Laden is dead, and General Motors is alive.” 
VP Biden: “My dad never failed to remind me—a job is about a lot more than a paycheck. It’s about dignity. It’s about respect.” 
VP Biden: “We're on a mission to move this nation forward to promise and prosperity. A mission we will complete.” 
Watch live: VP lays out the ways President Obama is fighting for middle-class families:  #DNC2012 
“On behalf of a grateful nation, I’m proud to say these two words, and I know your families agree: Welcome home.”  
Sen. John Kerry’s message to Mitt Romney: “Before you debate Barack Obama on foreign policy, you better finish the debate with yourself.” 
1.1 million auto jobs saved. #Forward2012  
Health care, equality, "welcome home," DREAM, auto rescue, a strong middle class—we can't turn back:  #Forward2012 
If you're feeling fired up by this convention, make it count: Ask a friend to commit to vote.  -bo 
Follow tonight for live coverage of the President and Vice President’s #DNC2012 speeches. 
“No matter what you look like, or where you come from, or who you love, you can dream big dreams.”  #Pride2012 
“Your vote is precious, almost sacred. It is the most powerful non-violent tool we have to create a more perfect union.”—@RepJohnLewis 
Get the ball rolling—commit to vote today:  #CommitToVote 
Watch all the action from the final day of #DNC2012 live:  
Our servicemembers and their families make so many sacrifices for our country. Let them know it’s appreciated using the hashtag #thanks. 
In case you missed it last night, here's President Clinton's full speech:  
Free bumper stickers! This week marks a new chapter for #Obama2012—show your support all over town:  
Four years after Barack Obama first accepted a nomination for president, a look back at promises kept.  
Run DNC.  
Speaking at the #DNC2012 tonight: Dr. Jill Biden, Vice President and President Barack Obama. 
We'll be covering the final day of the Democratic National Convention on today—follow along for updates from on the ground. 
"'We are all in this together' is a far better philosophy than 'We are on our own.'"  
Bill Clinton at #DNC2012: “We simply cannot afford to give the reins of government to someone who will double down on trickle-down.” 
Bill Clinton last night: "We have to re-elect President Obama." Say you're in now:  
POTUS hug.  
Let’s make sure President Obama is a two-term President—pitch in $5 now:  
Turn that fired-up feeling into action—commit to vote now:  
"If you want a future where the American Dream is really alive and well again, you have to vote for Barack Obama."—President Clinton 
"We simply cannot afford to give the reins of government to someone who will double down on trickle-down."—President Clinton 
President Clinton: "The claim that President Obama weakened welfare reform’s work requirement is just not true." 
President Clinton on the Affordable Care Act: "Are we all better off because President Obama fought for it and passed it? You bet we are." 
Clinton on Obamacare: “Individuals and businesses have secured more than $1 billion in refunds from their insurance premiums.” 
"I want President Obama to be the next president of the United States."—President Clinton 
Watch live: President Clinton speaks at #DNC2012.  
If you're ready to fight for good jobs and a strong middle class, say so here:  #DNC2012 
Watch live: speaks about why President Obama is the clear choice for the middle class:  #DNC2012 
Lilly Ledbetter’s message to Mitt Romney at #DNC2012:  
A look back at how President Obama helped save the American auto industry:  
If you’re standing with the President, we’ve got a free sticker for you:  #Obama2012 
Here's how the President’s all-of-the-above energy strategy is creating jobs & reducing our dependence on foreign oil:  
“The connection that I see between small businesses and the middle class really is that they’re one and the same.”  
Watch a livestream of all the action from Day Two of #DNC2012:  
Zoe was born with a heart defect and would have hit her lifetime insurance limit without the Affordable Care Act:  
It’ll be time to vote before we know it—commit to vote now, then spread the word:  #CommitToVote 
If you can support President Obama with a donation today, please know it makes a huge difference:  
I might be a bit biased, but I thought knocked it out of the park at the convention last night. -bo 
No matter who you are or where you come from, you can make it if you try:  
Watch entire #DNC2012 speech here:  
On today's #DNC2012 speaker schedule: Elizabeth Warren and Bill Clinton, starting at 10pm ET. We'll be covering Day Two on 
Closing out the first night of the convention, had the audience members in Charlotte on their feet:  
Inspired to own a piece of this campaign? Pitch in $5 here:  
Michelle's biggest fans were watching from home:  
Watch live: First Lady speaks at #DNC2012 about the values that guide the President:  
Get to know the woman the President calls “the best mom in the world”—First Lady  
Massachusetts Gov. Deval Patrick on his predecessor, Mitt Romney: “He was a lot more interested in having the job than doing the job.” 
Starting shortly: Mayor and First Lady speak at #DNC2012. Watch live:  
Commit to vote, then use our handy new Facebook app to remind your friends and family to do the same:  #CommitToVote 
A tribute to the late, great Senator Ted Kennedy:  
Watch how President Obama is fighting to help schools raise education standards and make college more affordable:  
Before Barack Obama accepts his second nomination for president, take a look back at the path that brought him here:  
Watch a livestream of all the action from #DNC2012 starting now:  
This is really cool: Use a new tool to commit to vote and get your friends to do the same:  #CommitToVote 
President Obama: "We’re not moving backwards. We’re moving forward. That’s why I’m running for re-election." 
President Obama: "On issue after issue, Gov. Romney and Congressman Ryan want to take us backward." 
"We can close the gap between what America is now and what it should be."—President Obama 
“No one who fights for this country should have to fight to put a roof over their head when they come home. That’s our solemn obligation.” 
POTUS on Afghanistan: "I’ve said we would end this war in 2014. Gov. Romney last week didn’t have a thing to say about the war." 
POTUS: "They like to call it Obamacare. Well, I do care. I care about all the young people who are able to stay on their parents’ plans." 
President Obama: “Gov. Romney wants to end the tax credit we created that’s saving families up to $10,000 on tuition over four years.” 
President Obama: “I kept my promise to cut taxes on middle-class families and small businesses.” 
President Obama: "We believe in an America where getting decent health care doesn’t depend on how much money you’ve got." 
POTUS: "We believe in an America that says, our economic strength doesn’t come from the top-down. It comes from the middle-out." 
President Obama on the GOP convention: "They spent a lot of time talking about me, but they didn’t spend a lot of time talking about you." 
“Whatever I say here today, it’s going to be a distant second from the speech you hear tonight from the star of the family, Michelle Obama.” 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: On the Road to Charlotte, President Obama speaks in Virginia.  
POTUS in Ohio yesterday: “It’s working people like you who helped to lay the cornerstones of middle-class security.”  
Speaking at #DNC2012 tonight beginning at 10pm ET: San Antonio Mayor delivering the keynote, and First Lady 
The election is in 9 weeks: Share GottaRegister․com to make sure your friends are registered to vote.  
Spotted in the crowd at President Obama's event in Toledo today: Superman.  
Pick out your favorite bumper sticker and we’ll send it to you for free—it’s that easy:  
“Toledo pride worldwide”: Road to Charlotte, day 3.  
More than 3 million supporters now own a piece of this campaign. RT if you’re one of them. 
POTUS: “Go to gottaregister․com. If you want to find out how to vote early, go to gottavote․com. We gotta whole lot more work to do.” 
POTUS: "We’ve got more good jobs to create. We’ve got more good cars to build. We’ve got more schools to upgrade and more teachers to hire.” 
President Obama on Mitt Romney: “He said ending the war in Iraq was tragic. I said it was the right thing to do.” 
President Obama in Toledo: "They call it Obamacare. It’s true—I care. The other side’s plan is the Romney Doesn’t Care plan.” 
POTUS: “Higher education is not a luxury anymore. It’s an economic necessity that every family should be able to afford." 
President Obama on the 1 million jobs saved by the auto rescue: "These jobs are worth more than just a paycheck. They’re a source of pride." 
President Obama: "If we had turned our backs on you, if we had thrown in the towel like that, GM and Chrysler wouldn’t exist today." 
President Obama: "I’ve got some additional advice on the Romney-Ryan game plan. Punt it away. It won’t win the game." 
POTUS on Romney: "On third down, he calls for a hail Mary—ending Medicare as we know it by giving seniors a voucher." 
President Obama on Romney's economic game plan: "On second down, he calls an audible and undoes reforms." 
"On first down, he hikes taxes by nearly $2,000 on the average family w/ kids in order to pay for a massive tax cut for multimillionaires." 
President Obama on Romney's game plan: "The problem is, everyone’s already seen his economic playbook." 
POTUS on the GOP convention: “It was a rerun. You might as well have watched it on a black-and-white TV with some rabbit ears." 
President Obama: “Last week, the other party gave their sales pitch down at their convention in Florida. Don’t boo—vote.” 
President Obama in Toledo: "To everyone who is working hard each and every single day, happy Labor Day." 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s remarks on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio on the Road to Charlotte about what’s at stake in this election.  
Meet some of the 3,152,919 people who have pitched in to own a piece of this campaign:  
Just 64 days until the election—sign up for Dashboard now to get involved in your neighborhood:  
We just hit a major milestone: More than 3 million supporters now own a piece of this campaign.  
Thanks for all you're doing and for all you'll do over the next 65 days to help win this election. High five:  
Summer may be coming to an end, but this campaign is heating up—use the code SUMMERSALE for 25% off in the store:  
Cheer on the President with your friends and neighbors during his speech at the #DNC2012 this Thursday:  
Use this tax calculator to see how your vote this fall will impact your family—then share your results with friends:  
Watch live: On the Road to Charlotte, President Obama speaks in Boulder, Colorado.  
Got plans for the President’s #DNC2012 speech on Thursday night? Now you do:  
Get involved and meet other supporters in your area with Dashboard, our online organizing tool:  
“As long as we have a single American in harm’s way, we will continue to do everything in our power to keep them safe.”  
The next stop on President Obama's Road to Charlotte: Boulder, Colorado. Follow along here:  
Day one of the President's Road to Charlotte, as seen through tweets and Instagrams:  
Kicking off the road to Charlotte in Iowa:  
President Obama's take on the RNC: "We’d seen it before. You might as well have watched it on a black-and-white TV."  
If you decide to try out the White House beer recipe, keep your new brew cold in style:  
President Obama: “Go to  Once you’re registered, go to  to find out how you can vote early.” 
POTUS: “We’ve got more good jobs to create. We’ve got more homegrown energy to generate. We’ve got more young people to send to college.” 
POTUS: “On issue after issue, Governor Romney and Congressman Ryan will take us backward. But the story of America is about moving forward.” 
“As long as I’m Commander-in-Chief, we will serve our veterans as well as they’ve served us.”—President Obama 
“Romney had nothing to say about Afghanistan last week, let alone offer a plan for the 33,000 troops who will have come home this month.” 
“It’s up to you whether we go back to a health care system that lets insurance companies decide who to cover and when.”—President Obama 
“You can choose an energy plan written by and for big oil companies, or you can choose an all-of-the-above energy strategy for America.” 
“Romney wants to end the college tax credit we created that’s saving families up to $10,000 over 4 years on tuition. I want to extend it.” 
POTUS: “In America, higher education cannot be a luxury; it’s an economic necessity that every family should be able to afford.” 
President Obama on Romney: “When his advice was to ‘let Detroit go bankrupt,’ I bet on American workers and American manufacturing.” 
POTUS: “My opponent’s experience has been investing in companies that often were called ‘pioneers’ in the business of outsourcing jobs.” 
POTUS: “I’m running to make sure that taxes aren’t raised a dime on your family’s first $250,000 of income. That's the path forward." 
POTUS: “I will offer you what I believe is a path that grows this economy, creates more good jobs, and strengthens the middle class.” 
POTUS: “They have tried to sell us these tired, trickle-down, you’re-on-your-own policies before. They did not work. They’ve never worked.” 
“We really don’t think the best way to strengthen Medicare is to give seniors a voucher.”—President Obama 
“Romney didn’t offer a single new idea—just retreads of the same old policies that have been sticking it to the middle class for years.” 
President Obama on the GOP convention: “It was a rerun. We’d seen it before. You might as well have watched it on a black-and-white TV.” 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s remarks on along for the latest. 
Watch live: On the road to Charlotte, the President speaks in Iowa about the choice we face this fall.  
The President's hitting the road to Charlotte to accept the nomination at the on Thursday—follow along:  
Your daily task: Make sure you’re following to get in on the campaign’s daily action. 
DEADLINE: For the price of buying your friend a drink, pitch in $5 before midnight to help this campaign win.  
Fired up. Let’s finish what we started:   
Get to know the Republican Party’s extreme and out-of-touch agenda:  
Show you’ve got Barack’s back: Pitch in $5 or more before tonight’s critical fundraising deadline.  
These two:  
A promise kept:  
Pitch in $10 or more and we’ll send you your favorite of these three car magnets:  
Hold your signs high:  
Tonight’s fundraising deadline is one of the most important we’ll face. Pitch in $5 to show you’ve got Barack’s back:  
The race is on:  
Rolling Stone: Mitt Romney secured millions in a federal bailout for Bain while paying big bonuses to executives.  
Deadline deal: Pitch in $10 or more, get the car magnet of your choice.  
The election is in 67 days: Share GottaRegister․com with 10 friends to make sure they’re registered to vote.  
Today’s one of the last fundraising deadlines of this campaign. Pitch in $5 to help make sure we keep moving forward:  
This seat's taken.   
Stand with President Obama tonight:  
Here's where to say you're on Team Obama-Biden:   
Tonight's their night, but our focus is tomorrow. Support the President before Friday's critical fundraising deadline:  
If you think women should be trusted to make their own health care decisions, you should retweet this:  
Tonight, Mitt Romney’s Etch-A-Sketch will be shaken to its core:  
We’ve come so far, but we’ve still got work to do. Help make sure we can keep moving forward:   
Our take: Romney will try to sell the legend of his business experience tonight. One problem—it’s a huge distortion:  
Follow Deputy Campaign Manager during Mitt Romney’s GOP convention speech tonight for fact-checks and reaction. 
President Obama: "They're counting on young people to just accept their version of the way things ought to be."  
Must-read: “The federal bailout that saved Mitt Romney.”  
Con nuestra nueva App de Llamadas, puedes hacer las llamadas que nos ayudarán ganar esta campaña—¡A llamar!  
We have a choice between Romney Economics and an economy built to last. Stand with the President:  
Spread the word: Romney and Ryan would cut the investments we need to grow our economy.  
"Hi, I'm Barack Obama, President of the United States. Ask me anything." The President visits Reddit:  
Recapping day three of the GOP convention—where Paul Ryan’s speech was long on distortions and short on solutions:  
68 days until the election—get your #Obama2012 bumper sticker here:  
If you’ve got the President’s back, add your name here:   
We can’t go back. Pitch in $5 now to help make sure we don’t:   
FACT: Romney and Ryan’s plan would pay for tax cuts for the wealthy by raising taxes on the middle class. 
FACT: Romney and Ryan’s plan could cut Pell Grants for nearly 10 million students and would eliminate President Obama's college tax credit. 
FACT: The Romney-Ryan plan to turn Medicare into a voucher system could force new retirees to pay up to $6,400 more a year for health care. 
Before Paul Ryan speaks at the GOP Convention tonight, see why the Romney-Ryan plan would hurt middle-class families:  
Follow tonight for live fact-checks of the GOP Convention. 
If you’re a student who supports the President, follow for the latest on what’s at stake for you this fall. 
In case you missed it earlier, check out the President's answers to a Reddit Q&A:  
Help those affected by Hurricane Isaac by supporting the American Red Cross:  
President Obama is answering your questions in a #Reddit AMA, starting right now:   
Hey, everyone: I'll be taking your questions online today. Ask yours here:  -bo 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Virginia about the choice we face this fall.  
The GOP drove our economy into a ditch—and now they want the keys back:  
One party thinks education should be a luxury—the other knows it’s an economic necessity:  
Make sure your friends know they don’t want any part of this Venn diagram:  
A handy calculator that shows how your vote this fall will affect how much students pay in college costs:  
Recapping day two of the GOP convention—ideology, misinformation, and all:  
Today, double your impact and grab a friend to volunteer with you this weekend:  #Obama2012 
If you're standing with President Obama in this election, let him know now:   
Tonight Gov. Christie endorses Mitt Romney at the RNC. Say hi to Team Not-Quite-Last-Place:   
We’ll be live-tweeting and fact-checking the GOP convention tonight on along for the latest. 
If you agree, stand with the candidate in this race who cut taxes for small businesses 18 times:   
Romney Economics: the infomercial.  
President Obama’s fuel efficiency standards will save families money at the pump & cut our dependence on foreign oil:  
Joe would know—he’s a small business owner for Obama. Join him here:   
Your choice: Pick your favorite magnet and get it for $10.  
“In 2 months, you get to choose a path that actually will lead to a better future. You will have the chance to prove the cynics wrong.” 
President Obama: “We have come too far to turn back now. We’ve got more work to do.” 
“Today, America is less dependent on foreign oil than at any time in nearly 20 years.”—President Obama 
President Obama: “We just won the fight to keep federal student loan rates from doubling for more than 7 million students.” 
President Obama: “We created a college tax credit that’s saving families up to $10,000 for college tuition over four years.” 
POTUS: “In America, higher education isn’t a luxury; it’s an economic necessity that every family should be able to afford.” 
President Obama to students in Iowa: “You have more at stake in this election than just about anybody.” 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Iowa about what’s at stake for the middle class this fall.  
54.5 mpg by 2025: “The single most important step we’ve ever taken to reduce our dependence on foreign oil.”  #progress 
President Obama: “I don’t want to give them the keys back. They don’t know how to drive.”  
Everyone with student loans should check this out:  
Ten weeks until the election. RT if you’re registered and excited to vote! If you’re not, register here:  
Must-see trailer: “The Do-Over,” starring Mitt Romney.  
If you’re young (or young at heart) and support President Obama, here’s the site for you:  
Mitt Romney wants students to “shop around.”  
Pitch in $10 and we’ll send you the car magnet of your choice:  
Students and parents, check this out: See how your vote this fall will affect your college costs.  
Get your caffeine fix with a side of reality check:  #MadeInTheUSA 
Make it easier for the people who want to see the President’s birth certificate—get it on a button:  
Mitt Romney’s convention reinvention: Rated “N” for not gonna work.  
President Obama trusts women to make their own health decisions. Add your name if you do, too:  
President Obama trusts women to make their own health decisions. Add your name if you do, too:  
Make sure the women in your life know: The GOP wants to take us back to the 1950s on women’s health.  
President Obama: “I am 110% behind our teachers."  
Why former Florida GOP Gov. Charlie Crist is supporting President Obama this fall:  
71 days and counting until the election. Pitch in $20 now to help make sure the President comes out on top:  
Mitt Romney: the movie trailer.  
Made in the USA and all purchases go toward re-electing the President—take a look around the #Obama2012 store:  
President Obama said he’d fight to make college more affordable—and he did:  #PromiseKept 
Make sure the women in your life know:  
Celebrate this Women's Equality Day by making sure the women in your life are ready to vote:   
One thing you can do right now: Set up a grassroots fundraising page to bring your friends into this campaign.  
Helping millions of Americans afford college:  
Neil Armstrong was a hero not just of his time, but of all time. Thank you, Neil, for showing us the power of one small step. -bo 
President Obama promised to stand up for teachers—and then he walked the walk:  #PromiseKept 
More than just a mug:   
This is a first: You can now donate to #Obama2012 via text. Give $10 by texting GIVE to 62262.  6 msgs/mo 
“If you put in a lifetime of hard work, you shouldn’t lose your home or your life savings just because you get sick.”  
Some advice on this election from someone who knows—President Bill Clinton.  
What you can do today: Follow to get the facts you need to fight false attacks on the President. 
If you're willing to stand with me, and vote for me, and organize with me, we will finish what we started.  
See how President Obama is making college more affordable for millions of Americans:  
If you’re looking for the President’s birth certificate, these will come in handy:  
A new low for Mitt Romney:  
“This is personal now”: Republican women on why they’re voting for President Obama.  
Today's a good day to buy one of our Made in the USA mugs—with the President's birth certificate on the back:  
Song of the day: Born in the U.S.A.  
Now's the time to say you stand with President Obama in this election—and against false, divisive attacks:  
Our take: Gov. Romney’s decision to directly enlist himself in the birther movement should give pause to any rational voter across America. 
Mitt Romney this morning: "No one has ever asked to see my birth certificate. They know this is the place I was born." 
The Romney-Ryan plan: 125 tax hikes to pay for one tax cut.  
It’s just like a field office—only you can access it anytime, anywhere. Join Dashboard:  
Today marks four years since I chose to be my running mate. Here’s to an outstanding Vice President and a great friend. –bo 
An old favorite that pretty much sums it all up:  
Education should not be a Democratic or Republican issue. It's an American issue.  
For the first time, you can support the campaign via text. Give $10 to Obama for America, text GIVE to 62262.  6 msgs/mo 
President Clinton on President Obama: “We need to keep going with his plan.”  
The choice on clean energy jobs this fall:  
FACT: The President is nearly doubling fuel efficiency standards for cars & trucks, saving families more than $8,000 at the pump per car. 
FACT: President Obama’s clean energy investments have supported nearly 225,000 American jobs. #MadeInAmerica 
FACT: America’s dependence on foreign oil has reached a 20-year low, down 25% since President Obama took office. #progress 
FACT: Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan would gut investments in clean energy, while maintaining $4 billion a year in tax breaks to oil companies. 
How Mitt Romney’s energy plan would make us more dependent on foreign oil and destroy thousands of American jobs:  
We’re Americans. We don’t hold back. We don’t quit.  
Don't boo—vote!  
Your new favorite t-shirt: Pick your favorite state, style, and color—then use the code CUSTOMIZE to get 20% off.  
Use this calculator to see how the President's policies are helping students with their loans:  
The election is in 75 days, and it will be close. Pledge to make 10 calls today:  
“President Obama has a plan to rebuild America from the ground up.”—President Clinton on the clear choice this fall:  
“Thanks to you, we’ve made a difference in people’s lives.”  
FACT: The President's education plan spurred nearly every state to raise academic standards without any new mandates:  
Use the hashtag #ClassSizeMatters to share why you think our kids need more teachers in the classroom. 
FACT: The President is urging Congress to support some 325,000 more jobs for teachers & educators, helping more kids avoid crowded classes. 
FACT: President Obama helped support more than 400,000 jobs for teachers & educators—preventing layoffs that could’ve increased class sizes. 
FACT: Mitt Romney supports Paul Ryan’s budget, which could cut education funding by 20%, forcing some students into more crowded classrooms. 
Mitt Romney doesn’t think class sizes matter. Parents disagree:  
Six-year-olds for Obama.  
President Obama: “We’ve got more good work to do. We’ve got more good teachers to hire, and good schools to build.” 
“Gov. Romney is on the wrong side of each of these issues. His plan could cut aid for 10 million students.”—President Obama 
“Education should not be a Democratic or a Republican issue. It’s an American issue. It’s about what’s best for our kids.”—POTUS 
POTUS on Romney: “His economic plan makes clear he doesn’t think our children’s education is worth investing in. I do.” 
POTUS: “I have a question for Governor Romney: How many teachers’ jobs are worth another tax cut for millionaires and billionaires?” 
President Obama in Nevada on the audience’s reaction to Romney’s education plan: "Don't boo—vote." 
“The plan Governor Romney has put forward could cut America’s investment in education by nearly 20%.”—President Obama 
“Cutting back on teachers is the last thing we should be doing as a country. We should be hiring more teachers.”—President Obama 
“What happens in the classroom matters, and that begins with the person in front of the classroom.”—President Obama 
“There is nothing more important to our country’s future than the education we give our children.”—President Obama 
Follow for the latest from the President’s speech. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Nevada about the choice we face on education this fall.  
President Obama: “Over the past four years, we’ve doubled the electricity America generates from wind.”  #MadeInAmerica 
Add your name if you agree: Politicians shouldn’t be making health care decisions on behalf of women.  
76 days until the election—pick out your favorite car magnet to show your #Obama2012 pride:  
Last call: Enter by midnight to be Michelle's guest for the Democratic National Convention—we’ll fly you to Charlotte.  
Stand with the President—the only candidate in this race who believes women should make their own health care choices:  
Last chance to go to the Democratic National Convention as Michelle’s guest and meet the President—airfare included:  
O-H-I-O!  
FACT: Romney and Ryan would eliminate the President’s college tax credit. 
FACT: Romney and Ryan would slash Pell Grant scholarships, making college more expensive for nearly 10 million students. 
FACT: Mitt Romney has said students should “shop around” if they’re worried about higher education costs. 
FACT: President Obama’s student loan reform freed up more than $60 billion to make college more affordable and reduce the deficit. #progress 
FACT: Thanks to President Obama, responsible borrowers can cap their student loan repayments at 10% of discretionary income. #progress 
FACT: President Obama doubled funding for Pell Grants, increasing the number of recipients to nearly 10 million students. #progress 
FACT: President Obama’s college tax credit helped more than 9 million students and families save money on tuition last year. #progress 
FACT: President Obama helped prevent student loan interest rates from doubling for more than 7 million students. 
Today's your last chance to meet Barack and sit with Michelle at the Democratic National Convention next month:  
Judy chipped in a few bucks to help this campaign win—and ended up at dinner with Barack:  
POTUS: "If you’re willing to stand with me & organize with me and knock on doors with me, we will win Ohio. We will finish what we started." 
“I want to give 2 million more Americans the chance to go to community college & learn skills local businesses are looking for right now.” 
“Unlike my opponent, I will extend the college tax credit we passed so more families can save up to $10,000 on their tuition next year.” 
President Obama on the Romney-Ryan budget: “It would cut financial aid for nearly 10 million students overall.” 
President Obama: “I don’t accept the notion that we should deny any child the chance to get a higher education.” 
“Making higher education more affordable for our young people is something I’ve got a personal stake in.”—President Obama 
“We did not finish paying off our student loans until about 8 years ago.”—President Obama 
President Obama: “Once we had Malia and Sasha, we needed to start saving for their college educations, but we were still paying for ours.” 
POTUS: “When we got married, we got poorer together. We paid more for our student loans than we paid on our mortgage each month.” 
President Obama: “Your education is the single most important investment you can make in your future.” 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio about the choice we face on education this fall.  
See how much you could save on student loans under President Obama—and what you'd lose under Romney:  
11 short weeks left until the election. Help President Obama win by pitching in $20 now:  
Say you stand with President Obama—the candidate in this election who trusts women to make their own health decisions:  
There's a clear choice for women in this election:  
You should give this a shot: Meet Michelle and Barack at the Democratic National Convention.  
Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan would raise taxes on 95% of Americans. Find out if that means you, too:  
President Obama's reaction to Rep. Todd Akin's comments: "Rape is rape."  
FACT: Thanks to health care reform, women can now receive birth control with zero copay, saving some women up to $600 a year. #progress 
FACT: Women pay up to 50% more than men for the same health coverage—discrimination that Obamacare bans starting in 2014. #progress 
"I want women to control their own health choices, just like I want my daughters to have the same opportunities as your sons."—Pres. Obama 
FACT: Paul Ryan cosponsored legislation that could ban many common forms of contraception, including certain birth control pills. 
FACT: Paul Ryan cosponsored a bill that could ban all abortions, even in cases of rape or incest. 
"We shouldn't have a bunch of politicians, a majority of whom are men, making health care decisions on behalf of women." —President Obama 
"The views expressed were offensive. Rape is rape." —President Obama on Rep. Todd Akin's comments 
President Obama: “If you truly value families, you shouldn’t play politics with a woman’s health.”  #Women2012 
What a Romney-Ryan administration would mean for women:  
Mitt Romney wants to be in charge of your taxes, but won't come clean on his own:   
Your chance to go to the Democratic National Convention, meet the President, AND spend time with the First Lady:  
Summer isn’t over yet: Get your #Obama2012 tank top today.  
Hey, 95% of America: Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan would raise your taxes.  
Sign up for Dashboard to get connected to other #Obama2012 supporters in your neighborhood:  
We’ve come too far to turn back now:  #Obama2012 
One thing you can do today: Download the #Obama2012 app to organize, inform, and spread the word.  
Thanks to you:  #Obama2012 
New York Times: Romney and Ryan are “tying themselves up in knots” with contradictory statements about Medicare.  
The President on how his jobs bill would help states rehire thousands of teachers—and why Congress should pass it now:  
Watch it, share it, keep America moving forward:  
“I keep on telling people under 30 that they have the most at stake. Their future is on the line in this election.”  
Just 80 days left—donate $20 today:  
From the archives: Faces of the campaign.  
“We’ve come too far to turn back now.”  
The Romney-Ryan budget plan: Raise taxes on middle-class families to pay for tax cuts for millionaires.  
Under Romney-Ryan's plan, millionaires get tax breaks—and middle-class families get to pay for them. See for yourself:  
FACT: Health care reform strengthens Medicare benefits, including lower premiums, free preventive care, and cheaper prescription drugs. #ACA 
FACT: President Obama’s health care law saves Medicare $716 billion by cutting waste and fraud. 
Romney and Ryan would give $150 billion in subsidies back to insurance companies and, amazingly, undo progress to cut out fraud and abuse. 
FACT: Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan’s plan to repeal Obamacare would raise Medicare premiums and prescription drug costs for seniors. 
The Romney-Ryan voucher plan for Medicare could raise seniors’ health care costs by nearly $6,400 a year.  
You and a guest could sit with Michelle for the President’s convention speech next month:  
If you do one thing today: Share gottavote․org with 10 friends to make sure they’re registered to vote.  
Own a piece of this campaign by setting up a grassroots fundraising page—it’s as easy as clicking here:  
Go VIP at the DNC: Here’s your chance to meet Barack and Michelle in Charlotte next month --->  
The choice: President Obama is strengthening Medicare, while Romney and Ryan would turn it into a voucher system.  
FACT: Obamacare saves Medicare more than $700 billion by cutting waste and insurance company subsidies, and extends Medicare by 8 years. 
FACT: Health care reform has saved Medicare recipients nearly $4 billion on prescription drugs. #progress 
FACT: President Obama’s health care law is saving seniors money through lower premiums and free preventive services like cancer screenings. 
FACT: Romney has said he’d sign into law Ryan’s plan to privatize Medicare, forcing seniors to pay $6,350 more a year in health care costs. 
FACT: Romney and Ryan would turn Medicare into a voucher system, raising seniors’ health care costs while giving tax cuts to millionaires. 
Mitt Romney says his Medicare plan is “identical” to Paul Ryan’s voucher plan:  
Be Michelle's VIP guest at the convention:  
A hug in Davenport, Iowa yesterday:  
One side’s fighting for middle-class families—and the other’s not:  
See how this election adds up for you:  
You and a guest could score front-row seats—next to Michelle Obama—at the President’s DNC convention speech next month:  
Got your nose:  
Today, convince one more friend to volunteer with you:  
Fun at the Iowa State Fair, circa 2007:  
Your choice in this election affects your family’s budget. Use this tax calculator to find out how:  
President Obama: “My plans already extended Medicare by nearly a decade. Their plan ends Medicare as we know it.”  
Get the facts on how President Obama’s health care law strengthens Medicare, and how the Romney-Ryan plan would gut it:  
FACT: Obamacare is helping seniors save through lower premiums, free preventive care, and less expensive prescription drugs. 
FACT: The President’s health care law extends the life of Medicare by eight years without cutting benefits to seniors. #progress 
FACT: Romney and Ryan would repeal health care reform, forcing seniors to pay higher Medicare premiums and raising prescription drug costs. 
FACT: Paul Ryan's plan would turn Medicare into a voucher system and increase a new retiree’s health care costs by $6,350 a year. 
FACT: Paul Ryan's plan would turn Medicare into a voucher system and increase a new retiree’s health care costs by $6,350 a year. 
FACT: President Obama’s health care law strengthens Medicare benefits while cutting waste and insurance company subsidies. #progress 
Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan: the Go Back Team that would end Medicare as we know it:  
The President's plan would save the typical middle-class family #2200dollars next year—use the hashtag to share how it would help you. 
President Obama: "If you're still fired up, if you are still ready to go like I am, we will win Iowa. We will win this election." 
"When you come together, you become more powerful than anybody who's writing a $10 million check."—President Obama in Iowa 
"The economy always works best when the middle class is doing well."—President Obama 
POTUS: "The average middle-class family—their taxes are about $3,600 lower since I became President." 
President Obama: "Four years ago, I promised to cut middle-class taxes, and that’s exactly what I’ve done." 
POTUS on Romney's tax plan: "They have tried to sell this trickle-down snake oil before. It didn’t work then, it won’t work now.” 
President Obama: "Gov. Romney’s tax plan would raise taxes by about $2,000 for middle-class families with children.” 
POTUS on Obamacare: "I care about the 6.5 million young people who can now stay on their parents’ plan because of this law." 
President Obama: "I kind of like the term ‘Obamacare.’ Because I do care. That’s why I passed the bill." 
President Obama: "Gov. Romney and his running mate have a very different plan—they want to turn Medicare into a voucher program." 
President Obama: "I have made reforms that have saved seniors with Medicare hundreds of dollars on their prescription drugs." 
President Obama on Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan: “Their vision is wrong for working families, and it is wrong for the country." 
President Obama: "I've come here to ask you to stand with me, just like you stood with me in 2008, to finish what we started." 
FLOTUS on POTUS: "[He] knows what it means when a family struggles. He knows what it means to want something better for your kids.” 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Iowa about what’s at stake for the middle class this fall.  
Coffee and a handshake:  
Steve is building his wind energy business in Michigan with some help from a loan program President Obama supports:  
President Obama on clean energy: “These jobs aren’t fads, they’re our future. And we’ve got to stand up for them.”  
How Romney and Ryan would end Medicare as we know it:  
"President Obama defines this campaign in three eloquent, reasonable minutes":  
84 days to go—pitch in $5 now to help make sure we keep going in the right direction:  #Obama2012 
5 cosas que debes saber sobre el candidato de Mitt Romney a la vicepresidencia:  
Download the new #Obama2012 smartphone app to get the latest campaign news and find events near you:  
FACT: Paul Ryan’s budget plan would eliminate tax credits and funding for clean energy, and make deep cuts to investments in energy R&D. 
FACT: Paul Ryan voted against extending the production tax credit for wind energy. 
FACT: Mitt Romney says he would get rid of the wind energy production tax credit, which could cost up to 37,000 American jobs within a year. 
FACT: The U.S. wind sector supports 75,000 American jobs—including workers at manufacturing facilities, engineers, and construction workers. 
FACT: The U.S. has enough wind turbines online to power nearly 13 million homes—or as many as in NV, CO, WI, VA, AL and CT combined. 
FACT: The U.S. has more than 400 manufacturing facilities in 43 states involved in wind turbine manufacturing. #MadeInAmerica 
Iowans of both parties agree with President Obama: “Wind tax credits should be extended.”  #MadeInAmerica 
If elected, Gov. Romney’s opposition to the wind energy tax credit could allow countries like China to dominate the clean energy industry. 
The Go Back team: A ticket dedicated to failed economic policies and a 1950’s social agenda.  
"I’m going to need everybody here registering to vote—you can get forms online. Go to  Obama 
POTUS: "When you guys get involved, nothing can stop you. You will decide the future of this country, and I’m asking for your help." 
POTUS on clean energy jobs: "These jobs aren’t a fad. These are good jobs, and they’re a source of pride that we need to fight for." 
"20% of Iowa’s electricity now comes from wind, powering our homes and our businesses in a way that’s clean and renewable."—President Obama 
"I don’t believe in an economy from the top down. I believe that the economy grows from the middle class out, and from the bottom up." 
POTUS: "Your tax rates are lower by about $3,600 for the typical family than they were when I came into office, because I kept my promise." 
"Gov. Romney’s tax plan would actually raise taxes on the average middle-class family with children by about $2,000."—President Obama 
President Obama on Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan: "I fundamentally disagree with their vision for America." 
POTUS: "This is a choice between two fundamentally different visions of how America became great and how it's going to stay great." 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Iowa about what’s at stake for the middle class this fall.  
President Obama on the Romney-Ryan economic plan: "It's a vision I fundamentally disagree with."  
The election is in 12 weeks—stay in the loop by subscribing to the #Obama2012 YouTube channel:  
A perfect day for snow cones in Denison, Iowa:  
President Obama has awarded Medals of Freedom to four American sports legends—get to know them here:  
Summer sale: Pick up a tank top for 25% off with the code VOTEOBAMA:  
#Pride2012: We won’t go back.  
Entérate del impacto que tendría en tu vida una presidencia Romney-Ryan—visita  
Mitt Romney’s tax plan leaves the tab for middle-class families—see what your total would be:  
FACT: The President is offering states flexibility for improved welfare-to-work programs that would increase job placement by at least 20%. 
Get the facts on how President Obama is strengthening welfare-to-work programs:  
NBC News: “Dubious claim behind Romney welfare attack.”  
PolitiFact rated Romney’s false welfare attack ad “Pants on Fire.”  
Boston Globe: “The claim that Obama has waived the welfare program’s work mandate was widely debunked.”  
New York Times: Mitt Romney’s claims about the President's welfare policy are “blatantly false.”  
President Clinton on Romney’s welfare attack ad on President Obama: It's just "not true."  
For those of you who don’t know much about Paul Ryan:  For those of you who do, spread the word with a RT. 
Romney-Ryan: The Go Back team with the same top-down economic ideas that crashed our economy.  
Romney and Ryan want to end Medicare as we know it while giving millionaires a tax cut—and Floridians aren’t buying it:  
"In my lifetime, this is the most important election we're facing."—Fred, #Obama2012's 2 millionth donor:  
One thing you can do today: Follow this campaign on Tumblr.  
The choice on Medicare this fall:  
President Obama’s response to the drought affecting the U.S. is all hands on deck:  
FACT: Paul Ryan endorsed a bill that would ban several common forms of birth control, including certain birth control pills. 
Make sure the women in your life know: Paul Ryan supports banning all abortions, even in cases of rape or incest. 
FACT: Paul Ryan would turn Medicare into a voucher program, forcing seniors to pay up to $6,350 a year more in health care costs. 
FACT: Paul Ryan supports writing discrimination into the Constitution with an amendment banning gay marriage. 
FACT: Paul Ryan voted against repealing the discriminatory policy of "Don't Ask, Don't Tell." 
FACT: Even as he gives more tax cuts for the wealthiest, Paul Ryan would cut clean energy investments by 19 percent. 
FACT: Paul Ryan’s budget cuts, if made across the board, would cut key investments in innovation, education, and clean energy by nearly 20%. 
Congrats to the U.S. women’s and men's basketball teams for bringing home the gold. You all make us so proud. -bo 
Now that we know who's on both teams, say you're with Obama-Biden:  
VIDEO: How Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan would take us back to the failed, top-down policies of the past.  
The no. 1 thing you need to know about Paul Ryan: He's extremely conservative—at the expense of the middle class.  
Now that we know who's on each team, RT to say you're with Obama-Biden:  
Stand with Barack and Joe today:  
Romney-Ryan: Now twice as ready to bill the middle class and seniors for millionaires' tax cuts.  
We won’t go back:  
FACT: Paul Ryan voted against the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act, which helps women fight for equal pay for equal work. 
FACT: Paul Ryan cosponsored a bill that would ban many common forms of birth control, including certain birth control pills. 
FACT: Paul Ryan would ban all abortions, even in cases of rape or incest. 
FACT: Paul Ryan would cut Pell Grant scholarships for nearly 10 million students even as he gives tax cuts to the wealthy. 
FACT: Paul Ryan would end Medicare as we know it by turning it into a voucher program, costing seniors up to $6,350 a year. 
Paul Ryan is an architect of the top-down GOP budget that cuts education, energy, & innovation even as it gives tax cuts to the wealthy. 
FACT: Paul Ryan would ask middle-class families to pay thousands of dollars more a year in taxes to help fund tax cuts for millionaires. 
Romney-Ryan: The Go Back Team.  
Stand with President Obama and Vice President Biden at this important moment of this campaign:  
5 key facts about Paul Ryan:  
Read and RT: what you (and your friends) need to know about Paul Ryan.  
Campaign Manager Jim Messina on what you need to know right now about Romney's VP pick, Paul Ryan:  
LAST CALL: Enter to win dinner with President Obama and Michael Jordan before midnight.  
Tag, you’re it:  
It’s Friday—give Barack five:   
Grab some friends and register to vote now!   
Dinner with Michael Jordan and President Obama—make it happen:  
Photos! Take a look at the new #Obama2012 gallery:  
Team U.S.A. is leading the Track & Field medal count—and there's more to be proud of at home. RT if you agree:  
The outcome of this election will have a real impact on your family’s finances—use this tax calculator to see how:  
If you have a kid or a friend who’d love nothing more than to shoot hoops with the President, enter to make it happen:  
90 days, 90 reasons to re-elect President Obama:  
Show a little muscle this election season—this tank top is 25% off with the code VOTEOBAMA:   
The election is in 88 days—convince a friend to volunteer with you this weekend:  
Rock-n-roll:  
Pitch in $5 to be automatically entered for dinner and some hoops with the President and some basketball legends:  
A backstage high-five in Colorado today:  
“He's ready to help, while Mitt Romney can't even understand. President Obama is the clear choice—he's for all people.”  
Congrats to the U.S. women’s soccer team for a third straight Olympic gold. So proud. –bo 
Elizabeth Banks: “President Obama has not compromised on women’s rights.”  
Share how President Obama’s plan to extend middle-class tax cuts would help your family:  #2200dollars 
Join President Obama and some basketball legends for dinner and a shootaround. Enter to win now:   
A household making $50,000 saved $3,600 in taxes during President Obama’s first term. What about yours?  
President Obama: "Go to  . But don’t wait until the last minute. Grab some friends, get online, let’s get this done.” 
President Obama: "We've come too far to turn back now ... That’s why I’m asking for your vote." 
President Obama on the GOP: "They don’t have a plan to create jobs. They don’t have a plan to grow the middle class. I’ve got that plan." 
POTUS: "The average middle-class family—their taxes are about $3,600 lower than before I came into office.” 
President Obama: “Four years ago, I promised to cut middle-class taxes. I kept that promise.” 
POTUS: “They have tried to sell us this trickle-down, tax cut fairy dust before. It didn’t work then and it won’t work now.” 
“More than any election in recent memory, this is a choice between two fundamentally different paths; two fundamentally different visions." 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Colorado about what’s at stake for the middle class this fall.  
Why Daryl pitches in: "I know he has my best interests, and the interests of the entire middle class, at heart.”  
If it looks unjust, that’s because it is:  
Something you can do today: Follow Barack Obama on Instagram to see photos from the trail.  
President Obama: "I think there is one person to make these decisions on health care, and that is you.”  #ACA 
President Obama shares how he’s helping small businesses grow and create jobs—and who gets to cut his hair:  
FACT: The U.S. has enough wind turbines online to power nearly 13 million homes—or as many as in NV, CO, WI, VA, AL and CT combined. 
Dinner and some hoops with President Obama and a few basketball legends. Enter now:   
Find out what health care reform means for your family:  #ACA 
President Obama: “These aren’t just health issues, or women’s issues—they’re economic issues that affect every family in America.” 
“We are not going back to the days when women with pre-existing conditions like being a cancer survivor were denied affordable coverage.” 
“We are not going back to the days when it was acceptable to charge women more than men for the same health care.”—President Obama 
POTUS: “I don’t think a college student in Colorado Springs should have to choose between textbooks or the preventive care she needs.” 
President Obama: “I don’t think a working mother in Denver should have to wait to get a mammogram just because money is tight.” 
“This law allows young adults under the age of 26 to stay on their parents’ health care plans.”—President Obama on the Affordable Care Act 
POTUS: “Insurance companies can no longer place lifetime limits on your care. They can no longer jack up your premiums without reason.” #ACA 
POTUS: “The Affordable Care Act helps make sure you don’t have to worry about going broke just because one of your loved ones gets sick.” 
POTUS: “I delivered on my promise to deliver health reform before the end of my first term. Obamacare. I like that name because I do care.” 
“The decisions that affect a woman’s health aren’t up to politicians or insurance companies—they’re up to you.”—President Obama 
POTUS: “More than any election in recent memory, this is a choice between two fundamentally different paths for our country’s future.” 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Colorado about the choice we face in this election.  
.@ElizabethBanks is standing with President Obama and Planned Parenthood on women’s health. Here’s why:  
A cool magnet for your fridge:  #Obama2012 
Yesterday, President Obama expedited 7 solar and wind projects that will generate enough power for 1.5 million homes:  
You and a guest could join President Obama and some of basketball's best for dinner and some hoops. Enter to win:  
New York Times: “If Mr. Romney truly cared about the ‘fundamental right to vote,’ he would support it for everyone.”  
Just 90 days until the election—chip in $5 today:  
President Obama, Patrick Ewing, and you? Enter to win two spots at the Obama Classic for you and a guest:  
Two years ago today, Elena Kagan was sworn in as the Supreme Court’s fourth female justice:  
The new #Obama2012 smartphone app was app of the day yesterday:  
Share what the President’s plan to extend middle-class tax cuts means to you using the hashtag #2200dollars. 
FACT: President Obama’s plan would extend tax cuts for 98% of Americans, saving the typical family of four #2200dollars next year. 
Just a few reasons why President Obama is urging Congress to extend middle-class tax cuts:  #2200dollars 
An easy-to-use tax calculator that shows how your vote in November will impact your family’s taxes next year:  
Iowans want wind energy tax credits extended, but Mitt Romney would let them expire—costing thousands of jobs:  
Are you a small business owner and an #Obama2012 supporter? Write a letter to the editor—this tool makes it easy:  
"President Obama believes in making the investments that small businesses like mine need." —Alexandra, a small business owner in CA 
"Our small businesses will only succeed if our country invests in the workers." —John, a small business owner in Columbus, Ohio 
A few small business owners wrote letters about why they support President Obama—here’s what a few of them had to say. 
A few small business owners wrote letters about why they support President Obama—here’s what a few of them had to say. 
Your daily action: Submit what inspired you to get involved with #Obama2012. It could inspire someone else:  
We’ve come a long way—and there’s more ahead. The Story of Us:  #Obama2012 
We can win if we're outraised—but we've got to close the gap as much as we can. Pitch in now:   
Being outraised means we're being outspent. Here's what that looks like:  
This morning, we learned that for the third month in a row, we've been outraised by the other side in this race:  
"It was easy to invite people to volunteer—especially for a canvassing trip. It was kind of a big adventure."  
“I don’t have much to give, but I donated because I want to see President Obama keep doing what he’s doing."  
Breaking down Mitt Romney’s plan to raise taxes on the middle class:  
If you're a small business owner for Obama, write a letter to share why you've got the President's back:  
“[President Obama]'s fighting for small businesses like mine, which create 2 out of every 3 jobs in this country." —Steven, Coral Gables, FL 
"Small business owners can't afford the failed policies of the past. And Americans can't afford a Romney presidency." —Rodger, Santa Monica 
"America prospers when we're all in it together, and President Obama knows that."—Norman, a small business owner from Juno Beach, FL 
"We who are privileged to be in that position DO owe the country something for our success." —Rachael, small business owner in Wellesley, MA 
We asked small business owners to write in about why they support President Obama—here are just a few of their responses. 
Use this tax calculator to find out which candidate is fighting for the middle class:  
If you’re a parent for Obama, make it official here:  
"I eagerly await what Curiosity has yet to discover."—President Obama on last night's rover landing on Mars:  
The countdown clock says 92 days until the election—find an #Obama2012 event near you:  
Since April 2011, a total of 2.7 million people have pitched in to own a piece of this campaign. Join us today:  
Every bit helps. 98% of our contributions in July were $250 or less, for an average donation of $53.49. 
201,000 of the people who gave in July were entirely new donors who didn't give before in this election cycle or in 2008. 
Reporting back on last month's fundraising numbers: In July, 761,000 people donated to raise over $75 million for this campaign. Thank you. 
"I congratulate and thank all the men and women of NASA who made this remarkable accomplishment a reality."—President Obama 
"Tonight, on the planet Mars, the United States of America made history."—President Obama 
Bringing home the gold and training the next generation of American heroes—U.S.A. Gymnastics has a lot to be proud of:  
This just in: custom #Obama2012 tees in the color of your choosing, featuring your home state.  
If you or someone you know owns a small business, share how President Obama’s policies are helping it succeed:  
Today, take a second and like Barack Obama on Facebook:  
Just the thing to celebrate the President's birthday—get a Made in the USA mug:  
President Obama celebrates the Olympic and Paralympic athletes of Team U.S.A. in his weekly address:  
Americans have a choice to make this fall—see how your family would fare under the Romney tax plan:  
Billie Jean King: Tennis champ and one of the American athletes to receive the Medal of Freedom under President Obama.  
Today's the day—take a second to sign the President's birthday card:  
Today is the President’s birthday—made in the USA, 51 years ago today:  
The election is in 94 days—pitch in $10 today:  
Make sure to sign President Obama's birthday card today:  
This guy turns 51 today:  
High fives in Orlando, Florida:  
President Obama’s birthday is tomorrow—don't forget to sign his card:  
Good news worth sharing—make sure the women in your life see this:  
What a small business loan (and some wind) can do:  #MadeInAmerica 
How Mitt Romney’s plan would raise taxes on middle-class families:  
FACT: If Congress fails to extend a tax credit for wind power past this year, 37,000 people could lose their jobs within a year. 
FACT: The Chamber of Commerce, National Association of Manufacturers & 21 House Republicans pushed to extend the wind Production Tax Credit. 
FACT: Extending the wind energy Production Tax Credit would allow the industry to grow to 100,000 jobs in just four years. #MadeInAmerica 
Mitt Romney says he would get rid of the Production Tax Credit for wind energy, costing thousands of American jobs:  
If you do one thing today: Follow to get the facts and fight the smears. 
Stand with President Obama in support of tax cuts for middle-class families:  #2200dollars 
POTUS: “If Congress sends me a clean bill extending the tax cuts on the first $250,000 of a family’s income, I will sign it right away.” 
POTUS: “There’s no reason to wait. There’s no reason to make families and small businesses anxious so one party can score political points.” 
"Let’s keep taxes low for 98% of Americans ... Let’s keep taxes low for 97% of small business owners."—President Obama 
"What we should do right now is give middle-class families and small business owners a guarantee that their taxes won't go up next year." 
President Obama: "We’ve now created 4.5 million new jobs over the last 29 months." 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama urges Congress to prevent a tax hike on 98% of Americans next year.  #2200dollars 
The economy has added private-sector jobs for 29 straight months, for a total of 4.5 million jobs during that period:  
President Obama talks White Sox versus Cubs, Tim Tebow, and more on sports radio in Columbus, Ohio:  
“Happy belated birthday” just doesn’t have the same ring to it. Sign President Obama’s birthday card today:  
A crush of hugs in Orlando today:  
Add your name if you agree with the President: We should be giving tax cuts to middle-class families, not millionaires.  
Use the hashtag #2200dollars to share how the President’s middle-class tax cut would help your family next year. 
FACT: Romney and Republicans in Congress have refused to extend middle-class tax cuts without giving millionaires tax cuts they don't need. 
FACT: President Obama's plan extends tax cuts for 98% of Americans—saving the typical family of four #2200dollars next year. 
FACT: Since taking office, President Obama has cut taxes for the typical American family by $3,600. #progress 
How would President Obama and Mitt Romney’s tax plans impact your family? Find out with this new tax calculator:  
Just 96 days to win this thing. Check out  to make sure you’re registered and ready to vote:  
President Obama on Mitt Romney’s tax plan: “He’s asking you to pay more, so that folks like him can get a big tax cut.”  
Congress leaves for summer recess tomorrow, without having taken action to create jobs:  
Photo of the day: President Obama congratulates the U.S. Women’s Gymnastics team on their big win.  
FACT: Romney’s plan would raise taxes on middle-class families with children by an average of $2,000 to pay for tax cuts for millionaires. 
FACT: Mitt Romney’s plan would raise taxes on 95% of Americans, but cut taxes for the wealthiest.  
All the tools you need to help organize your community for #Obama2012—on one iPhone app:  
President Obama: “Under my opponent’s plan, who do you think gets the bill for these $250,000 tax cuts? You do!”  
As of today, health insurance plans will begin to cover contraception as part of women's preventive care without copay:  
97 days until Election Day—make 5 calls with the online call tool now:  
Congratulations! You’ve made us all proud. #TeamUSA 
“If you still believe in me like I believe in you, I hope you will stand with me this November.”—President Obama 
President Obama: “My hair may be grayer than it was four years ago. But my determination to do right by you is stronger than ever.” 
“I won't pay for new tax cuts for millionaires & billionaires by gutting the investments that have always kept the middle class strong.” 
President Obama: "Ohio, we do not need more tax cuts for folks who are already doing really well. We need tax cuts for working Americans." 
“We know that this country wasn’t built from the top down. It was built by the middle class.”—President Obama 
"Here in America, if you work hard, that work should be rewarded."—President Obama 
President Obama: "The wonderful thing about the Olympics is that it reminds us that for all our differences, we're Americans first." 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio about the choice we face in this election.  
Two days left for Congress to act on jobs. Tell Republicans in Congress to get to work:  
Congrats to Michael Phelps for breaking the all-time Olympic medal record. You’ve made your country proud. -bo 
DEADLINE: For the price of buying your friend a drink—pitch in $5 before midnight to help this campaign win:  
The U.S.A. swim program has a lot of reasons to be proud this week—here are a few more:  
We’ve all got reasons for supporting the President—and now it's time to show it. Pitch in $5 before midnight:  
Promises kept:  
Barns for Obama! (via  
Pitch in $10 before midnight and get a Vote Obama car magnet—shipping’s on us:   
Today is one of the most important fundraising deadlines of this campaign so far. Pitch in $3 before midnight:  
"If we win this election, it will be because of what you did in moments like this to close the gap." —President Obama  
"Employer: United States of America. Occupation: President." President Obama donates ahead of tonight's deadline:  
Everything you need to help win this thing—right at your fingertips. Download the new #Obama2012 smartphone app:  
Four more years of progress: There’s an app for that. Take a tour of the new #Obama2012 smartphone app:  
The election is in 98 days—set up your grassroots fundraising page now to get your friends involved:  
Deadline deal: Give $10 or more before midnight, get a Vote Obama car magnet. Simple as that:  
Congress has just 3 days before leaving Washington to act on the President’s jobs plan. Tell them to get to work now:  
Tonight is one of the most critical fundraising deadlines we’ll face. Please make a donation of $3 or more right now:  
Tuesday is a major fundraising deadline for this campaign—pitch in $10 now:  
Four more years:  
.@MichelleObama has a card going around for the President’s birthday—add your name:  
Pick your favorite state, pick your favorite color, get a custom t-shirt:  
We’re only 99 days out from the election, so sign up for Dashboard—the #Obama2012 online organizing tool:  
Pitch in before July's critical fundraising deadline if you’re standing with President Obama:  
Happy 47th anniversary to Medicare! Find out five ways that health care reform strengthens Medicare:  #ACA 
Chrysler continued its comeback last quarter by posting $436 million in profits:  #MadeInAmerica 
Pitch in $10 today to help out-organize the other side over the final 100 days:   
If you’ve ever wondered what it’s like to volunteer for the President, watch this video:  #Obama2012 
Volunteers kicked off the last 100 days of this campaign with more than 4,700 events this weekend. See some highlights:  
Just 4 days before Congress leaves for summer recess. Tell them to act on the President’s jobs plan this week:  
See what it’s like to volunteer for the President through the eyes of an organizer—then sign up to organize your town:  
Youth soccer programs are growing thanks to the Obama administration:  
Day two of the weekend of action is in full swing. Find an event near you:   
Only 5 days before Congress leaves for summer recess. Tell them to act on the President’s jobs plan now:  
What will you do in the next 100 days to make sure we keep moving forward, not back?  
Just 100 days left to organize your community for the President. Start today at a weekend of action event near you:  
The President has a birthday next week—wish him well in his 51st year:  
Congress should act on creating the Veterans Job Corps to put veterans to work using skills developed in the armed forces. #CongressToDoList 
"We can’t afford more top-down economics. What we need are policies that will grow and strengthen the middle class."  
"This is the 1st time I've knocked on doors in 40 years!"—@OFA_OH volunteer Judy:  (h/t 
Congress has just 6 days to act on jobs before its summer recess:  
This morning kicks off a big weekend of action for volunteers around the country—find an event near you:  
Just some of the ways President Obama is helping small businesses grow and create jobs:  
By the end of this weekend, we’ll only be 100 days out from Election Day. Make them count:  
Join and wish the President a happy birthday:  
President Obama: “I believe in fighting for the middle class, because if they’re prospering, all of us will prosper.”  
8 years ago today: “There is not a liberal America and a conservative America. There is the United States of America.”  
Read and RT Louisa’s story so your friends see health care reform at work for families and small businesses:  #ACA 
U.S.A.! U.S.A.!  
Congress should support American jobs by extending the Production Tax Credit for wind energy. #CongressToDoList 
Only a week left for Congress to act on President Obama’s jobs plan. Tell them we can’t afford to wait any longer:  
Countdown to the weekend of action: two days to go, and has its clipboards ready.  
Last call: Your chance to join President Obama for his birthday in Chicago. Sign up before midnight:  
Someone has a birthday coming up…  
Walter shares why teachers like him should pitch in and support the President:  #Obama2012 
This weekend, we’ll be 100 days out from Election Day. Get started to help organize your community, and bring a friend:  
Pitch in $5 before midnight and be automatically entered to help the President celebrate his birthday in Chicago:  
FACT: President Obama has called for permanently doubling the amount of start-up expenses that entrepreneurs can deduct on their taxes. 
FACT: President Obama has proposed simplifying the tax code for small businesses and letting them expense up to $1 million in investments. 
FACT: In 2011, the President's Small Business Jobs Act made 4.5 million small businesses eligible for larger tax breaks on new investments. 
Ask one more person to join this campaign—it could make all the difference:  
Abram is in for 2012—and he’s making sure other Americans with disabilities vote for President Obama, too:  
You could have a chance to join the President for his birthday celebration in Chicago—your airfare's covered:  
FACT: Congress could jumpstart hiring by giving a 10% income tax credit to small businesses that create new jobs or increase wages in 2012. 
Only 8 days left until Congress leaves Washington for a month. Tell them to act on the President’s jobs plan now:  
Associated Press fact check: Mitt Romney continued meeting with partners at his buyout firm after he says he left.  
Associated Press fact check: Mitt Romney continued meeting with partners at his buyout firm after he says he left.  
POTUS: “We are Americans, and we don’t quit ... We accept responsibility. We keep going. We keep marching. We keep moving forward.” 
President Obama: "We know what we’re fighting for. We can see the America we believe in—a country where everybody gets a fair shot." 
"If this country is about anything, it’s about passing on greater opportunity to the next generation."—President Obama to 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in New Orleans at the 2012 National Urban League Conference.  
President Obama calls out Mitt Romney for distorting his words about small businesses:  
FACT: So far in 2012, the Affordable Care Act has saved more than 1 million Medicare beneficiaries an average of $629 on prescription drugs. 
FACT: Thanks to the Affordable Care Act, Medicare recipients have saved nearly $4 billion on prescription drugs.  
It’s not every day you get to eat a slice of birthday cake with the President:  
FACT: Thanks to the Affordable Care Act, a small business with 10 workers could save $35,000 a year on employee health care. #ACA 
FACT: President Obama has signed 18 tax cuts that are helping small businesses grow and create jobs. #progress 
Hear talk about her family’s first few weeks in the White House:  
Help build a better world for our kids—join Parents for Obama:  
Stick it on a notebook, a car, or a laptop—get your #Obama2012 stickers here:  
Congress should pass a bill letting responsible homeowners refinance at today’s low rates—saving a typical family $3,000. #CongressToDoList 
Congress has just 9 days left to act on jobs before its summer recess:  
President Obama: "Those ads—taking my words about small business out of context—they're flat out wrong.”  
Pitch in $5 and be automatically entered to help the President celebrate his birthday in Chicago—airfare’s on us:  
Fighting to put America’s schools on top:  
Costco co-founder Jim Sinegal shares why President Obama’s support for small businesses is “unwavering”:  
Thanks to the Capital One Bank will refund $140 million to 2 million customers:  
"He walks the walk and talks the talk when it comes to supporting veterans."  
Your story could inspire someone else’s—share how you got involved with this campaign:  
President Obama is helping students “know before they owe” by asking colleges to use a simple financial aid fact sheet:  
“Sometimes politics can seem very small—but the choice you face? It couldn't be bigger.”  
Don’t miss out—enter for the chance to celebrate the President’s birthday with him in Chicago:  
Just 10 days left before summer recess, and Congress still hasn’t acted on jobs. Tell them to get to work:  
What President Obama actually said about small businesses:  
In less than four months, we all have to decide if we’ll move forward or back:  #Obama2012 
.@AshleyJudd hosted a Women Vote 2012 Summit with yesterday—and she brought a couple friends:  
“President Obama is one of the greatest advocates for veterans that I’ve seen in my lifetime.”  
"She inspired generations of young girls to reach for the stars."—President Obama on the passing of Sally Ride 
FACT: Since President Obama signed Wall Street reform, business lending has increased by 15 percent. #progress 
FACT: Thanks to Wall Street reform, the is making contracts for mortgages, student loans, and credit cards easier to understand. 
FACT: Permanently raising federal deposit insurance to $250K is helping protect customers and level the playing field for community banks. 
FACT: Thanks to Wall Street reform, 2.5 million Americans harmed by deceptive credit card practices are receiving $150 million in refunds. 
President Obama’s Wall Street reform ends the era of “too big to fail” and taxpayer bailouts:  #progress 
“Just as you protected America, we’re going to pass our country to the next generation—stronger, safer and more respected in the world.” 
POTUS: “By making the post-9/11 G.I. Bill a priority, we’ve helped more than 800,000 veterans and their families pursue their education.” 
POTUS on efforts to help homeless veterans: “Every veteran who has fought for America ought to have a home in America.” 
POTUS on our sacred trust with veterans: “As long as I’m President, I will not allow VA health care to be turned into a voucher system.” 
POTUS: “We’ve got the best-trained, best-led, best-equipped military in history, and as Commander-in-Chief I’m going to keep it that way.” 
“Thanks to the courage and skill of our forces, Osama bin Laden will never threaten America again, and al Qaeda is on the road to defeat.” 
"I pledged to take the fight to our enemies, and renew our leadership in the world. As President, that’s what I’ve done."—President Obama 
POTUS: “Every generation among you served to keep us strong and free. And it falls to us, those that follow, to preserve what you won.” 
President Obama at the VFW Convention: “Veterans of Foreign Wars, in you I see the same shining values—the virtues that make America great.” 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Nevada at the National Convention of the Veterans of Foreign Wars.  
Two years ago, the President signed Wall Street reform to protect consumers and prevent another financial crisis:  
VIDEO: Welcoming home our veterans.  
“You have given my children a new lease on life. Thank you.”  
President Obama is fighting for you—RT this image if you stand with him:  
Summer:  
Share the story of how you got involved in this campaign, and you could inspire someone else to do the same:  
Tell Romney and his allies in Congress: We can’t afford to wait for action on President Obama’s jobs plan.  
FACT: Republicans in Congress have repeatedly blocked legislation that would implement ideas from the President’s Jobs Council. 
FACT: President Obama called on Congress to expand the R&D Tax Credit to improve U.S. competitiveness for attracting investments. 
FACT: The President’s Jobs Council has recommended that Congress increase hiring by investing in upgrades to our roads, ports, and airports. 
FACT: President Obama has taken action to implement 90% of the Jobs Council’s recommendations that don’t require congressional action. 
Mitt Romney falsely claims that the President hasn’t met with his Jobs Council. Get the facts:  
“Hearing him talk about equality and what he's done is the reason I'm behind him.”  #Obama2012 
People who aren't Mitt Romney try to understand Mitt Romney's explanation of his Bain Capital departure date:  
Reaching out in Florida:  
FACT: Romney opposes the President’s plan to extend middle-class tax cuts for 98% of Americans and ask the wealthy to pay their fair share. 
POTUS: “Through all my campaigns, what’s given me hope is the American people. You have the ability to cut through all the nonsense.” 
“It’s wrong to ask seniors to pay more for Medicare just so millionaires & billionaires can pay less in taxes.”—POTUS on Romney’s tax plan 
“This country was not built on top-down economics. This country was built from the middle class out.”—President Obama 
POTUS: "No matter who you are or where you come from or what you look like, America is a place where you can make it if you try." 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Florida about the choice we face in this election.  
Pitch in $5 or more today to help make sure we can keep out-organizing the other side:  #Obama2012 
Every $16,000 we raise means one more organizer to register voters and mobilize volunteers through Election Day:  
Why won't Mitt Romney release more than a year of his tax returns?  
“President Obama had the courage to step up and save General Motors, and because of it, I have a job today.”  
Congress is running out of time—just 15 days to take action on jobs. Tell them you won’t accept more stalling:  
“Nelson Mandela has changed the arc of history, transforming his country, continent, and the world.”  
"He says 'entity' a lot."  
Compare and contrast: Years for which President Obama and Mitt Romney have released their tax returns.  
Download this Quick Donate extension for Chrome so you can donate to #Obama2012 whenever you’re inspired:  
If you don’t buy Mitt Romney’s excuse that he “retroactively retired” from his buyout firm, you’re not alone:  
Think outside the bumper—these stickers look great on bikes and laptops, too:  
FACT: Under President Obama, U.S. electricity production from renewable energy sources is on track to double by the end of 2012. #progress 
"Now tell the truth. Are you guys playing for money?"  
A new tool to build this campaign anytime, anywhere:  
Join the President for his backyard birthday party in Chicago—you won’t want to miss it:  
FACT: Mitt Romney's tax plan would raise taxes on at least 18 million middle-class Americans while giving millionaires a 25% tax cut. 
Honesty and transparency matter:  
16 days until Congress leaves for summer recess—it’s time for them to act on jobs:  
Everyday Americans try to make sense of Mitt Romney's Bain Capital explanations:  
Blame the static electricity in the Oval Office:  
There are many reasons to support the President, and if you do, now’s the time to say so:  #Obama2012 
“He's trying to reclaim that community spirit, where the top helps the bottom and the bottom helps the top.”—Sally on President Obama 
“I have a lot of friends who are gay, and just to know that there's someone there, looking to make things right, is meaningful.”—Cynthia 
“I have two college-age kids who will be able to stay on our family's health insurance."—Kathleen, #Obama2012 neighborhood team leader 
"He's helped with Ohio jobs by rescuing the auto industry—that's very important for Ohioans."—Rebecca, a speech therapist, on the President 
President Obama spoke to a packed house of supporters at Music Hall in Cincinnati yesterday—a few of their reactions to follow. 
In her own words:  
“He speaks to me. He’s the person in church who I look up to, or the guy around the corner at the football game.”  
FACT: Romney’s corporate tax plan could displace U.S. jobs and create 800K jobs overseas by eliminating taxes on companies’ foreign profits. 
Fighting for companies whose products are #MadeInAmerica:  
A few friends are throwing the President a birthday party at the Obamas' home in Chicago, and you have a chance to go:  
“We’ve got as stark a choice as you could imagine.”—President Obama in Ohio yesterday:  
Baby incoming:  
Congress has just 17 days before they leave for summer recess—tell them that action on jobs can’t wait:  
From torrential rain to fresh tomatoes—check out a few photos from the President’s trip to Virginia this weekend:  
The top 10 economies that would benefit from Mitt Romney’s jobs plan (none of them are the United States):  
Find out how much of your premiums your health insurer is spending on care, and if you might qualify for a rebate:  #ACA 
The set-up at President Obama's town hall in Cincinnati this morning:  
Help President Obama celebrate his birthday in Chicago:  
POTUS on his most important promise kept: “I will wake up every single day fighting for you as hard as I know how.” 
President Obama: “This is going to be a close election and it is going to be an important debate.” 
POTUS answering a question about construction jobs: "I have asked Congress to expand our efforts to rebuild roads and bridges." 
“In the end, we are not Democrats or Republicans first. We are Americans first.”—President Obama 
POTUS on what he and Gov. Romney stand for: “I believe women should be able to control their own health care decisions. He does not.” 
Little girl in audience asks POTUS about his favorite Girl Scout cookie. POTUS: “I’m going with the mint.” 
President Obama: “Ever since I came into office, one of my biggest priorities has been, ‘How do I support small businesses.’” 
Barber in audience asks POTUS if he can cut his hair. POTUS: “You know that you would not want a President who was disloyal to his barber.” 
“What I’m always struck by is the core decency and goodness and hard work and responsibility and faith that the American people have.” 
POTUS on ending the war in Iraq: “Let’s now take half the money we were spending on war, and do some nation building here at home.” 
POTUS: “When the auto industry was on the brink of collapse and Gov. Romney said, ‘Let Detroit go bankrupt,' I said no.” 
President Obama: “The typical family’s tax burden is $3,600 less than what it was when I took office.” 
“We don’t need a President who plans to shift jobs overseas…I want to give tax breaks to companies that are investing right here in Ohio.” 
POTUS: “Gov. Romney’s experience has been in investing in companies that were the pioneers of outsourcing.” 
POTUS in Ohio: “This election is about more than just two candidates or two political parties. It’s about how do we build a strong economy.” 
Watch live: President Obama speaks at a town hall in Cincinnati about the choice we face in November.  
FACT: President Obama would extend tax cuts for 98% of Americans and return rates for the wealthiest to what they were in the Clinton era. 
FACT: Romney would make the Bush tax cuts for wealthy Americans permanent and add $5 trillion in new tax cuts weighted to the wealthiest. 
Follow today for updates and pictures from on the ground at President Obama's grassroots event in Cincinnati. 
Safe to say these Virginians are in for #Obama2012:  
High five.  
With just 18 days left before summer recess, let Congress know we can't wait for action on jobs:  
It began pouring down rain at a rally outside Richmond yesterday:  
19 days left for Congress to take action on jobs before its summer recess:  
Dynamic duo:  
Built by organizers for organizers—Dashboard is your go-to place to get involved in this campaign:  
Donate $10 or more to #Obama2012, get a car magnet—it’s that easy:  
President Obama in Virginia today: “When working people do well, everybody does well.”  
Congress should work with President Obama to extend tax cuts for small business owners:  
Mitt Romney is asking for apologies, all while running a campaign dedicated to attacks:  
Extending tax cuts for the middle class isn’t just policy—it’s helping the McLaughlins raise a family:  
Four years ago, at another rally in the Virginia rain:  
POTUS in the Virginia rain:  
“Let’s at least agree to do what we agree on.”—POTUS on the need for Congress to extend tax cuts for the middle class:  
Everyone should see this new ad from the campaign:  
FACT: The typical middle-class family's taxes have been cut by $3,600 over President Obama's first term.  
Congress has just 20 days before its summer recess to take action on the President's jobs plan:  
A beloved member of our campaign family, Alex Okrent, passed away today. Our prayers are with his loved ones. We will miss you, Alex. -bo 
What it will cost the typical working family if the middle class tax cuts are allowed to expire:  
Mitt Romney was still running his corporate buyout firm in 2001. Here's why that's important:  
By the numbers: Why President Obama is fighting to extend middle class tax cuts.  
More questions about Mitt Romney:  
Why Mitt Romney’s end date at his buyout firm matters:  
Just one way the #ACA is making health care more affordable:  
Sonja was a lifelong Republican, but now she’s an #Obama2012 supporter and grassroots donor. Here’s why:  
Only 21 days before Congress breaks for summer recess. Tell them to pass the President’s jobs plan:  
Five ways Mitt Romney simply isn't leveling with the American people:  
Emi in North Carolina: "If you do support our President, you can't just sit back."  
Stickers! Get them here:  
What drives our economy:  
FACT: President Obama’s plan extends tax cuts for 97% of America's small business owners. #progress 
FACT: President Obama has signed 18 tax cuts that are helping small businesses grow and create jobs. #progress 
Mitt Romney says he left his buyout firm in 1999, but the facts say otherwise:  
A Romney campaign official on the discrepancies in Romney’s firm’s SEC filings: They “do not square with common sense.”  
FACT: Romney didn’t finalize a severance agreement with Bain until 2002, three years after he says he left the buyout firm. 
FACT: Romney’s MA financial disclosure form shows that he earned more than $100,000 at Bain in 2001 and 2002— years after he claims he left. 
FACT: Mitt Romney publicly says he left his buyout firm in 1999, but was listed on SEC filings until 2002.  
Dashboard: Welcome to your digital field office.  
Congress has just 22 days before summer recess—it’s time for them to get to work on jobs:  
President Obama is fighting for families like the McLaughlins:  #Obama2012 
Why did Romney invest millions in the Cayman Islands?  
“I just wanted to be part of helping a man who has my interests in mind, even though my financial help may be small.”  
President Obama: “If you truly value families, you shouldn’t play politics with a woman’s health.”  #Women2012 
He’s fighting for American families—RT if you’re with him:  
Add your name if you agree that Congress should extend tax cuts for middle-class families now:  
FACT: Since taking office, President Obama has cut taxes for the typical American family by $3,600. #progress 
A warm welcome from a fellow ice cream fan in Cedar Rapids yesterday:  
Yesterday in Iowa, President Obama spoke about why Congress needs to extend tax cuts for middle-class families:  
Just 23 days until Congress breaks for summer recess—it’s time for them to act on the President's jobs plan:  
Who he's fighting for:  
FACT: President Obama’s plan to extend tax cuts for people making less than $250,000 a year could save the typical family $2,200 next year. 
POTUS in Iowa: "If you're willing to stand with me and knock on doors with me, we will finish what we started."  
Why Nancy gives: “I believe in the America he wants for my grandchildren.”  #Obama2012 
President Obama this morning: "We're getting outraised—a first for a sitting president, if this continues."  
Stand with the President to urge Congress to extend tax cuts for middle-class families:  
“As long as I’m President, I will wake up every day and fight for American jobs.”—President Obama 
“Gov. Romney has experience owning companies that were called ‘pioneers’ in the business of outsourcing.”—President Obama 
POTUS: “Doesn't it make sense to agree to keep taxes low for the 98% of Americans who are working hard and can’t afford a tax hike?” 
President Obama: “We don’t need more top-down economics. What we need is someone who's going to fight every day to grow the middle class.” 
President Obama: "This election is about breaking that stalemate." 
POTUS: “What’s holding us back from meeting this challenge … is a stalemate in Washington between two fundamentally different views.” 
President Obama: "This will be my last political campaign, no matter what." 
President Obama: “All we ask is for our hard work to pay off; for our responsibility to be rewarded.” 
POTUS: “America's never been a country of people looking for handouts; we’re a nation of dreamers and doers. We work for what we’ve got.” 
President Obama: "I'm betting that you will be as fired up as you were in 2008, because you know the stakes." 
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Iowa about why we've got to extend middle-class tax cuts.  
Bipartisanship:  
We're building this campaign the right way—with small donations from grassroots supporters. Own a piece of it:  
We need to close this gap:  
Stand with President Obama: Tell Republicans in Congress to extend tax cuts for middle-class families.  
Congress only has 24 days before the summer recess to act on jobs. Tell them to get to work:  
Why I give: “We can pull ourselves out of this recession by doing what we do best."  
We’ve got a new #Obama2012 bumper sticker design, and it’s yours for $5:  
President Obama on why we need Congress to act now to extend tax cuts for middle-class Americans:  
We crunched the numbers:  
“Thank you for making it easier to pursue my dreams.”  #ACA 
While June was our best month so far, we still got beat: Romney & the GOP brought in $106 million. Help close the gap:  
Over 98% of donations to the campaign in June were less than $250, and the average donation was $52.54. 
More than 706,000 people donated to #Obama2012 in June—and more than 181,000 of them were giving for the first time. 
The campaign raised more than $71 million across committees in June. Thanks to everyone who chipped in. 
News today: Our FEC numbers. As of June, more than 2.4 million people have stepped up to own a piece of this campaign. 
POTUS: "I'm calling on Congress to extend the tax cuts for the 98 percent of Americans who make less than $250,000 for another year." 
President Obama: "We should not raise taxes on middle-class families or small businesses." 
POTUS: “I believe it’s time to let the tax cuts for the wealthiest Americans—folks like myself—to expire.” 
President Obama: "I’ve cut taxes every year that I've been President by $3,600 for the typical middle-class family.” 
POTUS: "We don’t need more top-down economics. We’ve tried that theory. We’ve seen what happens." 
